COAST  GUARD  READINESS,  MISSION  BALANCE, 

AND  FISCAL  YEAR  2006  BUDGET  REQUEST

S.  HRG.  109–121

HEARING

BEFORE THE

SUBCOMMITTEE ON FISHERIES AND THE COAST 

GUARD
OF THE

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

MARCH  17,  2005

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation

(

21–672 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2005

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2250 Mail: Stop SSOP, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS

FIRST  SESSION

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

DAVID RUSSELL,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

SUBCOMMITTEE  ON  FISHERIES  AND  THE  COAST  GUARD 

OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine,  Chairwoman 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington,  Ranking 
DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 

(II)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on March 17, 2005 ............................................................................
Statement of Senator Cantwell ..............................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye ..................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg ..........................................................................
Statement of Senator Snowe ...................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens ................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Collins, Admiral Thomas H., Commandant, U.S. Coast Guard ...........................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Welch,  Master  Chief  Franklin  A.,  Master  Chief  Petty  Officer,  U.S.  Coast 
Guard ....................................................................................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................
Wrightson,  Margaret  T.,  Director,  Homeland  Security  and  Justice  Issues, 
U.S. Government Accountability Office ..............................................................
Prepared statement ..........................................................................................

APPENDIX 

Barnes,  Joseph  L.,  National  Executive  Secretary,  Fleet  Reserve  Association, 
prepared statement ..............................................................................................
Lautenberg,  Hon.  Frank  R.,  U.S.  Senator  from  New  Jersey,  prepared  state-
ment ......................................................................................................................
Response to written questions submitted to Admiral Thomas H. Collins by: ....
Hon. Maria Cantwell ........................................................................................
Hon. Daniel K. Inouye ......................................................................................
Hon. John F. Kerry ..........................................................................................
Hon. Frank R. Lautenberg ...............................................................................
Hon. Olympia J. Snowe ....................................................................................
...........
Hon. Olympia J. Snowe ....................................................................................
Hon. Frank R. Lautenberg ...............................................................................

Response to written questions submitted to Margaret T. Wrightson by:

Page 
1
3
4
5
52
1
42

5
7

14
16

19
21

61

61

76
72
84
89
66

93
93

(III)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

THE  COAST  GUARD’S  READINESS,  MISSION 
BALANCE,  AND  FISCAL  YEAR  2006  BUDGET 
REQUEST 

THURSDAY,  MARCH  17,  2005

SUBCOMMITTEE ON FISHERIES AND THE COAST GUARD, 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

The  Subcommittee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10  a.m.  in  room 
SR–253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Olympia  J.  Snowe, 
Chairwoman of the Subcommittee, presiding. 

Washington, DC. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE,

U.S. SENATOR FROM MAINE 

Senator  SNOWE.  The  hearing  will  come  to  order.  Now  that  we 
have  the  Chair  and  Ranking  here,  I  think  we  can  get  going  now. 
Good  morning.  Admiral  Collins,  Master  Chief  Welch,  Ms. 
Wrightson,  I’d  like  to  thank  all  of  you  for  being  here  this  morning 
to  testify  on  this  critical  hearing  on  the  Coast  Guard’s  readiness, 
mission balance, and the Fiscal Year 2006 budget request. 

Today’s hearing will further examine the readiness concerns due 
to  the  overall  degradation  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  assets,  to  review 
the challenges the Coast Guard’s facing in balancing its homeland-
security and traditional missions, and as well as to ensure that we 
provide the Coast Guard with the 2006 budget request to fulfill its 
many current and increasing responsibilities. 

As  Chair  of  the  Fisheries  and  Coast  Guard  Subcommittee,  I 
strongly  believe  that  the  Coast  Guard  serves  as  a  cornerstone  of 
our  Department  of  Homeland  Security.  It  is  uniquely  positioned  to 
perform a wide variety of missions critical to our nation’s domestic 
safety and security. Last year alone, the Coast Guard responded to 
more than 32,000 calls for assistance, and saved nearly 5,500 lives. 
These brave men and women risk their lives to defend our borders 
from  drugs,  illegal  immigrants,  acts  of  terror,  and  other  national-
security threats. 

In  2004,  the  Coast  Guard  prevented  376,000  pounds  of  mari-
juana  and  cocaine  from  crossing  the  borders.  It  also  stopped  more 
than  11,000  illegal  migrants  from  reaching  our  shores,  conducting 
more  than  4,500  boardings  to  protect  our  vital  fishery  stocks,  and 
responded to more than 24,000 pollution incidents. 

The  Coast  Guard  also  aggressively  defended  our  homeland  by 
conducting  more  than  36,000  port  security  patrols,  and  conducted 
19,000 security boardings. In accordance with the Maritime Trans-

(1)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

2

portation Security Act, the Coast Guard has also reviewed and ap-
proved 9,580 domestic vessel security plans, and 3,119 domestic fa-
cility  security  plans.  They  also  verified  security-plan  implementa-
tion for 8,100 foreign vessels. 

This is a tremendous record of success, and I cite these statistics 
because  I  think,  again,  it  underscores  the  role  that  the  Coast 
Guard plays on so many different levels. And this record of success 
is really, I think, extraordinary. 

I  think,  at  the  same  time,  we  share  the  concern  about  the  toll 
that such a high operational tempo is taking on the Coast Guard’s 
antiquated  ships  and  aging  aircraft,  and  ultimately  on  its  per-
sonnel. 

So, Admiral Collins, it’s unfortunate—and we had this discussion 
yesterday, and repeatedly—that, again, we’re addressing this issue 
concerning  the  high  OPTEMPO  issue  for  the  Coast  Guard,  but,  at 
the same time, the deterioration of its equipment and the resources 
that has plagued the service repeatedly, year after year. 

I’m  aware  that  the  110-foot  patrol-boat  fleet,  a  workhorse  of  the 
Coast Guard, in the past year has experienced 23 hull breaches re-
quiring emergency dry docks. This simply is too unsafe for the men 
and women out there on the seas, it certainly poses a grave danger 
to them. 

Additionally, the 378-foot fleet experiences a main-space casualty 

each patrol. Again, an unacceptable safety record. 

The resultant total of unexpected maintenance days for medium- 
and high-endurance fleets has skyrocketed and endured a 400 per-
cent  increase  from  1999.  This  averages  to  more  than  two  lost  cut-
ters  per  year.  With  the  missions  assigned  to  the  Coast  Guard  and 
the pace of the operation the service now endures, the Coast Guard 
and  this  nation  cannot  afford  to  lose  1  day  of  service,  let  alone  2 
years. So the time to act on this is obviously now, before we deepen 
the crisis. 

Today,  we’re  considering  the  Administration’s  Fiscal  Year  2006 
budget request, which proposes $8.1 billion in funding for the Coast 
Guard,  which  is  an  8  percent  increase  over  the  previous  year. 
While  these  increases,  on  the  surface,  may  appear  to  be  sufficient, 
I am concerned that this is not enough, just as I was concerned last 
year, and expressed that, as well, repeatedly. 

Once more, as we delve into this budget request, we find it does 
not significantly increase funding for the Coast Guard’s Deepwater 
Project,  even  though  the  Coast  Guard  is  clearly  in  desperate  need 
of  upgrading  its  legacy  assets.  More  importantly,  the  Administra-
tion’s request places this program on a 20-plus-year timeline, which 
obviously  does  not  allow  the  Coast  Guard  to  fulfill  its  obligations 
that this nation requires of it. 

We  cannot  expect  the  Coast  Guard  to  do  its  job  with  the  re-
sources  that  it  currently  has,  and  certainly  those  that  are  degrad-
ing  and  those  that  have  become  inoperative,  in  many  respects.  I 
will  continue  to  fight  for  Deepwater  acceleration,  because  it  is  the 
best and most cost-effective way to remedy the Coast Guard’s read-
iness problems and provide the Coast Guard with the tools it needs 
to carry out all of its missions. 

While  these  additional  resources  are  desperately  needed,  a  new 
reality  requires  the  Coast  Guard  to  operate  more  efficiently  and 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

3

smarter  if  it  is  also  going  to  do  its  job  successfully  in  fulfilling  its 
traditional missions, as well. Maintaining a proper mission balance 
is  a  significant  challenge  for  the  Coast  Guard,  as  I’m  sure  Ms. 
Wrightson will discuss. We have to balance the available resources 
with our expectations for mission performance. 

Admiral  Collins,  it  is  great  to  see  you  here  again  this  morning. 
I  look  forward  to  discussing  your  agency’s  budget  request,  as  well 
as the other issues I have discussed and raised in our meeting yes-
terday.  Our  nation  needs  the  Coast  Guard  today  more  than  ever. 
I  intend  to  ensure,  as  the  Chair  of  this  Subcommittee,  that  you 
have  the  essential  resources  to  fulfill  the  agency’s  homeland-secu-
rity as well as non-homeland-security duties, as well. 

Master  Chief  Welch,  I  welcome  you  to  the  Senate,  as  well,  and 
look forward to your testimony. The issues you confront are equally 
important to ensure that our men and women in uniform are treat-
ed fairly. You obviously have a unique perspective. You can provide 
the  insights  regarding  the  issues  that  affect  our  men  and  women 
in uniform on a daily basis. 

And, Ms. Wrightson, I thank you for being here today, and want 
to thank you for all the service that you have provided us in assist-
ing  the  Coast  Guard  in  their  endeavors  to  meet  and  fulfill  the  re-
sponsibilities  and  how  they  can  improve  in  doing  so.  And  I  thank 
you.  And  I’ve  read  your  report,  and  I  appreciate  some  of  the  rec-
ommendations  you  have  made.  And  I  know  Admiral  Collins  does, 
as well. 

So, with that, I’ll recognize other Members of the Committee. 
Mr. Chairman? 
Senator STEVENS. Well, thank you very much. I’ll yield to my col-
leagues.  I’ve  got  another  appointment  later.  I’d  just  as  soon  wait 
and hear the testimony. 

Thank you. 
Senator SNOWE. OK. 
Senator Cantwell? 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARIA CANTWELL,

U.S. SENATOR FROM WASHINGTON 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Thank  you,  Madam  Chair.  Thank  you.  At 
this, our first hearing together, I would like to take an opportunity 
to  let  you  know  I  look  forward  to  working  with  you  in  the  109th 
Congress,  as  representative  of  states  with  strong  maritime  tradi-
tions from different corners of the country. I believe, though, we do 
share  a  common  interest  and  perspective  that  we  can  blend  to-
gether in creating good policy. 

Mr.  Chairman,  I’m  pleased  to  hear  that  we  are  going  to  discuss 
the  proposal  for  the  Fiscal  Year  2006  budget  regarding  the  impor-
tant  role  of  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard  in  maritime  security,  maritime 
safety, search and rescue of mariners, and a variety of other issues. 
In  addition,  the  Coast  Guard  plays  a  critical  role  in  protecting  our 
oceans  resource  through  fisheries  enforcement  and  response  to  oil 
spills. 

The 13th Coast Guard District, encompassing Oregon, Idaho, and 
Montana,  is  headquartered  in  Seattle,  and  Washington  has  played 
a  major  role  in  maritime  industries.  The  Port  of  Seattle  is  the 
third-largest  container  port  in  the  nation  and  half  of  the  nation’s 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

4

large passenger ferry operations are in the State of Washington. So 
we thank you for your help and coordination with law enforcement 
throughout the country on that issue. 

Seattle  is  also  the  home  port  of  many  Coast  Guard  vessels,  in-
cluding  the  nation’s  polar  icebreaker  fleet  operated  by  the  Coast 
Guard.  And  I  plan  to  ask  a  few  questions  of  Admiral  Collins  on 
that  issue  this  morning,  as  it’s  certainly  a  vital  national  resource 
to our country. 

Admiral Collins, we also had a chance to talk about the aging na-
ture of the Coast Guard fleet and your related concerns. I look for-
ward to talking about that this morning, and the issues of ship re-
pair. 

Recently,  an  oil  spill  in  Puget  Sound  coated  miles  of  shoreline 
with  heavy-grade  industrial  oil.  The  Coast  Guard  was  able  to  re-
spond and clean up that spill quickly with money from the Oil Spill 
Liability  Trust  Fund.  Because  liability  for  this  spill  has  yet  to  be 
determined, money from the trust fund was critical for fast contain-
ment and cleanup. Incidents like the Dalco oil spill in Puget Sound 
are an example of why we need to ensure that the Oil Spill Liabil-
ity Trust Fund exists beyond 2010. So we thank you for your quick 
response on that cleanup. 

The  Coast  Guard’s  homeland-security  activities  are  also  vital  to 
our  nation’s  well-being  and  prosperity.  So  are,  I  would  argue,  the 
traditional  mission  of  the  U.S.  Coast  Guard,  including  maritime 
safety  and  protection  of  natural  resources.  That’s  why  I  am  con-
cerned  about  the  Coast  Guard  effectively  balancing  new  and  old 
missions.  We’ll  have  to  work  hard  to  meet  the  challenges  as  we 
move  ahead.  Effective  operations  of  the  Coast  Guard  is  important 
for  the  nation,  and  I  look  forward  to  working  with  Senator  Snowe 
and  my  colleagues  here—the  Ranking  Member  and  the  Chairman 
of the overall Committee—to make sure that we are ensuring both 
safety and lawful maritime operations. 

Thank you, Senator Snowe. 
Senator  SNOWE.  Thank  you,  Senator  Cantwell.  And  I’m  looking 
forward to working with you on this Subcommittee, because I know 
that  we  share  a  number  of  issues  of  mutual  concern  and  interest. 
And so, I am looking forward to a very productive year. Thank you. 

Co-Chair Inouye? 

STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE,

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

Senator  INOUYE.  Thank  you,  Madam  Chair.  I’d  like  to  commend 
you,  Madam  Chairman  and  Ms.  Cantwell,  for  focusing  on  the  crit-
ical  services  of  the  Coast  Guard  as  your  first  matter  in  the  first 
Subcommittee hearing. 

Madam  Chair,  I  have  a  full  statement  here,  but,  because  of  the 
immense  importance  of  this  hearing,  may  I  submit  it  for  the 
record? 

Senator SNOWE. Without objection, so ordered. 
[The prepared statement of Senator Inouye follows:]

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

5

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE,

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

I  would  like  to  commend  Senators  Snowe  and  Cantwell  for  choosing  to  focus  on 
the  critical  services  provided  by  the  United  States  Coast  Guard  in  their  first  Sub-
committee hearing of the 109th Congress. 

The Coast Guard is critical to ensuring the safety and security of all coastal states 
and safeguarding our natural resources. The Coast Guard’s District 14, based in my 
home  state  of  Hawaii,  covers  the  largest  geographical  area  in  the  U.S.  We  rely  on 
the  oceans  and  the  ships  that  travel  them  for  most  of  the  goods  that  come  to  Ha-
waii. 

While  I  am  pleased  to  see  that  the  Administration  has  requested  an  increase  in 
Coast  Guard  funding  for  Fiscal  Year  2006,  I  do  have  some  concerns  as  to  whether 
this  is  adequate  to  cover  both  their  security  and  non-security  missions.  Indeed,  the 
Coast Guard has itself alerted us that the amount requested by the President is not 
sufficient,  and  has  shared  with  Congress  a  list  of  unfunded  priorities  for  FY  2006 
totaling $919 million. 

The  list  includes  more  than  $100  million  for  maritime  security  efforts.  While  not 
the  subject  of  this  hearing,  the  Transportation  Security  Administration’s  budget 
makes it very clear that we continue to focus more than 90 percent of our resources 
on  aviation  security.  However,  port  security  funding  is  also  critical.  We  can  buy  all 
of the patrol boats the Coast Guard seeks, but we will still need to harden security 
at our ports. 

Nearly  four  years  after  9/11,  we  are  still  struggling  to  find  the  right  balance  in 
funding and resource allocation to meet all of the Coast Guard’s important missions. 
We  all  know  that  homeland  security  is  our  highest  priority,  but  we  cannot  neglect 
other key missions such as maritime safety and living resource management. 

I  am  particularly  concerned  with  the  fact  that  over  the  past  five  years,  a  total 
of 216 suspected illegal incursions of foreign fishing vessels were detected within the 
Western/Central  Pacific  Exclusive  Economic  Zone.  The  Coast  Guard  detected  only 
three of these incursions. 

Perhaps the problem is that in District 14, we receive fewer assets than any other 

district in terms of personnel, aircraft, and cutters. 

I also have concerns about the Deepwater program. Costs are increasing, and yet 
the  Administration’s  budget  request  includes  only  $726  million  for  new  Deepwater 
assets,  essentially  a  flat  budget  over  Fiscal  Year  2005,  and  $240  million  for  main-
taining  existing  ‘‘legacy’’  assets.  The  Coast  Guard  says  that  it  needs  an  additional 
$637 million for Deepwater, as well as $63 million to maintain legacy assets. At the 
same time, the Administration has failed to provide us the revised Deepwater plan. 
I  would  like  to  assure  the  Commandant  in  saying  that  this  is  a  room  full  of 
friends and if ever there was a time for frankness in your statements regarding the 
budget, that time is now. 

I look forward to the testimony of all of the witnesses.

Senator  INOUYE.  And  I’d  like  to  assure  the  Commandant  that 
this  room  is  filled  with  your  supporters,  so  come  out  and  tell  us 
what you want. 

Admiral COLLINS. Thank you, sir. 
Senator SNOWE. Admiral Collins, please begin. 

STATEMENT OF ADMIRAL THOMAS H. COLLINS, 

COMMANDANT, U.S. COAST GUARD 

Admiral  COLLINS.  Well,  thank  you,  Madam  Chair.  It’s  terrific  to 
be  here  with  this  distinguished  Committee,  and  Members  of  this 
Committee,  and  discuss  the  budget  for  2006  for  the  United  States 
Coast Guard. 

Budget time is always important time. And, of course, one of my 
critical  job  elements  is  trying  to  put  the  best  tools  in  the  hands  of 
our Coast Guard men and women to do the job for America. 

I  think  since  9/11  we’ve  made  great  progress  in  securing  Amer-
ica’s  waterways.  Still,  no  doubt,  a  great  deal  is  left  to  be  done  to 
improve  our  security,  but  I  think  we’re  getting  better  every  day, 
and  thanks,  in  large  part,  to  the  Administration,  the  Secretary, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

6

and,  clearly,  this  Committee  that  has  helped  us  plot  the  way  for-
ward in this very, very important work. 

The budget—the 2006 budget, I think, will help us continue this 
progress.  The  discretionary  part  of  this  budget  is  6.9  billion,  about 
an  11-percent  increase  over  comparable  2005  funding  levels.  And 
the  budget  provides  the  necessary  resources,  as  you’ve  noted,  to 
continue  the  recapitalization  of  the  Coast  Guard  aging  fleet,  while 
building our maritime safety and security capabilities. 

Our  overarching  goal  is  to  secure  America’s  maritime  border  by 
managing and ultimately reducing risk. Risk. We’ve heard the new 
Secretary talk a lot about risk. But that’s our focus. How do we re-
duce/mitigate  risk  in  the  maritime  domain?  And  doing  so  requires 
that  we  identify  and  intercept  threats  well  before  they  reach  our 
shores  by  conducting  layered  multi-agency  security  operations 
while strengthening security posture of our strategic ports. And as 
we  reduce  risk,  we  continually  balance  each  of  the  Coast  Guard 
mission  requirements  to  ensure  no  degradation  in  service  to  the 
American public. 

So,  with  that  in  mind,  the  2006  budget  has  three  critical  prior-
ities  from  our  perspective:  recapitalizing  Coast  Guard  primarily 
through  the  Deepwater  Program,  implementing  maritime  security 
for the homeland, and enhancing mission performance. 

Now,  Deepwater,  clearly  the  issue  of  the  day  for  the  Coast 
Guard,  it  not  only  serves  to  recapitalize  this  service,  but  it’s  also 
the  foundation  for,  and  the  necessary  precursor  to,  implementing 
the  maritime  security  strategy  for  our  nation  and  to  enhance  mis-
sion performance, across the board. 

I  would  be  remiss  if  I  failed  to  acknowledge  the,  I  think,  ex-
tremely  dedicated  service  by  the  Coast  Guard  workforce  over  the 
past  year,  just  terrific  folks—auxiliarists,  reservists,  active  duty, 
and  civilian.  What  a  team.  And  you’ve  cited  some  of  the  accom-
plishments of the last year. And in—my written statement fully de-
tails some of these extraordinary accomplishments. 

I think our workforce is terrific, the young folks that have a com-
mitment  to  selfless  service.  And  I  think  they’re  making  progress, 
across the board, on every mission. I know the focus here is home-
land  security—has  been  and  should  be—but  we’re  not  forgetting 
any of our missions. 

Let  me  just  give  you  an  example  of  several  weeks  ago.  One  4-
day  period,  about  two  and  a  half  weeks  ago,  in  152  cases,  Coast 
Guard men and women saved the lives of 87 people, in a 4-day pe-
riod. They protected our homeland, both on the East Coast and the 
West  Coast,  in  12  different  cases.  They  interdicted  a  total  of  308 
migrants  from  four  different  countries  who  were  attempting  to 
enter  this  country  illegally.  They  investigated  a  Greek  tanker  car-
rying over 23 million gallons of crude oil which ran aground on the 
lower Mississippi. They detained four foreign flag vessels for failing 
to  comply  with  the  Maritime  Transportation  Security  Act.  And  in 
two  separate  cases  in  the  Caribbean,  they  interdicted  more  than 
6,000  pounds  of  cocaine  in  a  4-day  period.  This  is  the  typical  type 
of  multi-mission  performance  that  you’re  getting  out  of  our  Coast 
Guard. 

And,  again,  my  view  is  to  ensuring  they  are  properly  com-
pensated,  that  they  have  the  environment  to  grow  professionally. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

7

Probably  my  single-highest  priority  is  a  commitment  to  our  men 
and women. 

I think this budget is about placing the right tools in their capa-
ble hands. And they keep showing, and they have shown time and 
time  again,  that  they  know  just  what  to  do  with  it  when  we  put 
the tools in their hands. 

With your continued support, I’m confident that we will continue 
to  deliver  robust  maritime  safety  and  securities  that  America  de-
serves and expects. 

Thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  testify  before  this  Committee, 

and I stand ready to answer any question that you might have. 

Thank you. 
[The prepared statement of Admiral Collins follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF ADMIRAL THOMAS H. COLLINS, COMMANDANT,

U.S. COAST GUARD 

Introduction 

Good  morning  Madam  Chair  and  distinguished  Members  of  the  Subcommittee.  It 
is a pleasure to be here today to discuss the Coast Guard’s FY 2006 budget request 
and the positive impact it will have on the Coast Guard’s ability to secure America’s 
maritime  borders,  aid  persons  in  distress,  and  facilitate  the  safe  and  efficient  flow 
of commerce. 

On 9/10/01, our primary maritime focus was on the safe and efficient use of Amer-
ica’s waterways. Since 9/11, we have made great progress in securing America’s wa-
terways, while continuing to facilitate the safe and efficient flow of commerce. There 
is  no  doubt  that  work  remains,  but  there  is  also  no  doubt  that  we  continue  to  im-
prove maritime homeland security each and every day—thanks in large part to the 
continued  strong  budgetary  support  of  the  administration,  congress,  and  this  com-
mittee. 

The  Coast  Guard’s  FY  2006  budget  continues  that  support,  proposing  discre-
tionary  budget  authority  of  $6.9  billion,  an  eleven  percent  increase  over  the  com-
parable 2005 funding level. The budget provides the resources necessary to continue 
recapitalizing the Coast Guard’s aging cutters, boats, aircraft, and supporting infra-
structure,  while  building  out  maritime  safety  and  security  capabilities  essential  to 
meeting present and future mission demands. 
Getting Results 

The  Coast  Guard’s  overarching  goal  is  to  manage,  and  ultimately  reduce,  terror-
related risk in the Maritime Domain. Doing so requires identifying and intercepting 
threats well before they reach U.S. shores by conducting layered, multi-agency secu-
rity  operations;  while  strengthening  the  security  posture  of  strategic  economic  and 
military ports. As we seek to reduce maritime risk, we continually strive to balance 
each of the Coast Guard’s mission requirements to ensure no degradation in service 
to  the  American  public.  Looking  at  their  accomplishments,  it  is  clear  that  Coast 
Guard men and women continue rising to the challenge and delivering tangible and 
important  results  across  both  homeland  security  and  non-homeland  security  mis-
sion-programs.  No  amount  of  new  technology  or  capability  enhances  security  more 
than  our  personnel.  They  are  the  indispensable  link  in  any  strategy  and  I  am  con-
tinually impressed by their ingenuity, courage, and dedication. 

Coast  Guard  personnel  have  embraced  these  priorities,  have  integrated  them  in 
daily  operations,  and  have  achieved  impressive  results.  In  2004,  Coast  Guard  per-
sonnel:

try illegally by sea.

• Prevented more than 376,000 pounds of illegal narcotics from reaching the U.S. 
including seizing over 241,000 pounds of cocaine, shattering the previous record 
of 138,000 pounds.
• Interdicted nearly 11,000 undocumented migrants attempting to enter the coun-
• Dispatched  several  cutters,  aircraft,  and  personnel  for  four  months  as  part  of 
• Aggressively  conducted  more  than  36,000  port  security  patrols,  6,900  air  pa-
trols,  and  19,000  security  boardings;  escorted  7,200  vessels;  and  maintained 
more than 115 security zones to reduce maritime risk.

U.S. efforts to stabilize Haiti after the departure of President Aristide.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

8

• Provided  humanitarian  assistance  and  disaster  relief,  including  42  personnel, 
one  378-foot  High  Endurance  Cutter  (WHEC),  and  four  C–130  aircraft,  to  the 
governments of Indonesia, Sri Lanka, and Thailand in the aftermath of the dev-
astating tsunami of December 26, 2004.
• In  support  of  Operation  Iraqi  Freedom  the  Coast  Guard  protected,  safely  se-
cured,  and  escorted  to  sea  over  200  military  sealift  departures  at  ten  different 
major U.S. seaports, carrying over 25 million square feet of indispensable cargo.
• Deployed two additional patrol boats and two additional LEDETs to DoD’s Cen-
tral Command joining four Coast Guard patrol boats, two LEDETs, one Port Se-
curity  Unit  (PSU),  and  supporting  logistics  and  command  and  control  support 
elements already participating in Operation Iraqi Freedom.
• In  response  to  a  maritime  gap  in  national  law  enforcement  and  counter-ter-
rorism  (LE/CT)  capability,  they  stood  up  an  offensive  force  able  to  execute 
across the full spectrum of LE and CT response in support of homeland security 
and homeland defense objectives. This capability was a critical force addition in 
protecting the maritime boundaries of several National Special Security Events 
including  the  G8  Summit  and  Democratic  and  Republican  National  Conven-
tions.
• Leveraged the Coast Guard’s 34,000 member Coast Guard Auxiliary workforce, 
receiving  approximately  3  million  volunteer  hours  of  maritime  safety  and  secu-
rity services.

Before 9/11 we had no formal international or domestic maritime security regime 
for  ports,  port  facilities,  and  ships—with  the  exception  of  cruise  ships.  Partnering 
with  domestic  and  international  stakeholders,  we  now  have  both  a  comprehensive 
domestic  security  regime  and  an  international  security  convention  in  place.  Both 
have been in force since July 1, 2004. In executing the requirements of the Maritime 
Transportation Security Act (MTSA) and the International Ship and Port facility Se-
curity (ISPS) code, the Coast Guard has:

facility security plans.

• Reviewed and approved 9,580 domestic vessel security plans and 3,119 domestic 
• Overseen the development of 43 Area Maritime Security Plans and Committees,
• Verified security plan implementation on 8,100 foreign vessels.
• Completed  domestic  port  security  assessments  for  54  of  the  55  militarily  and 
economically strategic ports, with the last assessment in the final stages of com-
pletion.
• Visited  14  key  foreign  countries  to  assess  the  effectiveness  of  anti-terrorism 
measures  and  implementation  of  ISPS  code  requirements.  An  additional  21 
countries are scheduled for visits by June 2005.

Of  course  the  Coast  Guard  has  mission  requirements  beyond  homeland  security 
and once again thanks to the tremendous dedication of our personnel, last year pro-
vided  more  evidence  of  the  superb  contributions  they  make  each  and  every  day.  In 
2004, Coast Guard personnel:

ment regulations.

leases.

32,000 calls for rescue assistance.

• Saved the lives of nearly 5,500 mariners in distress and responded to more than 
• Conducted more than 115,800 recreational vessel safety checks.
• Conducted 10,000 foreign commercial vessel boardings.
• Boarded more than 4,500 fishing vessels to enforce safety and fisheries manage-
• Partnered  with  Federal  and  state  agencies  to  enhance  enforcement  of  Marine 
• Conducted more than 3,000 inspections aboard mobile offshore drilling units.
• Responded to nearly 24,000 reports of water pollution or hazardous material re-
• Ensured more than 1 million safe passages of commercial vessels.
• Maintained more than 50,000 federal aids to navigation, responding to and cor-
• Provided 99.0 percent availability of Differential Global Positioning System cov-

recting over 13,000 aids to navigation discrepancies.

Protected Species regulations.

erage to over 95,000 miles of U.S. waterways.

With  your  support,  the  Coast  Guard  continues  its  tradition  of  operational  excel-
lence and exceptional service to the nation. I am proud of the tireless efforts of our 
personnel who continue to meet every challenge both at home and abroad. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

9

Reducing Maritime Risk 

Despite these accomplishments, there is still much to do. Today’s global maritime 
safety  and  security  environment  demands  a  new  level  of  operations  specifically  di-
rected  against  terrorism  without  degrading  other  critical  maritime  safety  and  secu-
rity  missions.  Most  importantly,  the  Coast  Guard  must  implement  capabilities  nec-
essary to mitigate maritime security risks in the post-9/11 world. In terms of threat, 
vulnerability,  and  consequence  there  are  few  more  valuable  and  vulnerable  targets 
than the U.S. maritime transportation system.

Threat: While the 9/11 commission notes the continuing threat against our avia-
tion system, it also states that ‘‘opportunities to do harm are as great, or great-
er, in maritime or surface transportation.’’
Vulnerability:  The  maritime  transportation  system  annually  accommodates  6.5 
million  cruise  ship  passengers,  51,000  port  calls  by  over  7,500  foreign  ships,  at 
more  than  360  commercial  ports  spread  out  over  95,000  miles  of  coastline.  The 
vastness  of  this  system  and  its  widespread  and  diverse  critical  infrastructure 
leave  the  nation  vulnerable  to  terrorist  acts  within  our  ports,  waterways,  and 
coastal zones, as well as exploitation of maritime commerce as a means of trans-
porting terrorists and their weapons.
Consequence:  Contributing  nearly  $750  billion  to  U.S.  gross  domestic  product 
annually and handling 95 percent of all overseas trade each year—the value of 
the U.S. maritime domain and the consequence of any significant attack cannot 
be  understated.  Independent  analysis  and  recent  experiences  on  9/11  and  the 
west coast dock workers strike demonstrates an economic impact of a forced clo-
sure  of  U.S.  ports  for  a  period  of  only  eight  days  in  excess  of  $58  billion  to  the 
U.S. economy.

Since  9/11  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS)  and  the  Coast  Guard 
have  made  significant  strides  to  secure  our  homeland.  However,  maritime  safety 
and  security  gaps  remain.  These  gaps  present  risks  that  we  must  work  to  reduce, 
and we continue that work within the FY 2006 budget. 

The  Coast  Guard  continues  to  guide  its  efforts  by  implementing  policies,  seeking 
resources,  and  deploying  capabilities  through  the  lens  of  our  maritime  security 
strategy.  However,  continued  risk  reduction  is  contingent  upon  Coast  Guard  readi-
ness and capacity. Without these basic building blocks, implementation of maritime 
security strategies will not be sustainable. 

With  that  in  mind,  the  priorities  of  the  FY  2006  budget  are  to  recapitalize  the 
Coast Guard as a necessary foundation to implementing the maritime security strat-
egy, as well as ensuring we continually enhance mission performance across the en-
tire suite of Coast Guard mission requirements. 
Recapitalize the Coast Guard 

The FY 2006 budget continues the urgently needed recapitalization of our cutters, 
boats,  aircraft  and  support  infrastructure  to  reverse  declining  readiness  trends  and 
enhance  operational  capabilities  to  meet  today’s  maritime  safety  and  security 
threats. 

The  majority  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  operational  assets  will  reach  the  end  of  their 
anticipated  service  lives  by  2010,  resulting  in  rising  operating  and  maintenance 
costs, reduced mission effectiveness, unnecessary risks, and excessive wear and tear 
on  our  people.  Listed  below  are  some  specific  examples  highlighting  alarming  sys-
tem  failure  rates,  increased  maintenance  requirements,  and  the  subsequent  impact 
on mission effectiveness:

• HH–65  helicopter  in-flight  engine  power  losses  occurred  at  a  rate  of  329  mis-
haps  per  100,000  flight  hours  in  FY  2004.  This  is  up  from  a  FY  2003  rate  of 
63 mishaps per 100,000 flight hours. The comparable Federal Aviation Adminis-
tration acceptable standard for a mishap of this severity is approximately 1 per 
100,000 flight hours. The engine loss rate has resulted in flight and operational 
restrictions and high levels of risk to our aircrews. Re-engining the HH–65 will 
remain the Coast Guard’s highest legacy asset priority until complete.
• The 110-foot Patrol Boat fleet has experienced 23 hull breaches requiring emer-
gency  dry  docks.  The  resultant  loss  in  operational  days  is  unsustainable,  and 
risks  to  our  personnel  are  unacceptable.  By  the  end  of  2005,  the  Coast  Guard 
will  have  taken  delivery  of  eight  reconfigured  123-foot  patrol  boats,  which  are 
upgraded  110-foot  patrol  boats  designed  to  sustain  this  cutter  class  until  re-
placement with the Integrated Deepwater System’s Fast Response Cutter.
• Our  high  and  medium  endurance  cutters  are  experiencing  sub-system  failures 
due  to  old  and  unserviceable  systems.  The  378-foot  WHEC  fleet  averages  one 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

10

engine room casualty, with potential to escalate to a fire, on every patrol. One-
quarter of our fleet have recently missed operations due to unscheduled mainte-
nance  required  to  repair  failing  sub-systems.  The  total  number  of  unscheduled 
maintenance  days  for  the  major  cutter  (medium  and  high  endurance  cutters) 
fleet  has  skyrocketed  from  85  days  in  FY  1999  to  358  days  in  FY  2004  (over 
a  400  percent  increase).  This  loss  of  operational  cutter  days  in  2004  equates  to 
losing two major cutters, or 5 percent of our major fleet for an entire year. The 
2006  budget  includes  funding  for  six  mission  effectiveness  projects  to  help  sus-
tain the medium endurance cutter fleet, and funds construction of the third Na-
tional  Security  Cutter,  the  replacement  for  the  Coast  Guard’s  high  endurance 
cutter class.

These same Deepwater assets are integral to the Coast Guard’s ability to perform 
its missions, such as migrant and drug interdiction operations, ports waterways and 
coastal  security,  fisheries  enforcement,  and  search  and  rescue.  In  2004,  deepwater 
legacy assets made invaluable contributions to America’s maritime safety and secu-
rity:

• Operation  ABLE  SENTRY  blanketed  the  coastline  of  Haiti  with  Coast  Guard 
Deepwater  assets,  which  interdicted  over  1,000  illegal  migrants  during  this  op-
eration  and  deterred  many  thousand  more  from  taking  to  sea  in  unsafe  boats.
• The  378-foot  Coast  Guard  Cutter  GALLATIN,  and  its  Airborne  Use  of  Force 
(AUF)  capable  helicopter  seized  more  than  24,000  pounds  of  cocaine  worth  an 
estimated  $768  million  and  detained  27  suspected  smugglers  in  the  span  of 
seven weeks.
• The  Coast  Guard’s  Deepwater  cutters  and  aircraft  patrolled  over  28,000  hours 
in direct support of maritime homeland security missions. 110-foot patrol boats 
alone  patrolled  13,000  hours  supporting  port  and  coastal  security  missions  in-
cluding,  cruise  ship  escorts,  critical  infrastructure  protection,  and  countless  se-
curity boardings.
• Working  in  conjunction  with  the  U.S.  Secret  Service  during  the  national  polit-
ical  conventions,  270-foot  Medium  Endurance  cutters  and  110-foot  patrol  boats 
provided  maritime  security,  enforced  security  zones,  and  served  as  command 
and  control  platforms  coordinating  maritime  traffic.  Deepwater  aircraft, 
equipped  with  the  AUF  package,  provided  air  security  and  conducted  maritime 
security patrols.

Despite  spending  increasing  amounts  to  maintain  operational  assets,  the  Coast 
Guard  is  experiencing  a  continuing  decline  in  fleet  readiness.  Legacy  cutters  are 
now  operating  free  of  major  equipment  casualties  (equipment  failures  that  signifi-
cantly impact mission performance) less than 50 percent of the time, despite the in-
vestment  per  operational  day  increasing  by  over  50  percent  over  the  last  six  years. 
The  resulting  ‘‘readiness  gap’’  negatively  impacts  both  the  quantity  and  quality  of 
Coast  Guard  ‘‘presence’’—critical  to  our  ability  to  accomplish  all  missions.  The  FY 
2006 budget continues the urgently-needed Coast Guard fleet recapitalization to ad-
dress this readiness gap. 

The  Integrated  Deepwater  System  is  the  enduring  solution  to  both  the  Coast 
Guard’s  declining  legacy  asset  readiness  concerns  and  the  need  to  implement  en-
hanced  maritime  security  capabilities  to  reduce  maritime  risk  in  the  post–9/11 
world.  Continued  implementation  of  the  Deepwater  program  will  recapitalize  the 
Coast  Guard  fleet  and  introduce  much  needed  surveillance,  detection/clarification, 
intercept, interdiction and command and control capabilities. 

The  President’s  FY  2006  budget  provides  $966  million  for  the  Integrated  Deep-
water System, taking aim on reversing the Coast Guard’s declining readiness trends 
and  transforming  the  Coast  Guard  with  enhanced  capabilities  to  meet  current  and 
future  mandates  through  system-wide  recapitalization  and  modernization  of  Coast 
Guard cutters, aircraft, and associated sub-systems. 

This level of investment in the Integrated Deepwater System is paramount in pro-
viding  the  Coast  Guard  with  the  capability  and  capacity  essential  to  meeting  our 
nation’s maritime homeland security needs; providing a layered defense throughout 
ports,  waterways,  coastal  regions  and  extending  far  offshore,  as  well  as  sustaining 
other  mission  area  efforts,  such  as  search  and  rescue  and  living  marine  resources. 
Funding included for legacy asset sustainment projects, such as HH–65 re-engining, 
and  WMEC  mission  effectiveness  projects,  is  absolutely  critical  to  sustain  capabili-
ties today, while acquisition of new and enhanced Deepwater assets is vital to ensur-
ing the Coast Guard has the right capabilities tomorrow. 

The Coast Guard’s deepwater assets are not the only capital assets in urgent need 
of  recapitalization  or  replacement.  The  FY  2006  budget  also  includes  funding  for:

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

11

• Response  Boat-Medium—replaces  the  aging  41-foot  Utility  Boat  fleet  with  an 
enhanced platform better able to meet search and rescue and homeland security 
mission requirements.

• Shore Infrastructure Recapitalization—funds critical projects such as the Coast 
Guard  Academy  Chase  Hall  Barracks  rehabilitation,  Group/Marine  Safety  Of-
fice  Long  Island  Sound  building  replacement,  and  construction  of  a  breakwater 
to protect boats and mooring facilities at Coast Guard Station Neah Bay Break-
water. These projects will not only improve habitability and quality of life of our 
people,  but  also  increase  effectiveness  of  the  various  missions  these  facilities 
support.

• High  Frequency  (HF)  Communications  System  Recapitalization—replaces  un-
serviceable,  shore-side,  high  power  HF  transmitters,  restoring  long-range  com-
munications  system  availability  to  enhance  Coast  Guard  mission  performance 
and  help  meet  International  Safety  of  Life  at  Sea  (SOLAS)  treaty  HF  emer-
gency distress monitoring requirements.

• Rescue  21—continues  implementation  of  Rescue  21,  vastly  improving  coastal 
command  and  control  and  communications  interoperability  with  other  federal, 
state, and local agencies.

Recapitalizing  the  Coast  Guard  is  the  indispensable  foundation  of  our  ability  to 
continue  improving  maritime  security  while  facilitating  the  flow  of  commerce.  It  is 
on this foundation that the FY 2006 budget continues to build out Coast Guard ca-
pabilities  necessary  to  reduce  risk  and  implement  the  maritime  strategy  for  home-
land security. 
Implement the Maritime Strategy for Homeland Security 

Considering  the  vast  economic  utility  of  our  ports,  waterways,  and  coastal  ap-
proaches, it is clear that a terrorist incident against our marine transportation sys-
tem would have a disastrous impact on global shipping, international trade, and the 
world economy in addition to the strategic military value of many ports and water-
ways. 

The four pillars of the Coast Guard’s Maritime Strategy for Homeland Security are 
in  direct  alignment  with  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security’s  strategic  goals  of 
Awareness,  Prevention,  Protection,  Response  and  Recovery.  These  pillars  guide  our 
efforts  to  reduce  America’s  vulnerabilities  to  terrorism  by  enhancing  our  ability  to 
prevent  terrorist  attacks  and  limit  the  damage  to  our  nation’s  ports,  coastal  infra-
structure and population centers in the event a terrorist attack occurs. 

First,  we  seek  to  increase  our  awareness  and  knowledge  of  what  is  happening  in 
the  maritime  arena,  not  just  here  in  American  waters,  but  globally.  We  need  to 
know  which  vessels  are  in  operation,  the  names  of  the  crews  and  passengers,  and 
the  ship’s  cargo,  especially  those  inbound  for  U.S.  ports.  Global  Maritime  Domain 
Awareness  is  critical  to  separate  the  law-abiding  sailor  from  the  anomalous  threat. 
Second,  to  help  prevent  terrorist  attacks  we  have  developed  and  continue  to  im-
prove an effective maritime security regime—both domestically and internationally. 
Third,  we  seek  to  better  protect  critical  maritime  infrastructure  and  improve  our 
ability  to  respond  to  suspect  activities  by  increasing  our  operational  presence  in 
ports, coastal zones and beyond . . . to implement a layered security posture, a de-
fense-in-depth. 

Finally,  we  are  improving  our  ability  to  respond  to  and  aid  in  recovery  if  there 

were an actual terrorist attack. 

Below  is  an  overview  of  each  of  the  four  pillars  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  Maritime 

Strategy for Homeland Security and supporting FY 2006 budget initiatives:

Enhance Global Maritime Domain Awareness (MDA). The core of our MDA efforts 
revolve  around  the  development  and  employment  of  accurate  information,  intel-
ligence,  and  targeting  of  vessels,  cargo,  crews  and  passengers—and  extending  this 
well beyond our traditional maritime boundaries. All DHS components are working 
to  provide  a  layered  defense  through  collaborative  efforts  with  our  international 
partners  to  counter  and  manage  security  risks  long  before  they  reach  a  U.S.  port. 
The FY 2006 budget significantly advances our efforts to implement comprehensive 
MDA, including funding for:

• Automatic  Identification  System  (AIS)—accelerates  deployment  of  nationwide 

AIS throughout regional Coast Guard command centers.

• Maritime Patrol Aircraft (MPA)—provides additional MPA resources to fill doc-
umented  flight  hour  gaps  in  support  of  detection,  surveillance  and  tracking  ac-
tivities.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

12

• Common  Operational  Picture  (COP)—deploys  COP  throughout  Coast  Guard 
command  centers  to  fuse  surveillance  and  tracking  information  from  MDA  sys-
tems  such  as  AIS,  Rescue  21,  and  Ports  and  Waterways  Safety  System 
(PAWSS).
• Radiological-Nuclear  (Rad/Nuc)  Detection  and  Response—consistent  with  the 
President’s  Proliferation  Security  Initiative  (PSI),  this  initiative  increases  the 
ability  of  Coast  Guard  cutters  and  Maritime  Safety  and  Security  Teams  to  de-
tect  Rad/Nuc  materials  to  prevent  proliferation  in  support  of  terrorist  oper-
ations;  and  respond  to  incidents  involving  release  of  these  dangerous  sub-
stances.
• Integrated  Deepwater  System—Deepwater  funding  will  continue  C4ISR  en-
hancements  aboard  legacy  assets  and  development  of  the  Common  Operational 
Picture for new Deepwater platforms.

Create  and  Oversee  Maritime  Security  Regime.  This  element  of  our  strategy  fo-
cuses  on  both  domestic  and  international  efforts  and  includes  initiatives  related  to 
MTSA  implementation,  International  Maritime  Organization  regulations  such  as 
the  International  Ship  &  Port  Facility  Security  (ISPS)  Code,  as  well  as  improving 
supply chain security and identity security processes. As I mentioned previously, the 
Coast Guard has made a critical first step in ensuring the security of our ports and 
protecting  our  nation’s  economic  prosperity  by  implementing  the  requirements  set 
forth  in  the  MTSA  of  2002.  The  FY  2006  budget  provides  the  resources  necessary 
to continue robust enforcement of the MTSA, which includes:

• Continued verification of an estimated 3,100 domestic facility and 9,500 domes-
tic  vessel  security  requirements  (plans  must  be  revalidated  every  five  years, 
upon  a  change  of  ownership,  or  significant  change  in  operations),  including 
working with vessel, company, and facility security officers.
• A  robust  Port  State  Control  program  to  ensure  compliance  with  international 
security requirements of over 8,100 foreign vessels calling on the U.S. annually.
• Development and continuous updates and improvements to the National and 43 
• Assessment  of  the  anti-terrorism  measures  in  place  in  approximately  140  for-
eign  countries  with  which  the  U.S.  conducts  trade  to  ensure  compliance  with 
international standards.

Area Maritime Security plans.

Increase  Operational  Presence.  Our  collective  efforts  to  increase  operational  pres-
ence  in  ports  and  coastal  zones  focus  not  only  on  adding  more  people,  boats  and 
ships to force structures but making the employment of those resources more effec-
tive through the application of technology, information sharing and intelligence sup-
port. The FY 2006 budget focuses resources toward increasing both the quantity and 
quality of Coast Guard operational presence by providing funding for:

• Airborne Use of Force (AUF) capability—deploys organic AUF capability to five 
Coast Guard Air Stations, increasing the ability to respond to maritime security 
threats.
• Enhanced  Cutter  Boat  Capability—replaces  existing  obsolete  and  unstable  cut-
ter boats on the entire WHEC/WMEC fleet with the more capable Cutter Boat—
Over  the  Horizon  and  replaces  aging,  unsafe  boat  davit  systems  on  210-foot 
WMECs.
• Increase  Port  Presence  and  Liquefied  Natural  Gas  (LNG)  Transport  Security—
provides additional Response Boat-Smalls and associated crews to increase pres-
ence to patrol critical infrastructure patrols, enforce security zones, and perform 
high  interest  vessel  escorts  in  strategic  ports  throughout  the  nation.  Provides 
additional  boat  crews  and  screening  personnel  at  key  LNG  hubs  such  as  Cove 
Point,  MD  and  Providence,  RI  to  enhance  LNG  tanker  and  waterside  security.
• Enhanced  Maritime  Safety  and  Security  Team  (E–MSST)—Reallocates  existing 
Coast Guard resources to immediately fill an existing gap in national maritime 
Law Enforcement and Counter-Terrorism (LE/CT) capability. Permanent estab-
lishment  of  E–MSST  Chesapeake,  VA  will  provide  an  offensive  DHS  force  able 
to execute across the full spectrum of LE and CT response in support of home-
land security and homeland defense objectives, including CT response capability 
for scheduled security events out to 50 nautical miles from shore and augments 
to interagency assets in high visibility venues such as National Special Security 
Events (NSSEs).
• Integrated Deepwater System—Continued investment in Deepwater will greatly 
improve  the  Coast  Guard’s  maritime  presence  starting  at  America’s  ports,  wa-
terways, and coasts and extending seaward to wherever the Coast Guard needs 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

13

to  be  present  or  to  take  appropriate  maritime  action.  Deepwater  provides  the 
capability  to  identify,  interdict,  board,  and  where  warranted  seize  vessels  or 
people engaged in illegal or terrorist activity at sea or on the ports, waterways, 
or coast of America.

Improve  Response  and  Recovery  Posture.  Understanding  the  challenge  of  defend-
ing  26,000  miles  of  navigable  waterways  and  361  ports  against  every  conceivable 
threat  at  every  possible  time,  we  are  also  aggressively  working  to  improve  our  re-
sponse  capabilities  and  readiness.  While  many  of  the  increases  in  MDA  and  oper-
ational presence augment our collective response and recovery posture, the FY 2006 
budget  funds  initiatives  that  will  increase  our  ability  to  adequately  manage  oper-
ations  and  coordinate  resources  during  maritime  threat  response  or  recovery  oper-
ations:

• High  Frequency  (HF)  Communications  System  Recapitalization—replaces  un-
serviceable,  shore-side,  high  power  HF  transmitters  to  restore  long-range  com-
munications  system  availability  enhancing  the  Coast  Guard’s  ability  to  coordi-
nate response activities.
• Continued  Deployment  of  Rescue  21—the  Coast  Guard’s  maritime  911  com-
mand, control and communications system in our ports, waterways, and coastal 
areas. This system provides Federal, state and local first responders with inter-
operable  maritime  communications  capability,  greater  area  coverage,  enhanced 
system  reliability,  voice  recorder  replay  functionality,  and  direction  finding  ca-
pability.

Enhance Mission Performance 

Lastly,  we  must  continue  to  leverage  the  Coast  Guard’s  unique  blend  of  authori-
ties, capabilities, competencies and partnerships to enhance performance across the 
full suite of Coast Guard mission requirements. 

The Coast Guard is the Nation’s lead federal agency for maritime homeland secu-
rity  and  fulfills  a  crucial  role  within  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  as  the 
Nation’s maritime first responder. The FY 2006 budget includes resources necessary 
to  effectively  execute  all  of  our  missions  and  meet  associated  performance  goals. 
Every resource provided to the Coast Guard will contribute to a careful balance be-
tween our safety, security, mobility, protection of natural resources and national de-
fense missions, all of which must be adequately resourced to meet the Coast Guard’s 
performance  objectives.  The  FY  2006  budget  advances  several  initiatives  that  will 
yield increased performance across multiple Coast Guard missions:

• Great  Lakes  Icebreaker  (GLIB)—provides  funding  to  operate  and  maintain  the 
new  GLIB  scheduled  to  be  commissioned  in  FY  2006,  greatly  enhancing  the 
Coast  Guard’s  ability  to  conduct  essential  icebreaking  activities  and  maintain 
aids-to-navigation  to  facilitate  maritime  commerce  and  prevent  loss  of  life,  per-
sonal injury, and property damage on the navigable waters of the Great Lakes.
• Maritime  Law  Enforcement  School  Co-location—enhances  law  enforcement 
training  through  co-location  with  the  Federal  Law  Enforcement  Training  Cen-
ter,  increasing  Coast  Guard  law  enforcement  training  throughput  and  pro-
moting  better  coordination  among  field  activities  with  other  federal,  state,  and 
local agencies.
• Polar  Icebreaking  Funding  Transfer—shifts  base  funding  for  the  two  Polar 
Class  icebreakers  (USCGC  POLAR  SEA  and  USCGC  POLAR  STAR)  and  the 
USCGC  HEALY  to  the  National  Science  Foundation.  The  National  Science 
Foundation is the resident agency with responsibility for the U.S. Antarctic Pro-
gram  and  the  current  primary  beneficiary  of  polar  icebreaking  services.  Under 
this  arrangement,  the  National  Science  Foundation  will  reimburse  the  U.S. 
Coast Guard for maintenance and operation of the polar icebreaking fleet.

Conclusion 

I  appreciate  your  strong  support  over  the  past  several  years  in  providing  the 
Coast  Guard  with  the  tools  necessary  to  meet  our  multi-mission  and  military  de-
mands.  I  am  extremely  proud  of  our  Coast  Guard’s  accomplishments  since  9/11  as 
we strive to increase maritime homeland security while performing a myriad of crit-
ical maritime safety functions. 

We  continue  to  focus  on  improving  maritime  security  while  facilitating  safe  use 
of the maritime transportation system for its many commercial, environmental, and 
recreational  functions.  But,  much  work  remains  to  be  done  to  reduce  America’s 
vulnerabilities to terrorism and other maritime security threats. The FY 2006 budg-
et includes the resources required to continue the multi-year effort to modernize the 
Coast  Guard,  reduce  risks  to  maritime  safety  and  security,  and  deliver  capabilities 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

14

and competencies necessary to enhance mission performance. The requested funding 
will  positively  impact  our  ability  to  deliver  the  maritime  safety  and  security  Amer-
ica demands and deserves by focusing resources toward three critical priorities:

• Recapitalize the Coast Guard. 
• Implement the Maritime Strategy for Homeland Security. 
• Enhance Mission Performance.
Finally,  I  would  be  remiss  if  I  failed  to  acknowledge  the  outstanding  service  pro-
vided by the extremely dedicated Coast Guard workforce—a total team of uniformed 
active duty, Reserve, and Auxiliary personnel; dedicated civilian employees, and tal-
ented  contractors.  Looking  at  their  accomplishments,  it  is  clear  that  Coast  Guard 
men  and  women  continue  to  rise  to  the  challenge  and  deliver  tangible  and  impor-
tant results across both homeland security and non-homeland security mission pro-
grams.  Coast  Guard  men  and  women  are  unwavering  in  their  commitment  to  their 
Service  and  country.  Ensuring  these  same  people  are  properly  compensated  and 
given the opportunity to grow both personally and professionally is my single high-
est  priority.  With  Congressional  and  Administration  support,  we  have  done  much 
in  recent  years,  from  pay  raises,  improved  housing  allowances  to  better  medical 
care, to support our men and women. The FY 2006 budget builds upon those results 
and  provides  a  pay  raise  and  important  funding  for  Coast  Guard  housing  projects 
through the shore recapitalization request. 

Coast  Guard  members  volunteer  in  order  to  serve,  secure,  and  defend  this  great 
nation.  Our  personnel  are  faced  on  a  daily  basis  with  a  daunting  set  of  mission  re-
quirements  and  challenges.  We  owe  them  not  only  fair  compensation  and  benefits; 
we  owe  them  the  capabilities  and  tools  to  get  the  job  done.  The  FY06  budget  is 
about  placing  the  right  tools  in  the  capable  hands  of  our  personnel.  They  have 
shown time and again that they know just what to do with them. 

With the continued support of the Administration and Congress, and the tremen-
dous people of the Coast Guard, I know that we will succeed in delivering the robust 
maritime safety and security America expects and deserves in its’ Coast Guard well 
into the 21st Century. 

Thank your for the opportunity to testify before you today. I will be happy to an-

swer any questions you may have.

Senator SNOWE. Thank you, Admiral Collins. 
Master Chief Welch? 

STATEMENT OF MASTER CHIEF FRANKLIN A. WELCH, MASTER 

CHIEF PETTY OFFICER, U.S. COAST GUARD 

Chief  WELCH.  Good  morning,  Madam  Chair  and  distinguished 

Members of the Subcommittee. 

Thank  you  so  much  for  the  opportunity  to  present  my  views  in 
support  of  the  servicemembers  and  their  families  that  I  am  hon-
ored to represent. 

I  am  very  proud  of  the  national  contributions  made  of  our  work 
force.  And,  with  your  support,  we  have  benefited  greatly  from  the 
reductions  made  between  military  and  private-sector  pay  gaps  of 
years  past.  The  cumulative  positive  impact  of  military  pay  raises, 
coupled  with  significant  reductions  of  housing  expenses,  has  been 
both timely and well deserved. 

And  despite  increased  personnel  tempos  experienced  by  all  com-
ponents of our work force, our recruiting and retention results con-
tinue  to  remain  impressive.  In  Fiscal  Year  2004,  we  slightly  ex-
ceeded our active-duty recruiting mission, while making significant 
progress to further diversify our work force. Minority accessions to-
taled  36  percent  of  our  overall  recruiting  efforts,  representing  an 
11  percent  increase  from  Fiscal  Year  2003.  Our  reserve  accessions 
were equally successful. 

Retention  rates  also  remain  extremely  high.  The  current  reten-
tion  rate  within  the  enlisted  work  force  is  89.6  percent,  with  1.2 
percent  of  those  accessing  into  our  officer  corps.  While  there  are 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

15

many  factors  contributing  to  our  high  retention,  I  view  our  suc-
cesses  as  being  key  and  measurable  results  of  our  Commandant’s 
commitment to our people. 

We  have  invested  to  nationally  advertise  and  promote  the  roles 
and  missions  of  the  Coast  Guard,  and  we  have  made  great  strides 
in  providing  our  people  with  enhanced  professional  development 
opportunities.  Recent  accomplishments  include  the  establishment 
of a command master-chief course, the introduction of a formal en-
listed  professional  military  education  program,  increased  through-
put of our leadership and management school, the establishment of 
a comprehensive unit leadership development program, and contin-
ued aggressive support of tuition assistance funding. 

We  consider  these  human-capital  investments  key  to  the  contin-
ued  development  of  our  existing  work  force  and  essential  for  us  to 
remain attractive to those contemplating military service. 

We  also  remain  ever  mindful  of  the  quality-of-life  needs  of  our 
people. Housing remains a chief concern of our servicemembers and 
their families. While BAH reform has been successful in absorbing 
housing costs incurred by our people who reside in the private sec-
tor, we cannot claim total housing success until we can provide our 
people who reside in government-owned quarters with the same de-
sirable and well-maintained housing found on the economy. To that 
end, we have begun privatization in Hawaii, and have privatization 
feasability studies underway in Alaska and Cape May, New Jersey. 
Childcare  is  also  an  expensive  and  problematic  issue  for  our 
servicemembers  with  children.  High  childcare  costs  impact  our 
work force throughout all geographical areas, but particularly those 
assigned to locations inaccessible to Coast Guard or Department of 
Defense  childcare  facilities.  We  have  a  childcare  study  ongoing  to 
assess  the  needs  of  our  people  and  to  identify  areas  in  which  we 
may make appropriate interventions. 

Medical and dental-care concerns remain widespread. The major-
ity  of  our  concerns  are  due  to  the  fact  that  most  of  our  personnel 
are  assigned  well  beyond  the  bounds  of  military  treatment-facility 
catchment  areas,  thereby  forcing  our  members  to  seek  providers, 
which  are  becoming  increasingly  difficult  to  secure.  I  believe  that 
the  principal  contributing  factor  to  limited  provider  access  is  that 
of  provider  dissatisfaction  with  healthcare  reimbursement  rates. 
We  continue  to  work  with  the  Department  of  Defense  to  resolve 
these challenges, and we look forward to the implementation of the 
new  TRICARE  contract,  which  we  hope  will  rectify  some  of  the 
shortcomings experienced with TRICARE in the past. 

responsibility 

In  addition  to  quality-of-life  concerns,  we  also  remain  extremely 
committed  to  the  needs  of  our  people  in  the  workplace;  specifically 
and  most 
our 
servicemembers  with  safe,  reliable,  and  effective  cutters  and  air-
craft from which to operate. Our front-line fleet of cutters continues 
to  deteriorate,  resulting  in  significantly  degraded  readiness  capa-
bilities  and  equally  degraded  crew  morale.  Fleet  readiness  issues 
are  having  an  adverse  impact  on  our  presence  in  the  maritime  do-
main, affecting missions from domestic fisheries enforcement to the 
global  war  on  terrorism,  and  causing  our  men  and  women  to  work 
even  harder  to  overcome  the  deficiencies  associated  with  our  out-
dated  fleet.  In  fact,  if  it  weren’t  for  the  ingenuity,  the  profes-

to  provide 

critically, 

our 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

16

sionalism,  and  the  sacrifices  made  of  our  crews,  our  cutter  fleet 
would not be in service today. 

The long-predicted demise of our fleet can no longer be overcome 
at the expense of our people, and we are very grateful for your sup-
port  and  understanding  of  the  urgency  of  need  for  our  Deepwater 
Recapitalization Initiative. 

In conclusion, your support of our efforts to transform the United 
States  Coast  Guard  is  greatly  appreciated.  We  thank  you  for  your 
service,  and  I  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  speak  with  you 
today.  I  look  forward  to  answering  any  questions  that  you  may 
have. 

[The prepared statement of Chief Welch follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MASTER CHIEF FRANKLIN A. WELCH, MASTER CHIEF PETTY 

OFFICER, U.S. COAST GUARD 

Madam Chair and distinguished Members of this Subcommittee, I am once again 
very  thankful  for  the  opportunity  to  appear  before  you  to  present  my  views  in  sup-
port of the Coast Guard and the Coast Guard family that I am honored to represent. 
I am very proud of our service members and equally proud and thankful for the tre-
mendous  support  provided  by  this  Subcommittee  during  the  108th  Congress.  I  look 
forward  to  continuing  an  equally  supportive  relationship  with  you  and  the  109th 
Congress as well. 

I  am  also  grateful  for  House  support  of  S.  2486,  the  Veteran’s  Benefits  Improve-
ment  Act  of  2004,  S.  2484,  the  Veterans  Affairs  Health  Care  Personnel  Enhance-
ment  Act  of  2004,  and  H.R.  3936,  the  Veterans  Health  Programs  Improvement  Act 
of 2004. Legislative support of these acts formally recognizes the sacrifice and dedi-
cation  of  our  many  veterans  and  I  ask  for  your  continued  support  in  ensuring  that 
the  men  and  women  who  serve  or  have  served  our  country,  remain  well-served  by 
our country. 

The  Coast  Guard  has  accomplished  much  in  the  past  year  thanks  to  the  dedica-
tion and unwavering support of Coast Guard men and women stationed throughout 
this  country  and  assigned  globally.  I  travel  extensively  to  meet  with  our  service 
members,  to  share  information  with  them,  and  more  importantly  to  listen  to  their 
ideas and concerns. These personal interactions enable me to better represent their 
needs and interests. One of the things I hear loud and clear from our troops is how 
they have benefited greatly from the reductions made between the military and pri-
vate sector pay gaps. The cumulative positive impact of military pay raises coupled 
with significant reductions of out of pocket housing expenses has been well received 
and  is  certainly  well  deserved.  I  believe  they  are  a  big  reason  for  our  recent  work-
force retention trends being at record high levels. 

Despite  increased  operational  and  personnel  tempos  by  all  components  of  our 
service, our recruiting results continue to remain impressive. In FY 2004, we slight-
ly exceeded (by nine) our active duty-recruiting mission of 3,800 enlisted accessions. 
In  addition  to  meeting  our  numerical  goal  we  also  made  significant  progress  in  our 
efforts to further diversify our work force. FY 2004 minority accessions represented 
36 percent of the total. This represents an increase of 11 percent from FY 2003. We 
are enjoying similar success in our critical reserve component accessions. 

Retention rates also remain extremely high. The current retention rate of our en-
listed  work  force  is  89.6  percent,  with  1.2  percent  of  those  accessing  to  our  officer 
corps.  As  we  continue  work  force  expansion,  successful  recruiting  and  retention  ef-
forts are mitigating many of the challenges associated with targeted growth endeav-
ors.  Growth  has  produced  a  temporary  service  issue  that  many  people  refer  to  as 
‘‘juniority.’’  This  means  that  junior  personnel  are  often  filling  senior  positions,  re-
sulting in significant billet to pay grade mismatches. However, I prefer to define the 
situation as one of ‘‘opportunity’’ for the younger members of our Coast Guard, who 
continually  impress  me  with  their  can-do  attitudes  and  ability  to  accomplish  the 
mission. 

There  are  many  factors  driving  our  high  retention  rates  but  I  view  our  retention 
successes  as  being  the  key  measurable  result  of  our  Commandant’s  commitment  to 
our  people.  With  your  budgetary  support,  he  is  fulfilling  his  vision,  ‘‘The  Coast 
Guard committed to our people . . . and our people committed to the Coast Guard.’’ 
There  has  never  been  a  period  during  my  career  in  which  so  many  people-oriented 
initiatives have been realized, including: 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

17

Raising the Visibility of the Coast Guard 

We have wisely invested in a modern, relevant and attractive branding campaign 
to  nationally  advertise  and  promote  the  roles  and  missions  of  the  Coast  Guard,  as 
well  as  the  opportunities  afforded  the  men  and  women  of  our  service.  The  Shield 
of Freedom campaign is vitally important in attracting a diverse workforce that will 
lead the Coast Guard in accomplishing its vital Homeland Security missions. 
Providing Professional Development Opportunities 

The  Coast  Guard  is  making  every  effort  to  better  prepare  our  people  for  success. 
Recent  accomplishments  have  placed  a  permanent  senior  enlisted  cadre  within  the 
U.S.  Coast  Guard  Academy  Corps  of  Cadets  for  the  purpose  of  providing  enlisted 
perspective,  mentorship  and  experienced  practical  guidance  for  our  future  officer 
corps.  As  I  mentioned  during  last  year’s  hearing,  we  were  working  to  establish  a 
Command Master Chief course that would better prepare our senior enlisted leaders 
with  tools  to  blend  personnel  representation  and  command  advisory  roles.  We  pi-
loted that course last year and based on tremendously positive reviews we will con-
tinue with the course in FY 2005. The introduction of our much-anticipated Enlisted 
Professional Military Education Program has also been completed with equally posi-
tive feedback. We have also significantly increased student throughput for our Lead-
ership  and  Management  School;  a  course  designed  to  increase  the  effectiveness  of 
our  mid-grade  enlisted  work  force  and  our  junior  officers.  In  addition  to  expanding 
our  resident  training  opportunities,  our  Leadership  Development  Center  in  New 
London,  Connecticut,  has  designed  a  comprehensive  Unit  Leadership  Development 
Program  (ULDP)  that  is  mandatory  at  the  unit  level.  A  subset  to  the  ULDP  is  the 
first  term-first  unit  requirement  to  complete  an  Individual  Development  Plan  that 
was  designed  by  our  Command  Master  Chiefs  in  concert  with  our  training  branch 
at Coast Guard Headquarters. I am proud of collaborative efforts such as these, be-
cause they represent a renewed sense of alignment between those with oversight re-
sponsibilities and those charged with implementation. 
Providing Personal Development Opportunities. 

Recognizing  the  importance  of  continuing  education  for  our  people,  the  Coast 
Guard has continued its support of tuition assistance funding that defers the rising 
cost of education. In FY 2004, the Coast Guard authorized 22,212 courses at an ex-
pense of $12.2M. As of 7 January 2005, tuition assistance commitments already to-
taled  $5.1M.  We  consider  these  human  capital  investments  key  to  the  development 
of  our  current  work  force,  and  critical  to  remaining  an  employer  of  choice  for  those 
contemplating  Coast  Guard  service.  It  is  imperative  that  we  remain  competitive 
with our sister services of the Department of Defense, thereby underscoring the im-
portance of discretionary funding as provided for in the President’s FY 2006 budget. 
In addition to supporting our people who opt to pursue higher education, we remain 
committed  to  the  health  and  well  being  of  our  Coast  Guard  men  and  women.  To 
that end, we have mandated use of personal fitness plans for all of our service mem-
bers as part of the Coast Guard fitness program. 

These initiatives serve to enhance the important sense of self worth of our people 
and  I  am  proud  of  our  focus.  We  have  more  to  do,  but  these  tangible  work  force 
enhancements are highly visible to our people and are indicative of our commitment 
to  the  workforce.  Again,  I  appreciate  this  Subcommittee’s  support  that  has  enabled 
the  Coast  Guard  to  remain  attractive  as  a  service  that  values  our  most  important 
asset—our people. 

With  your  support,  the  Coast  Guard  continues  to  increase  its  authorized  end 
strengths.  In  the  post  9/11  environment  it  is  essential  that  the  principal  agency 
charged  with  maritime  safety  and  security  be  adequately  staffed  to  perform  its 
many  missions.  We  are  thankful  for  the  authority  to  increase  work  force  end 
strengths  and  we  are  doing  so  in  the  most  responsible  and  deliberate  manner.  In 
addition to ensuring that we are appropriately staffed to effectively meet our many 
responsibilities, we are also mindful of the many critical quality of life needs of our 
people. 

Military  pay  is  the  single-most  important  quality  of  life  and  compensatory  issue 
that  we  face.  Without  question,  the  military  pay  raises  of  the  past  four  years  have 
been  a  key  contributor  to  accession  and  retention  success.  We  seek  your  continued 
support  in  enabling  the  armed  services  to  remain  competitive  with  the  private  sec-
tor  in  order  for  us  to  attract  and  retain  the  skilled  and  motivated  work  force  that 
our country must rely upon. 

Housing remains a chief concern of our work force. As advertised, basic allowance 
for housing (BAH) reform has eliminated out of pocket expenses for housing in most 
areas  throughout  our  country  and  reduced  it  in  all  areas;  the  aggregate  impact  of 
BAH reform has been to reduce uncompensated housing expenses by approximately 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

18

20  percent.  This  effort  is  significant,  commendable  and  appreciated  by  our  service 
members  and  their  families  who  reside  in  areas  in  which  private  sector  housing  is 
desirable  and  attainable.  We  must  also  remain  mindful  of  the  needs  of  our  people 
who do not have access to this ideal housing situation. Throughout my personal en-
gagements with our workforce, I have witnessed first-hand the poor materiel condi-
tion  of  government  owned  housing  units  that  we  mandate  for  many  of  our  people. 
As this Subcommittee knows, the Coast Guard faces many challenges to address its 
shore  infrastructure  maintenance  and  recapitalization  programs,  and  has  deferred 
many  projects,  which  is  having  direct  and  negative  consequences  to  our  service 
members and their families. It also negatively impacts the ability of our single and 
unaccompanied  personnel  to  secure  adequate  housing  because  our  owned  unaccom-
panied  personnel  housing  (UPH)  is  often  in  the  same  inadequate  condition  as  our 
family housing. 

In  an  effort  to  enhance  quality  of  life  as  it  relates  to  deteriorating  shore  infra-
structure we have expanded our availability of leased housing options to our service 
members  who  are  E–4  and  below  assigned  ashore  with  less  than  four  years  time 
in  service.  We  are  also  pursuing  privatization  efforts,  including  the  transfer  of  318 
units located at Red Hill, Hawaii, to the U.S. Army. On October 1, 2004, the Army 
subsequently  transferred  maintenance  of  their  Hawaii  inventory  (over  7,000  units) 
to  Actus  Land  Leasing  with  full  financial  closing  and  property  transfer.  In  the 
greater  New  Orleans  area,  we  have  entered  into  a  limited  partnership  with  Patri-
cian C.G. LLC. As I have seen during visits to Department of Defense housing facili-
ties, military housing privatization, provides substantial benefits for limited up-front 
government investment. 

We  currently  have  privatization  feasibility  studies  underway  in  Alaska  and  Cape 
May,  New  Jersey.  These  studies  will  provide  us  with  an  assessment  of  the  ability 
to  privatize  housing  in  those  locations.  The  Alaska  study,  which  includes  Kodiak, 
Valdez, Cordova (our worst), Sitka, Petersburg and Homer, is scheduled for comple-
tion  by  next  spring.  The  Cape  May  study  will  follow  closely  behind  the  Alaska 
study. 

We have also deemed areas absent private sector and government owned housing 
as  Critical  Housing  Areas  (CHA’s).  This  designation  enables  our  people  to  receive 
BAH rates higher than the locales that they are assigned to so that they can afford 
housing in these high demand areas. Although this initiative may encourage family 
separation,  the  alternative  of  forced  financial  hardship  is  unacceptable.  The  Coast 
Guard  has  twelve  such  CHA  designated  locations.  They  are:  Eastern  Shore,  Vir-
ginia;  Buxton,  North  Carolina;  Montauk,  New  York;  Cape  May,  New  Jersey;  Abbe-
ville,  Louisiana;  Port  O’Connor,  Texas;  Coastal  Maine;  Carrabelle  and  Marathon/
Islamorada,  Florida;  Provincetown,  Massachusetts;  Oxford,  Maryland;  and 
Marinette, Wisconsin. Additionally, any area designated as a CHA by the U.S. Navy 
applies to the Coast Guard. 

Child  care  is  also  an  expensive  and  problematic  issue  for  our  service  members 
with dependent children. High child care costs impact our workforce throughout all 
geographical areas but particularly those assigned to locations inaccessible to Coast 
Guard  Child  Development  Centers  and/or  Department  of  Defense  facilities.  Due  to 
the  typically  remote  locations  in  which  we  serve,  it  is  difficult,  if  not  impossible  to 
maintain  parity  with  the  other  armed  services  in  respects  to  providing  our  people 
with  quality  and  affordable  child  care  options.  Recognizing  the  financial  burdens 
placed upon our people, we have recently chartered a child care study to assess the 
needs  of  our  work  force  and  to  identify  areas  in  which  we  may  make  appropriate 
interventions.  This  is  a  key  quality  of  life  issue  and  we  appreciate  your  under-
standing of the impact of the extremely high cost of child care nationwide. 

Medical  and  dental  care  issues  remain  chief  and  common  concerns  of  our  service 
members  and  their  families.  As  I  have  testified  in  the  past,  these  issues  affect  the 
Coast  Guard  in  unique  and  sometimes  difficult  ways.  The  Coast  Guard  continues 
to  work  with  the  Department  of  Defense  to  resolve  these  challenges,  and  we  are 
looking  forward  to  the  implementation  of  the  new  TRICARE  contract,  which  we 
hope will help rectify some of the shortcomings we have experienced with TRICARE 
in the past. 

In addition to quality of life concerns and initiatives, we also remain ever mindful 
of the needs of our people in the workplace; specifically our responsibility to provide 
our  service  members  with  safe,  reliable  and  effective  platforms  from  which  to  oper-
ate. As I have testified during the past two years, our front-line fleet of cutters con-
tinues  to  deteriorate;  resulting  in  significantly  degraded  readiness  capabilities  and 
equally  degraded  crew  morale.  It  is  important  to  note  that  during  FY  1999,  our 
Deepwater  fleet  experienced  267  unscheduled  maintenance  days.  In  FY  2004,  the 
fleet  had  742  unscheduled  maintenance  days.  This  increase  does  not  represent  a 
lack  of  crew  effort,  but  is  simply  indicative  of  old  cutters  and  old  subsystems—get-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

19

ting  even  older.  Fleet  readiness  issues  are  having  an  adverse  impact  on  our  pres-
ence  in  the  maritime  domain,  and  our  men  and  women  must  work  even  harder  to 
overcome  the  deficiencies  associated  with  our  fleet.  If  it  weren’t  for  the  ingenuity, 
professionalism  and  the  sacrifices  made  of  our  crews,  our  cutter  fleet  would  not  be 
in service today, and that applies to every class of cutter that we have. The demise 
of our fleet can no longer be overcome at the expense of our people, and as this Sub-
committee knows, our Deepwater recapitalization project is essential in order for us 
to meet the demands that face our service today. We are very grateful for your his-
torical  support  and  understanding  of  our  Deepwater  initiative  and  urge  your  sup-
port  of  the  President’s  $966M  FY  2006  Deepwater  request,  which  includes  funds 
both  for  new  vessels  and  for  legacy  medium-endurance  cutter  maintenance  to  help 
address the problem of our aging fleet. 

To  conclude,  let  me  again  offer  my  sincere  appreciation  to  this  Subcommittee  for 
affording me the opportunity to present my views before you. I trust that the Amer-
ican  public  is  rapidly  coming  to  know  the  broad  range  of  missions  that  the  Coast 
Guard  is  responsible  for,  as  well  as  the  global  context  in  which  we  are  involved.  I 
could  not  be  prouder  of  our  Coast  Guard  men  and  women  than  I  am  today.  Collec-
tively, our active duty, reservists, civilians, auxiliarists, and their families alike con-
tinue to make endless sacrifices to ensure that our service remains ‘‘Always Ready,’’ 
and  that  our  country  remains  always  safe!  Mr.  Chairman,  on  behalf  of  the  tens  of 
thousands  of  people  that  I  represent,  I  am  thankful  for  your  service  in  support  of 
our  nation’s  Coast  Guard  and  I  look  forward  to  your  continued  support  as  we  ag-
gressively  transform  our  service.  I  welcome  any  questions  that  you  or  this  Sub-
committee may have.

Senator  SNOWE.  Thank  you,  Master  Chief.  We  appreciate  it.  Ur-

gency is the operative word, you’re correct. 

Chief WELCH. Yes, ma’am. 
Senator SNOWE. Thank you. 
Ms. Wrightson? 

JUSTICE 

SECURITY  AND 

STATEMENT  OF  MARGARET  T.  WRIGHTSON,  DIRECTOR,
ISSUES,  U.S.

HOMELAND 
GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE 
Ms. WRIGHTSON. Thank you very much. 
I’m pleased to be here to discuss the President’s 2006 budget re-
quest  for  the  Coast  Guard.  My  testimony  focuses  on  GAO’s  work 
this  past  year  pertaining  to  three  areas  of  the  budget  the  Coast 
Guard deems its most important priorities, which the Commandant 
mentioned. 

In  summary,  I  would  say  the  following.  Carrying  out  the  Coast 
Guard’s  maritime  security  responsibilities  continues  to  be  a 
daunting  challenge,  one  that  cannot  be  ignored  or  shortchanged. 
Although  the  Coast  Guard  has  worked  hard  to  get  MTSA  off  the 
ground  and  build  its  security  presence  and  domain  awareness, 
doing so has significantly impacted operations and strained mission 
capacity  and  capability.  The  Coast  Guard  is  pursuing  many  initia-
tives  that  it  believes  will  be  force  multipliers  in  these  regards. 
However, by doing so much so fast, the Coast Guard has sometimes 
put dollars and programs at risk through less-than-effective design, 
management, and oversight. 

Turning  to  the  most  important  details.  If  the  Coast  Guard’s 
budget  request  is  granted,  agency  discretionary  funding  will  have 
increased  each  year  since  2002,  for  a  total  increase  of  45  percent. 
The Coast Guard will now account for 20 percent of DHS’s budget. 
By  comparison,  the  Coast  Guard’s  performance  measures  over 
this past period have been more mixed. For the eight mission areas 
where  results  are  currently  available,  the  Coast  Guard  met  half. 
Some  misses  represent  small  differences,  which  I  would  be  happy 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

20

to talk about, but others are potentially more significant. In think-
ing  about  these  year-to-year  fluctuations,  it  is  worth  noting,  as  I 
did  last  year,  the  difficulties  in  directly  linking  resource  allocation 
decisions  and  performance  results.  For  example,  to  explain  per-
formance results for foreign fish, the Coast Guard points to oceanic 
and climatic shifts that alter fish migration patterns and draw for-
eign  vessels  into  U.S.  waters.  At  the  same  time,  I  know  the  Com-
mandant  agrees  that  there  is  no  doubt  that  a  proactive  presence 
is essential. 

Rising budgets and fluctuating performance measures underscore 
how important it is for the Coast Guard to continue to improve its 
measures  so  they  are  as  robust  as  possible.  Also,  the  better  the 
Coast  Guard  understands  the  relationship  between  resources  it 
gets and the results it achieves, the more efficient and effective its 
decision-making will be. 

Regarding  the  Coast  Guard’s  efforts  to  implement  an  effective 
maritime  security  regime,  since  MTSA  was  enacted  the  Coast 
Guard  has  taken  determined  action  to  establish  a  meaningful  re-
gime,  including  reviewing  and  approving  thousands  of  vessel  and 
facility security plans, increasing its security presence at ports, and 
enhancing  intelligence  capabilities,  to  name  just  some.  However, 
this past year we raised concerns in a number of areas. For exam-
ple, whether the Coast Guard would be able to devote sufficient re-
sources  to  its  port  security  inspection  program,  and  whether  in-
spectors would be qualified, adequately trained, and provided prop-
er guidance. 

Among other things, we urged the Coast Guard to conduct a for-
mal evaluation after the first round of compliance inspections, and 
consider  unannounced  inspections  and  covert  testing  as  part  of  its 
program.  In  response  to  this  and  other  suggestions  we  made,  the 
Coast Guard has a number of improvements ongoing. 

A  second  Coast  Guard  priority  in  the  2006  budget  is  to  enhance 
mission  performance.  Three  broad  initiatives  that  deserve  par-
ticular  mention  here  are  the  new  coastal  communications  system, 
called  Rescue  21,  a  new  field  command  structure,  called  sectors, 
and efforts to improve readiness of multi-mission boat stations, for-
merly  known  as  small  boat  stations.  All  three  carry  risk.  I  will 
mention only the second. 

While  there  is  no  doubt  that  sectors  would  improve  performance 
and  efficiency  at  the  Coast  Guard,  flexibility  and  attention  to  de-
tails will also be important. For example, I was in San Diego a cou-
ple  of  weeks  ago,  and  it  appears  quite  clear  that  that  pilot  is  suc-
cessful.  But  in  San  Diego—but  the  fact  is  that  San  Diego’s  key 
units  were  already  co-located,  and  there  was  a  strong  history  of 
communication  and  partnership  there.  In  other  cases,  commands 
are  physically  separated,  and  there  is  stovepipe  culture  between 
operations and marine-safety offices. Thus, a relatively easy transi-
tion  in  one  case  may  not  translate  into  a  smooth  transition  in  all. 
The  third  priority  is  recapitalizing  the  Coast  Guard,  but  I  will 
focus  on  just  Deepwater.  The  Coast  Guard  is  requesting  nearly  a 
billion  dollars  for  this  program  this  year.  Last  year,  we  reported 
that,  well  into  the  second  year,  key  components  needed  to  manage 
the program and oversee the contractor had not yet been effectively 
implemented.  The  Coast  Guard  also  had  not  updated  its  master 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

21

schedule,  and  costs  were  rising  above  original  estimates.  More  re-
cently,  we  have  seen  schedule  slippages,  such  as  for  the  national-
security  cutter,  and  emergency  accelerations,  such  as  for  the  HH–
65.  Unobligated  balances  are  also  growing.  Finally,  we  have  also 
seen  at  least  one  instance  of  a  serious  performance  problem,  at 
least  initially;  this  being  the  hull  breaches  on  the  first  converted 
123-foot patrol boats. 

We  have  made  numerous  recommendations  to  improve  the  pro-
gram’s  management  and  oversight,  and  the  Coast  Guard  has 
agreed  with  every  one.  In  most  cases,  however,  while  actions  are 
underway to address our concerns, management issues remain that 
will take some time to resolve. 

Additionally,  there  is  uncertainty  around  the  recently  revised 
mission-needs statement, which will almost certainly increase costs 
and require further schedule adjustments once the implementation 
plan is approved. 

Finally,  any  look  at  the  Coast  Guard’s  budget  would  be  incom-
plete  without  a  discussion  of  its  legacy  assets.  As  of  Fiscal  Year 
2005, the Coast Guard had requested 856 million in total, and this 
number  could  rise  significantly.  While  we  are  not  questioning  the 
agency’s  decisions  about  which  projects  should  receive  priority,  we 
believe  it  is  important  for  the  Coast  Guard  to  make  Congress 
aware, very aware, of the magnitude of the potential funding needs 
and to provide greater transparency. This summer, we will issue a 
report to you, Madam Chairman, on this subject. 

In conclusion, the Coast Guard’s 2006 budget request reflects the 
continuing  importance  the  Administration  attaches  to  the  Coast 
Guard’s missions, especially those related to the homeland security. 
Our recent work indicates that such funding increases may be war-
ranted,  given  the  condition  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  aging  assets  and 
the  fact  that  the  systems  needed  to  improve  maritime  domain 
awareness and security were either inadequate or nonexistent prior 
to  September  11th.  Nevertheless,  as  GAO’s  work  this  past  year 
bears  out,  dramatic  infusions  of  money  bring  added  risk  that  too 
much will be attempted too fast. 

We  look  forward  to  continuing  with  your  Subcommittee  to  miti-
gate these risks through productive oversight and engagement with 
the Coast Guard. 

Thank you very much. 
[The prepared statement of Ms. Wrightson follows:]

PREPARED STATEMENT OF MARGARET T. WRIGHTSON, DIRECTOR, HOMELAND 
SECURITY AND JUSTICE ISSUES, U.S. GOVERNMENT ACCOUNTABILITY OFFICE 

Madame Chair and Members of the Subcommittee: 
I  am  pleased  to  be  here  today  to  discuss  the  President’s  Fiscal  Year  2006  budget 
request  for  the  Coast  Guard,  focusing  on  three  priority  areas  the  Coast  Guard  be-
lieves are critical to improving performance and reducing vulnerabilities within the 
U.S.  maritime  domain.  As  you  know,  the  Coast  Guard  continues  to  face  extraor-
dinary,  heightened  responsibilities  to  protect  America’s  ports,  waterways,  and  wa-
terside  facilities  from  terrorist  attacks,  while  also  maintaining  responsibility  for 
many  other  programs  important  to  the  nation’s  interests,  such  as  helping  stem  the 
flow  of  illegal  drugs  and  illegal  immigration,  protecting  important  fishing  grounds, 
and responding to marine pollution. At the same time, the Coast Guard is adjusting 
to its new home in the Department of Homeland Security (DHS) and attempting to 
manage the largest acquisition in its history, replacing or upgrading virtually all of 
its  deepwater  assets  (ships  and  aircraft  capable  of  operating  further  out  to  sea).  It 
is an understatement to say that the Coast Guard has a lot going on. In recognition 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

22

of  this,  the  Coast  Guard  has  received  substantial  budget  increases  since  the  ter-
rorist attacks on September 11, 2001. 

My  testimony  today  provides  a  brief  overview  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  budget  and 
performance information, and then discusses key Coast Guard programs and activi-
ties  within  the  context  of  a  three-part  framework  that  the  Coast  Guard  outlines  in 
its  Fiscal  Year  2006  budget  documents.  The  Coast  Guard  believes  that  funding 
three  priority  areas—implementing  the  maritime  strategy  for  homeland  security, 
enhancing  mission  performance,  and  recapitalizing  the  Coast  Guard—are  essential 
to  best  position  the  agency  to  implement  the  President’s  strategies  and  reduce 
vulnerabilities  in  the  U.S.  maritime  domain.  My  testimony  is  based  on  a  number 
of  reviews  we  have  conducted  in  recent  years  on  several  Coast  Guard  programs. 
(See  app.  II  for  a  listing  of  recent  reports.)  Our  work  for  this  testimony  has  been 
conducted from February 2005 to March 2005 in accordance with generally accepted 
government auditing standards. (See app. I for additional information regarding our 
scope and methodology.) 

In summary, the 2006 request reflects the continuing importance the administra-
tion  attaches  to  the  Coast  Guard’s  missions—especially  those  that  relate  to  home-
land  security.  Our  recent  work  indicates  that  funding  increases  may  be  warranted, 
given the condition of the Coast Guard’s aging assets and the fact that the systems 
and processes the agency needs to improve maritime domain awareness and security 
were  either  inadequate  or  nonexistent  prior  to  the  terrorist  attacks.  Nevertheless, 
as our work also has shown, dramatic infusions of money do not guarantee success, 
but  bring  added  responsibility  to  ensure  that  these  large  investments  of  taxpayer 
dollars  are  wisely  spent.  The  risk  that  an  agency  may  simply  attempt  to  do  too 
much  and  do  it  too  quickly  is  increased  when  an  agency  faces  as  many  significant 
new  heightened  responsibilities  as  the  Coast  Guard.  We  have  not  evaluated  the 
Coast  Guard’s  priorities  or  whether  the  funding  levels  proposed  are  those  needed 
to  accomplish  these  priorities.  However,  our  work  does  show  that  in  key  areas  the 
Coast Guard has not always paid as much attention to program design and manage-
ment as it should. These design and management issues can often have implications 
for how effectively money is spent. My testimony focuses on findings from our recent 
work  as  they  relate  to  each  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  three  priority  areas,  the  rec-
ommendations we made, the progress that the Coast Guard has made in addressing 
them,  and  the  issues  that  remain.  First,  I  would  like  to  put  the  Fiscal  Year  2006 
budget  request  in  a  historical  context  and  also  provide  some  perspective  on  the 
Coast Guard’s reported performance results. 
Funding  Has  Escalated  in  Recent  Years,  but  Is  Difficult  to  Link  to

Performance Results 

The  Coast  Guard’s  2006  budget  request  continues  a  trend  of  increasing  budgets 

that began in Fiscal Year 2002, as figure 1 shows.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

23

If the Coast Guard’s full budget request is granted, its funding will have increased 
by 45 percent in nominal terms in this 5-year period. A major portion of this growth 
will  have  occurred  in  the  acquisition,  construction,  and  improvements  account, 
which grew 81 percent in nominal dollars between the Fiscal Year 2002 actual funds 
and  the  Fiscal  Year  2006  requested  funds—a  $568  million  increase.  Much  of  this 
increase can be attributed to two major acquisition projects—Deepwater and Rescue 
21.  Deepwater  is  the  Coast  Guard’s  largest-ever  acquisition  program.  It  replaces  or 
modernizes  cutters,  aircraft,  and  communications  equipment  for  missions  that  re-
quire  mobility,  extended  presence  on  scene,  and  the  capability  of  being  deployed 
overseas.  Rescue  21,  the  Coast  Guard’s  second  largest  procurement  in  Fiscal  Year 
2006, will replace the Coast Guard’s current antiquated coastal communication sys-
tem. 

The  Fiscal  Year  2006  budget  request  shows  a  $570  million  increase  to  $8.1  bil-
lion, 1 which is an increase of about 11 percent in its discretionary funding over the 
enacted  budget  for  Fiscal  Year  2005. 2 The  majority  of  the  total  is  for  operating  ex-
penditures: $5.5 billion. Capital acquisition accounts for another approximately $1.3 
billion, and the remainder is primarily for retired pay. (See app. III for more detail 
on  the  Coast  Guard’s  Fiscal  Year  2006  budget  accounts.)  Much  of  the  additional 
$570  million  over  and  above  the  2005  budget  covers  such  things  as  mandatory  pay 

1 The  $8.1  billion  request  for  the  Coast  Guard  represents  20  percent  of  the  Department  of 

Homeland Security’s budget request for Fiscal Year 2006. 

2 This  calculation  is  based  on  the  Coast  Guard’s  discretionary  funding  and,  for  comparison 
purposes,  removes  the  Fiscal  Year  2005  hurricane  supplemental  ($33  million)  and  adds  in  the 
anticipated Fiscal Year 2006 reimbursements for polar icebreaking ($47.5 million) and research, 
development, test and evaluation ($24 million). 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

s
p
e
.
1
o
a
g
7
1
3

24

increases  for  current  employees  and  operating  expenses  for  existing  programs—
many  of  which  relate  to  homeland  security  functions.  In  addition,  more  than  $50 
million  of  the  increase  would  fund  new  or  enhanced  initiatives,  all  of  which  relate 
to  homeland  security.  For  example,  a  portion  of  this  funding  would  be  dedicated  to 
increasing  maritime  patrol  aircraft  operations,  increasing  the  Coast  Guard’s  pres-
ence  in  ports,  and  providing  enhanced  security  for  liquefied  natural  gas  transports. 
Of the nearly $1.3 billion requested for capital projects, $966 million, or 76 percent, 
would be dedicated to the Deepwater acquisition, while $101 million would be dedi-
cated to Rescue 21. 

By comparison with the pattern of budget increases, performance results—indica-
tors  that  track  a  program’s  progress  from  year  to  year—have  been  more  mixed  in 
terms  of  the  number  of  performance  targets  met  each  year. 3 (See  app.  IV  for  a  de-
tailed  discussion  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  performance  measures  and  results.)  The 
Coast Guard has a key performance target—the goal it aims to achieve each year—
for 10 of its 11 programs. 4 For search and rescue, for example, its target is to save 
the lives of at least 85 percent of mariners in distress. For the 8 programs with per-
formance  results  through  Fiscal  Year  2004, 5 the  Coast  Guard  met  or  exceeded  its 
targets in 4—a decline from the 2003 results, when the Coast Guard met 6 of these 
targets  (see  fig.  2).  Such  changes  can  involve  relatively  small  shifts  in  results.  For 
example,  in  Fiscal  Year  2004,  96.3  percent  of  domestic  fishermen  were  found  to  be 
in compliance with regulations, compared with 97.1 percent the year before—but the 
percentage for Fiscal Year 2004 was below the Coast Guard’s target of 97.0 percent, 
while the percentage for Fiscal Year 2003 was above it. 

3 Pursuant to the Government Performance and Results Act of 1993 (Pub. L. 103–62, 107 Stat. 
285 (1993)), performance indicators are to be used to assess relevant outputs, service levels, and 
outcomes  of  each  program  activity.  Performance  targets  or  goals  are  defined  as  a  set  of  annual 
goals that establish the agency’s intended performance, stating a particular level of performance 
in either an absolute value or as a targeted level of improvement. 

4 For homeland security (called ports, waterways, and coastal security), performance measures 

are still under development. 

5 According  to  the  Coast  Guard,  performance  results  for  Fiscal  Year  2004  are  not  available 
for  two  programs.  They  are:  (1)  marine  safety—Fiscal  Year  2004  performance  results  will  not 
be  available  until  spring  2005,  when  the  recreational  boating  data  is  reported;  and  (2)  illegal 
drug interdiction—Fiscal Year 2004 results will be calculated and released once illegal drug flow 
information for Fiscal Year 2004 is known—sometime in the spring of 2005.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

25

As we have reported in the past, it is difficult to link spending and resource allo-
cations  to  performance  and  results,  because  many  other  factors  also  are  at  work. 6 
For  example,  one  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  measures—the  number  of  incursions  into 
U.S.  fishing  grounds  by  foreign  fishing  vessels—is  affected  by  oceanic  and  climatic 
shifts  that  can  cause  fluctuations  in  the  migrating  patterns  of  fish.  The  number  of 
foreign vessels drawn to U.S. waters could be affected by these fluctuations. In addi-
tion,  the  Coast  Guard  is  still  developing  its  performance  measures  and  targets  for 
its  primary  homeland  security  program,  so  this  major  reason  for  funding  increases 
is  not  yet  reflected  in  the  results.  These  complicating  factors  suggest  caution  in  at-
tempting  to  read  too  much  into  the  Fiscal  Year  2004  drop.  Nevertheless,  attention 
to  these  trends  over  the  long  term  is  important,  as  a  way  to  help  ensure  that  tax-
payer dollars are spent wisely. 
Efforts  Made  on  Coast  Guard’s  Maritime  Security  Strategy  Show  Promise, 

but Concerns Remain 

One  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  Fiscal  Year  2006  priorities  involves  implementing  a 
maritime  strategy  for  homeland  security.  Major  portions  of  this  endeavor  are  heav-
ily  influenced  by  the  requirements  of  the  Maritime  Transportation  Security  Act 
(MTSA)  of  2002. 7 We  have  reviewed  the  Coast  Guard’s  response  to  a  number  of 
these  requirements,  and  our  findings  have  implications  for  several  aspects  of  the 
budget request. 

MTSA seeks to establish a comprehensive security regime for the nation’s ports—
including  planning,  personnel  security,  and  careful  monitoring  of  vessels  and 
cargo—and  charges  the  Coast  Guard  with  lead  responsibility  for  implementing  this 
regime.  Since  MTSA  was  enacted,  the  Coast  Guard  has  worked  to  address 
vulnerabilities  by  spurring  the  development  of  meaningful  security  plans  for  thou-
sands  of  facilities  and  vessels  in  the  nation’s  ports.  The  Coast  Guard  has  taken 

6 GAO,  Coast  Guard:  Key  Management  and  Budget  Challenges  for  Fiscal  Year  2005  and  Be-
yond,  GAO–04–636T  (Washington,  DC:  April  7,  2004);  and  Coast  Guard:  Relationship  between 
Resources  Used  and  Results  Achieved  Needs  to  Be  Clearer,  GAO–04–432  (Washington,  DC: 
March 22, 2004). 

7 Pub. L. 107–295, 116 Stat. 2064, (2002). 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

s
p
e
.
2
o
a
g
7
1
3

26

many  other  actions  as  well,  including  establishing  area  maritime  security  commit-
tees to improve information sharing, increasing port presence through increased se-
curity  patrols,  enhancing  intelligence  capabilities  by  establishing  field  intelligence 
teams  in  ports,  and  beginning  to  implement  an  electronic  identification  system  for 
vessels in the nation’s ports. As we have reported, the Coast Guard deserves credit 
for taking fast action on so many MTSA security provisions at once, especially with 
regard  to  MTSA’s  aggressive  requirement  that  regulated  facilities  and  vessels  have 
security plans in place by July 2004. 8 However, the combination of so many reforms 
and  an  aggressive  schedule  posed  a  daunting  challenge,  and  our  review  of  Coast 
Guard  efforts  to  meet  these  requirements  showed  some  areas  for  improvement 
where  we  have  made  recommendations—most  notably  the  following  three  from  re-
ports issued in 2004. 

• Automatic  Identification  System  (AIS)  has  potential  for  cost  savings.  National 
development of this system, which identifies vessels traveling to or through U.S. 
waters, is an important step in the overall effort to increase port safety and se-
curity.  The  Coast  Guard  faced  several  key  decisions  to  determine  AIS’s  tech-
nical requirements, waterway coverage, and vessels to be equipped with identi-
fication  equipment.  Estimates  to  establish  such  a  system,  however,  were  well 
above  funding  levels.  We  thought  the  goals  of  the  system  might  be  achieved 
more  quickly  and  the  costs  to  the  Federal  Government  reduced  by  pursuing 
cost-sharing options. Consequently, we recommended that the Coast Guard seek 
and  take  advantage  of  partnerships  with  organizations  willing  to  develop  AIS 
systems at their own expense.
• Port  security  assessments  could  be  more  useful.  The  port  security  assessment 
program is intended to assess port vulnerabilities and security measures in the 
nation’s 55 most economically and militarily strategic ports. Our review showed 
that  while  some  improvements  were  made,  the  Coast  Guard  risked  producing 
a  system  that  was  not  as  useful  as  it  could  have  been  because  its  approach 
lacked  a  defined  management  strategy,  specific  cost  estimates,  and  a  clear  im-
plementation  schedule.  A  major  factor  of  the  program—a  computer-based  geo-
graphic  information  system  that  would  provide  information  to  personnel  in 
charge of port security—was developed in such a way that gaps in port security 
postures  could  be  overlooked.  We  recommended  that  the  Coast  Guard  define 
and  document  the  functional  requirements  for  this  computer  system  and  de-
velop  a  long-term  project  plan  for  the  system  and  for  the  port  security  assess-
ment program as a whole.
• The Coast Guard’s strategy for conducting oversight and compliance inspections 
of  facilities  and  vessels  could  be  improved.  Because  the  program  was  new,  we 
recommended  that  the  Coast  Guard  undertake  a  formal  evaluation  after  the 
first round of inspections and use the results to improve the program. The eval-
uation was to include the adequacy of security inspection staffing, training, and 
guidance.  To  improve  the  program  strategy,  we  also  recommended  that  the 
Coast  Guard  clearly  define  the  minimum  qualifications  for  inspectors  and  link 
these  qualifications  to  a  certification  process,  as  well  as  consider  unscheduled 
and  unannounced  inspections,  and  covert  testing  as  a  way  to  ensure  that  the 
security environment at the nation’s seaports met the nation’s expectations.

The  Coast  Guard  agreed  with  many  of  our  recommendations  and  has  made 
progress in implementing some of them, but the remaining issues have implications 
for  the  availability  of  funds  or  the  effectiveness  with  which  available  funds  are 
spent.

• AIS.  Coast  Guard  officials  have  taken  a  number  of  steps  to  encourage  stake-
holder  participation,  although  they  have  not  formally  sought  AIS  partners  to 
date.  For  example,  the  Coast  Guard  has  a  contract  with  PETROCOMM  (a  pro-
vider  of  communications  services  in  the  Gulf  of  Mexico)  to  provide  locations, 
maintenance,  and  data  services  for  several  AIS  base  stations  on  offshore  plat-
forms  in  the  Gulf  of  Mexico. 9 The  Coast  Guard  believes  that  it  is  too  early  to 

8 GAO, Maritime Security: Partnering Could Reduce Federal Costs and Facilitate Implementa-
tion  of  Automatic  Vessel  Identification  System,  GAO–04–868  (Washington,  DC:  July  23,  2004); 
Maritime Security: Better Planning Needed to Help Ensure an Effective Port Security Assessment 
Program,  GAO–04–1062  (Washington,  DC:  September  30,  2004);  and  Maritime  Security:  Sub-
stantial  Work  Remains  to  Translate  New  Planning  Requirements  into  Effective  Port  Security, 
GAO–04–838 (Washington, DC: June 30, 2004).

9 The other instances are (1) The Coast Guard has a contract with the Port Graham Develop-
ment Corporation (an Alaskan Native corporation) in partnership with the Marine Exchange of 
Alaska to deploy and manage a network of AIS receivers at 11 locations in Alaska; (2) the Volpe 
Transportation Systems Center approached the Coast Guard to offer its assistance in facilitating 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

27

consider  partnerships  beyond  these  initial  efforts,  because  the  Coast  Guard  is 
still  developing  operational  requirements  for  AIS  systems  and  vetting  these  re-
quirements  with  stakeholders  and  Coast  Guard  field  units.  However,  Coast 
Guard officials also reported that in their discussions with private parties, these 
parties have shown little interest in shouldering any of the financial burden as-
sociated with achieving AIS capability. The Coast Guard estimates that the in-
stallation  of  AIS  nationwide  could  cost  nearly  $200  million.  The  Fiscal  Year 
2006  budget  requests  $29.1  million  for  this  project,  in  addition  to  the  $48  mil-
lion  previously  enacted  ($24  million  per  year  in  Fiscal  Years  2004  and  2005)—
leaving a substantial sum to be financed. 

Port  security  assessments.  Coast  Guard  officials  said  they  are  working  with  the 
Department  of  Homeland  Security  to  determine  the  focus  and  scope  of  the  Fiscal 
Year  2006  port  assessments  and  are  taking  into  consideration  the  progress  being 
made  by  ports  to  identify  shortcomings  and  improve  security.  However,  the  Coast 
Guard  continues  to  move  forward  with  the  overall  program,  as  well  as  the  geo-
graphic  information  system,  without  a  plan  that  clearly  indicates  how  the  program 
and  its  information  component  will  be  managed,  what  they  are  expected  to  cost,  or 
when  the  various  work  steps  should  be  completed.  The  lack  of  a  plan,  in  our  view, 
increases  the  risk  that  the  program  will  be  unsuccessful.  In  response  to  our  rec-
ommendation,  the  Coast  Guard  has  indicated  that  it  will  develop  a  long-term  plan 
for the port security assessment program but they did not indicate when this effort 
will begin or when they expect a plan to be completed.

• Strategy for ensuring facility and vessel compliance. The Coast Guard has taken 
a  number  of  actions  but  has  not  focused  its  resources  on  doing  unscheduled  or 
unannounced spot checks to verify whether domestic vessels are complying with 
requirements. 10 We  continue  to  believe  that  without  unscheduled  inspections, 
vessel  owners  and  operators  can  mask  security  problems  by  preparing  for  the 
annually  announced  inspections  in  ways  that  do  not  represent  the  normal 
course  of  business.  Unannounced  inspections  are  a  way  of  ensuring  that  plan-
ning requirements translate into security-conscious behavior. 

Three Efforts to Enhance Mission Performance Bear Watching 

A  second  Coast  Guard  priority  is  to  enhance  mission  performance.  Many  Coast 
Guard  personnel  and  assets  are  involved  in  performing  multiple  missions.  For  ex-
ample,  Coast  Guard  cutters  and  crews  may  be  involved  with  fisheries  patrols,  dis-
tress  calls,  oil  spills,  stopping  and  boarding  vessels  of  interest,  and  many  other 
tasks. In Fiscal Years 2005 and 2006, the Coast Guard plans to continue developing 
several  initiatives  that  agency  officials  believe  will  yield  increased  performance 
across multiple Coast Guard missions over time. Three initiatives, in particular, de-
serve  mention.  These  are  a  new  coastal  communication  system,  called  Rescue  21; 
a  new  field  command  structure,  called  Sectors;  and  efforts  to  improve  readiness  at 
multimission stations that conduct search and rescue as well as other missions. All 
three efforts carry some risk and will merit close attention.

• Rescue  21.  The  Coast  Guard  has  resolved  some  initial  development  problems 
that delayed the implementation of this new coastal command and control com-
munication system and is now poised to move forward again, with a Fiscal Year 
2006 budget request of $101 million. According to Coast Guard officials, Rescue 
21  can  improve  coastal  command  and  control  communications  and  interoper-
ability  with  other  agencies,  helping  to  improve  not  only  search  and  rescue  ef-
forts but also other missions such as illegal drug and migrant interdiction. The 
program  is  composed  of  very-high-frequency-FM  radios,  communication  towers, 
and communication centers. Rescue 21 was originally scheduled to be ready for 
operational  testing  by  September  2003,  but  this  was  delayed  because  of  prob-
lems  in  developing  system  software.  Operational  testing  of  this  software  has 
been  completed. 11 The  program  is  now  set—once  additional  Coast  Guard  and 
DHS approvals are obtained—to move into its next phase of production, and the 

partnerships.  (This  was  done  in  response  to  GAO–04–868.)  The  Coast  Guard  entered  into  an 
agreement  with  Volpe  for  the  provision  of  a  variety  of  support  for  AIS  services,  including  its 
help in setting up AIS capability in areas where partnerships may be of assistance.

10 Agency  officials  reported  that  they  are  focusing  resources  on  making  the  initial  inspection 
of the nearly 10,000 vessels subject to MTSA requirements. Coast Guard officials say the agency 
is using unscheduled or unannounced spot checks for facilities, and for foreign vessels. However, 
we have not assessed the extent to which this has occurred. 

11 As a result of these delays, $40 million in Fiscal Year 2005 funds were reprogrammed with-
in  the  Coast  Guard  from  Rescue  21  to  other  purposes,  and  an  additional  $16  million  was  re-
scinded.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

28

Coast  Guard  anticipates  that  the  program  will  be  operational  by  the  end  of 
2007. 

According to the Coast Guard, one risk that remains in moving ahead with Rescue 
21 involves locating sites for about 330 towers that must be built. The Coast Guard 
must locate these towers in accordance with the requirements of the National Envi-
ronmental  Policy  Act  of  1969  (NEPA),  as  amended,  which  requires  federal  agencies 
to  prepare  an  environmental  impact  statement  for  major  federal  actions  that  may 
significantly affect the quality of the human environment. 12 Towers can have envi-
ronmental  effects;  for  example,  when  they  are  built  in  migratory  bird  locations, 
birds  can  fly  into  the  towers  or  their  supporting  wires.  Additionally,  for  effective 
communications,  each  tower  must  be  placed  in  a  way  that  one  tower’s  coverage 
meets  the  next  tower’s  coverage  without  interference.  Thus,  if  one  tower  must  be 
moved for environmental reasons, neighboring towers may also have to be moved—
leading to a potential for schedule slippage, if additional sites must be identified and 
developed. The NEPA process represents the Rescue 21 program’s greatest risk, ac-
cording to a program official. 13 

• Sectors.  This  is  a  new  field  command  structure  that  will  unify  previously  dis-
parate Coast Guard units such as air stations, groups, and marine safety offices 
into  integrated  commands.  This  effort  is  a  budget  neutral  effect  in  the  Fiscal 
Year  2006  request,  but  it  bears  attention  for  operational  effectiveness  reasons. 
The  Coast  Guard  is  making  this  change  to  improve  mission  performance 
through  better  coordination  of  Coast  Guard  command  authority  and  resources 
such  as  boats  and  aircraft.  Under  the  previous  field  structure,  for  example,  a 
marine safety officer who had the authority to inspect a vessel at sea or needed 
an aerial view of an oil spill as part of an investigation would often have to co-
ordinate  a  request  for  a  boat  or  aircraft  through  a  district  office,  which  would 
obtain  the  resource  from  a  group  or  air  station.  Under  the  Sector  realignment, 
these  operational  resources  will  be  available  under  the  same  commanding  offi-
cer. To date, 8 sectors have been established, with approximately 28 to be estab-
lished  by  the  end  of  2006. 14 According  to  Coast  Guard  personnel,  the  realign-
ment  is  particularly  important  for  meeting  new  homeland  security  responsibil-
ities,  and  will  facilitate  the  Coast  Guard’s  ability  to  manage  incidents  in  close 
coordination with other federal, state, and local agencies. 

While  the  establishment  of  Sectors  appears  to  be  an  important  step  that  could 
positively  affect  the  Coast  Guard’s  mission  performance,  the  Coast  Guard  is  likely 
to face a number of implementation challenges that it will need to overcome to help 
ensure success. First, Sectors change a longstanding cultural divide within the agen-
cy.  This  divide  has  separated  those  personnel  who  typically  operate  aircraft  and 
boats  from  those  personnel  who  typically  enforce  marine  safety,  security,  and  envi-
ronmental protection laws. Second, it has implications for alignment above the field 
operations level as well. Realignment is likely to be needed at the district office and 
headquarters  levels  to  help  ensure  that  management  misalignments  among  these 
levels do not pull the field reorganization off track. Third, it will likely require train-
ing, such as taking steps to ensure that senior commanders are aware of key issues 
critical  for  decision  making  across  the  various  Coast  Guard  mission  areas.  Coast 
Guard  officials  acknowledge  these  challenges  but  believe  that  the  culture  challenge 
will be overcome in time as a result of increased familiarity and training. They also 
acknowledged  that  further  realignments  at  the  district  and  headquarters  levels  are 
likely to be needed over time and that efforts are under way to implement training 
changes.

• Multimission stations. Another area where the Coast Guard has an opportunity 
to  improve  mission  performance  involves  its  188  multimission  stations.  These 
stations located along the nation’s coastlines and interior waterways have been 
the mainstay of one of the Coast Guard’s oldest missions—finding and rescuing 
mariners  in  danger.  In  2001,  after  a  series  of  search  and  rescue  mishaps,  the 
Coast Guard began efforts to improve station readiness, which had been declin-

12 Pub.  L.  No.  91–190,  83  Stat.  852  (1970)  (environmental  impact  statements  provision  found 

at 42 U.S.C. § 4332(2)(c)). 

13 To help address these concerns, the Coast Guard has agreed to support U.S. Fish and Wild-
life  Service’s  studies  examining  what  can  be  done  to  prevent  birds  from  hitting  the  towers  or 
supporting  wires.  In  response  to  the  Fish  and  Wildlife  Service’s  concerns,  the  Coast  Guard  has 
adapted the night lighting on the towers to make the towers more visible for the birds and has 
used towers that do not require support wires.

14 Sectors  will  be  organized  along  existing  Captain  of  the  Port  zones.  The  eight  established 
sectors  as  of  March  1,  2005,  are  in  Boston,  Baltimore,  San  Diego,  Honolulu,  Miami,  Key  West, 
San Juan (Puerto Rico), and Guam.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

29

ing  for  more  than  20  years.  This  included  reconfiguring  operations  and  bol-
stering  resources  in  four  areas—staffing,  training,  boats,  and  personal  protec-
tion equipment used by personnel during operations, such as life vests and sur-
vival suits. This effort was complicated by the new and increased homeland se-
curity  responsibilities  that  stations  assumed  after  the  terrorist  attacks  of  Sep-
tember 11.

Today,  4  years  after  efforts  began  to  improve  station  readiness,  there  have  been 
operational improvements in staffing, training, boats, and personal protection equip-
ment, as well as increases in resource levels at stations. However, even though read-
iness  concerns  have  been  mitigated  to  some  extent,  the  stations  have  still  been  un-
able  to  meet  standards  and  goals  relating  to  staffing,  boats,  and  equipment,  which 
indicates  that  the  stations  are  still  significantly  short  of  desired  readiness  levels  in 
some  areas.  For  example,  even  though  station  staffing  has  increased  25  percent 
since  2001,  station  personnel  continue  to  work  significantly  longer  hours  than  are 
allowed under the Coast Guard’s work standards. 

To address continued readiness concerns, actions are needed in two areas, and the 
Coast  Guard  says  that  it  has  such  efforts  underway.  Currently,  the  Coast  Guard 
does  not  have  an  adequate  plan  in  place  for  achieving  and  assessing  readiness  in 
its new post-September 11 operating environment. The Boat Forces Strategic Plan—
the  Coast  Guard’s  strategy  for  maintaining  and  improving  essential  multimission 
station capabilities over the next 10 years—is the agency’s main tool for measuring 
progress in meeting station readiness requirements, but it has not been updated to 
reflect  increased  homeland  security  responsibilities.  However,  Coast  Guard  officials 
recently reported that they will update the plan to reflect its homeland security mis-
sion and identify actions taken and results achieved. Second, the Coast Guard is op-
erating  under  interim  homeland  security  guidelines,  which  establish  recommended 
security  activities  for  field  units  according  to  each  maritime  security  threat  level. 
Coast  Guard  officials  said  they  would  incorporate  measurable  station  readiness 
goals into the plan. The Coast Guard plans to complete these efforts in the next 6–
9 months. 
Important  but  Costly  Programs  for  Maintaining  and  Recapitalizing

Deepwater Assets Need Careful Monitoring 

The  third  Coast  Guard  priority  involves  the  single  largest  and  most  complex  ac-
quisition program in the agency’s history—a project designed to improve the mission 
performance of the range of cutters and aircraft that currently conduct the agency’s 
offshore missions. We have previously reported on the risky approach for this acqui-
sition, 15 and  although  progress  has  been  made  to  address  our  past  recommenda-
tions,  the  risks  still  remain  substantial.  As  it  undergoes  a  transformation  to  these 
new  or  upgraded  assets,  the  Coast  Guard  is  also  faced  with  sustaining  its  legacy 
assets 16 to  ensure  that  they  can  continue  to  perform  the  Coast  Guard’s  missions 
until  new  or  upgraded  assets  are  in  place.  Revisions  to  the  Coast  Guard’s  mission 
requirements for Deepwater, slippages in the acquisition schedule, and limited infor-
mation  about  the  condition  of  and  likely  costs  for  maintaining  the  legacy  assets  all 
highlight the need for continued attention to this area. 
Deepwater Acquisition Involves a Major Recapitalization of the Coast Guard 

In  1996,  the  Coast  Guard  initiated  a  major  recapitalization  effort—known  as  the 
Integrated  Deepwater  System—to  replace  or  modernize  the  agency’s  deteriorating 
aircraft and cutters. These legacy assets are used for missions that require mobility, 
extended  presence  on  scene,  and  the  capability  of  overseas  deployment.  Examples 
of  such  missions  include  interdicting  illegal  drug  shipments  or  attempted  landings 
by illegal aliens, rescuing mariners in difficulty at sea, protecting important fishing 
grounds,  and  responding  to  marine  pollution.  The  Deepwater  fleet  consists  of  187 
fixed-wing  aircraft  and  helicopters,  and  88  cutters  of  varying  lengths.  As  currently 
designed,  the  Deepwater  program  replaces  some  assets  (such  as  deteriorating  cut-

15 GAO, Coast Guard’s Acquisition Management: Deepwater Project’s Justification and Afford-
ability Need to Be Addressed More Thoroughly, GAO/RCED–99–6 (Washington, DC: October 26, 
1998); GAO, Coast Guard: Progress Being Made on Deepwater Project, but Risks Remain, GAO–
01–564  (Washington,  DC:  May  2,  2001);  and  GAO,  Contract  Management:  Coast  Guard’s  Deep-
water  Program  Needs  Increased  Attention  to  Management  and  Contractor  Oversight,  GAO–04–
380 (Washington, DC: March 2004). 

16 For purposes of this testimony, we use the term ‘‘legacy assets’’ to refer to the existing fleet 
of deepwater aircraft and cutters. These legacy assets include the HC–130, HU–25, HH–60, and 
HH–65  aircraft  and  the  378-foot  high-endurance  cutters,  the  210-foot  and  270-foot  medium-en-
durance  cutters,  and  the  110-foot  and  123-foot  patrol  boats.  We  did  not  include  the  213-foot 
Acushnet, the 230-foot Storis, or the 282-foot Alex Haley as part of our analyses of the deepwater 
legacy assets because they are one-of-a-kind vessels. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

30

ters) with new ones while upgrading other assets (such as some types of helicopters) 
so that all of the assets can meet new performance requirements. 17 

In  an  effort  to  maintain  its  existing  assets  until  the  Deepwater  assets  are  in 
place, the Coast Guard is conducting extensive maintenance work. Notwithstanding 
extensive  overhauls  and  other  upgrades,  a  number  of  the  cutters  are  nearing  the 
end of their estimated service lives. Similarly, while a number of the deepwater leg-
acy  aircraft  have  received  upgrades  in  engines,  operating  systems,  and  radar  and 
sensor equipment since they were originally built, they too have limitations in their 
operating capabilities. For example, the surface search radar system on the HC–130 
long-range surveillance aircraft is subject to frequent failures and is quickly becom-
ing  unsupportable.  Flight  crews  use  this  radar  to  search  for  vessels  in  trouble  and 
to monitor ships for illegal activity, such as transporting illicit drugs or illegal immi-
grants.  When  the  radar  fails,  flight  crews  are  reduced  to  looking  out  the  window 
for  targets,  greatly  reducing  mission  efficiency  and  effectiveness.  A  flight  crew  in 
Kodiak, Alaska, described this situation as being ‘‘like trying to locate a boat looking 
through a straw.’’ We have been reviewing the condition of Coast Guard Deepwater 
assets  for  a  number  of  years,  and  our  work  has  shown  that  a  need  exists  for  sub-
stantial  replacement  or  upgrading. 18 We  have  additional  work  underway  this  year 
regarding  the  status  of  Deepwater  assets,  and  will  be  testifying  on  this  work  next 
month. 
Deepwater Contracting Approach Remains Risky 

While  we  agree  that  the  case  for  replacing  and  upgrading  the  Coast  Guard’s  leg-
acy assets is compelling, the contracting strategy the agency is using to conduct this 
acquisition carries a number of inherent risks. This strategy relies on a contractor—
called  the  system  integrator—to  identify  and  deliver  the  assets  needed  to  meet  a 
set  of  mission  requirements  the  Coast  Guard  has  specified,  using  tiers  of  sub-
contractors to design and build the actual assets. The resulting program is designed 
to provide an improved, integrated system of aircraft, cutters, and unmanned aerial 
vehicles  to  be  linked  effectively  through  systems  that  provide  command,  control, 
communications,  computer,  intelligence,  surveillance,  reconnaissance,  and  sup-
porting  logistics.  However,  from  the  outset,  we  have  expressed  concern  about  the 
risks involved with this approach because of its heavy reliance on a steady funding 
stream  over  several  decades  and  the  potential  lack  of  competition  to  keep  con-
tracting costs in line. 19 

These risks have had tangible effects, including rising costs and slipped schedules. 
Early on in our reviews of the program, we expressed concern that the Coast Guard 
risked schedule slippages and cost escalation if project funding fell short of planned 
funding  levels.  These  concerns  materialized  in  the  first  2  years  of  the  program, 
when  appropriated  funding  was  $125  million  less  than  planned  for.  And,  although 
funding  in  the  fourth  year  of  the  program  (Fiscal  Year  2005)  exceeded  the  Coast 
Guard’s  request  by  about  $46  million,  the  early  shortfalls,  according  to  the  Coast 
Guard, resulted in schedule slippage and led to increases in the total projected costs 
for the program. As of spring 2004, it was estimated that an additional $2.2 billion 
(in  nominal  dollars)  would  be  needed  to  return  the  program  to  its  original  imple-
mentation  schedule. 20 In  addition,  there  is  clear  evidence  that  the  asset  delivery 
schedule  has  also  slipped.  For  example,  under  Deepwater’s  original  schedule,  the 
first major cutter, the National Security Cutter was due to be delivered in 2006; the 
current  schedule  indicates  that  it  will  now  not  be  delivered  until  2007.  Similarly, 
the  first  nine  Maritime  Patrol  aircraft  were  due  to  be  delivered  in  2005;  now  only 
two will be delivered in 2007. 

When  we  reviewed  the  Deepwater  program  again  last  year,  we  found  that,  on 
many fronts, the Coast Guard was not doing enough to mitigate these risks. For ex-
ample,  we  found  that  well  into  the  contract’s  second  year,  key  components  needed 
to  manage  the  program  and  oversee  the  system  integrator’s  performance  had  not 
been effectively implemented. 21 We also reported that the degree to which the pro-
gram  was  on  track  could  not  be  determined,  because  the  Coast  Guard  was  not  up-

17 Current  plans  call  for  the  Coast  Guard  to  replace  all  of  its  deepwater  legacy  cutters  and 
patrol  boats,  beginning  with  the  378-foot  cutters.  The  Coast  Guard  also  plans  to  replace  the 
HU–25  aircraft,  but  will  upgrade  the  existing  HC–130  aircraft,  and  HH–60  and  HH–65  heli-
copters to extend their service lives. 

18 GAO–01–564 and GAO–04–636T. 
19 GAO–01–564 and GAO/RCED–99–6. 
20 GAO–04–636T. 
21 GAO–04–380. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

dating  its  schedule. 22 We  detailed  needed  improvements  in  a  number  of  areas, 
shown in table 1. 

31

The  Coast  Guard  agreed  with  nearly  all  of  our  recommendations  and  has  since 
made progress in implementing some of them. In most cases, however, while actions 
are under way to address these concerns, management challenges remain that may 
take some time to fully address. Here are some examples.

• Strengthening  integrated  product  teams.  These  teams,  the  Coast  Guard’s  pri-
mary  tool  for  managing  the  program  and  overseeing  the  contractor,  consist  of 
members  from  subcontractors  and  the  Coast  Guard.  In  2004,  we  found  these 
teams often lacked training and in several cases lacked charters defining clearly 
what they were to do. Most now have charters setting forth the team’s purpose, 
authority, and performance goals, among other things, and more training is now 
being  provided.  However,  roles  and  responsibilities  in  some  teams  continue  to 
be unclear, and about one-third of team members have yet to receive entry-level 
training. 

Holding  the  systems  integrator  accountable  for  competition.  The  Coast  Guard  has 
taken  a  number  of  steps  to  improve  cost  control  through  competition.  For  example, 
to improve competition among second-tier suppliers, Coast Guard officials said they 
will incorporate an assessment of the steps the system integrator is taking to foster 
competition at the major subcontractor level as one of the factors they take into ac-
count in deciding whether to award the first contract option. 

Besides  the  risks  noted  in  table  1,  the  program  also  bears  careful  watching  be-
cause  it  is  still  being  affected  in  midcourse  by  the  Coast  Guard’s  additional  home-
land  security  responsibilities.  Planning  for  the  Deepwater  program  had  been  set  in 
motion  before  the  terrorist  attacks  of  September  11,  and  while  the  initial  program 
included  consideration  of  homeland  security  responsibilities,  these  responsibilities 
have grown considerably in the interim. In March 2004, the Coast Guard developed 
a  revised  mission  needs  statement  (MNS)  that  indicated  that  current  specifications 
for Deepwater assets lacked some functional capabilities needed to meet mission re-
quirements. The MNS was approved by DHS in January 2005. 

According  to  the  Coast  Guard,  some  of  the  functional  capabilities  now  deemed  to 

bility;

be required include the following:

• Rotary  wing  airborne  use  of  force  and  vertical  insertion/vertical  delivery  capa-

• Greater  speed,  a  larger  flight  deck,  and  automated  defensive  and  weapons  sys-

tems for the National Security Cutter and Offshore Patrol Cutter classes;

22 GAO, Coast Guard: Deepwater Program Acquisition Schedule Update Needed, GAO–04–695 

(Washington, DC: June 14, 2004).

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

s
p
e
.
3
o
a
g
7
1
3

32

• A  common  operating  picture  (COP)  for  the  entire  Coast  Guard  (and  maritime 
ports of a unified Department of Homeland Security COP), an interoperable net-
work  to  improve  performance  in  all  mission  areas,  and  a  Secure  Compartmen-
talized Information Facility for improved intelligence capabilities; and
• Chemical, biological, radiological defense and decontamination capability for se-

lected Deepwater assets.

While  we  have  not  conducted  an  analysis  of  the  likely  cost  and  schedule  impact 
of the revised MNS requirements, they undoubtedly will have an effect on cost and 
schedule. The Coast Guard’s own estimates identified in the March 2004 MNS show 
an  increased  acquisition  cost  for  the  original  20-year  acquisition  of  about  $1  bil-
lion. 23 According to the Coast Guard, the revised MNS requirements and associated 
cost and schedule information have been forwarded to the Department of Homeland 
Security  (DHS)  and  the  Office  of  Management  and  Budget  for  approval.  As  of  this 
time, the implementation plan has not been approved. 

These  issues  point  to  the  need  for  continued  and  careful  monitoring  of  the  Deep-
water acquisition program both internally and externally. One positive development 
in  this  regard  involves  the  Coast  Guard’s  efforts  to  update  the  Deepwater  acquisi-
tion  schedule—action  that  we  suggested  in  our  June  2004  report. 24 The  original 
2002 schedule had milestone dates showing when work on an asset would begin and 
when delivery would be expected, as well as the integrated schedules of critical link-
ages  between  assets,  but  we  found  that  the  Coast  Guard  was  not  maintaining  an 
updated  and  integrated  version  of  the  schedule. 25 As  a  result,  the  Coast  Guard 
could  not  demonstrate  whether  individual  components  and  assets  were  being  inte-
grated and delivered on schedule and in critical sequence. While as late as October 
2004  Deepwater  performance  monitors  likewise  expressed  concern  that  the  Coast 
Guard lacked adequate visibility into the project’s status, the Coast Guard has since 
taken steps to update the outdated schedule, and has indicated that it plans to con-
tinue  to  update  the  schedule—monthly  for  internal  management  purposes,  and 
semi-annually to support its budget planning efforts. We think this is an important 
step  toward  improving  the  Coast  Guard’s  management  of  the  program  because  it 
provides  a  more  tangible  picture  of  progress,  as  well  as  a  baseline  for  holding  con-
tractors  accountable.  And,  as  we  have  said  in  the  past  on  numerous  occasions,  we 
will  continue  to  work  closely  with  the  Coast  Guard  to  monitor  how  risks  are  miti-
gated. 
Attention  Also  Needed  to  Planned  Transition  and  Phase  out  of  Legacy

Assets 

Although  the  Coast  Guard  expects  to  upgrade  a  number  of  its  legacy  assets  for 
use  in  the  Deepwater  program,  a  substantial  portion  of  its  legacy  assets—particu-
larly  cutters—are  scheduled  to  be  replaced.  Until  their  replacements  are  available, 
however, many of the cutters will need to be kept in service so that the Coast Guard 
can continue to perform its missions. Our visits to field locations and conversations 
with  Coast  Guard  operations  and  maintenance  personnel  clearly  indicated  that  the 
maintenance of these assets is already taking increasingly more time and effort. For 
example,  air  station  maintenance  personnel  indicated  that  aircraft  are  being  sub-
jected  to  additional  corrosion-related  problems.  To  address  these  problems,  air  sta-
tion maintenance personnel at the locations we visited said they have instituted ad-
ditional  measures,  such  as  washing  and  applying  fluid  film  to  the  aircraft  prior  to 
each  deployment.  Similar  accounts  were  told  by  personnel  working  on  cutters.  For 
example,  officers  of  the  270-foot  cutter  Northland  told  us  that  because  of  dated 
equipment  and  the  deteriorating  condition  of  the  vessel’s  piping  and  other  sub-
systems,  crewmembers  have  to  spend  increasingly  more  time  and  resources  while 
in port to prepare for the cutter for the next deployment. While we could not verify 

23 According  to  the  MNS,  the  original  estimated  acquisition,  construction,  and  improvement 
costs  were  bracketed  at  between  $7.5  billion  to  $15  billion  in  Fiscal  Year  1998  dollars.  It  then 
notes  that  current  Deepwater  projections  show  an  approximately  $16  billion  cost  for  a  20-year 
implementation  plan.  However,  GAO  reported  in  April  2004  that  the  costs  for  the  Deepwater 
program would reach $17 billion under the funding stream that the Coast Guard projected that 
it would need to complete the program in 20 years. 

24 GAO–04–695. 
25 Not  maintaining  a  current  and  integrated  schedule  lessens  the  Coast  Guard’s  ability  to 
monitor  the  system  integrator’s  performance  and  take  early  action  to  resolve  risks  that  could 
become  problems  later.  Maintaining  such  a  schedule  is  an  industry  best  practice;  the  Depart-
ment of Defense is required to do so in order to be able to report any breaches in cost, schedule, 
or performance targets. Deepwater performance monitors (the contracting officers’ technical rep-
resentatives  who  represent  the  contracting  officer  in  monitoring  the  contractor’s  performance) 
have  likewise  expressed  concern  that  the  Coast  Guard  lacks  adequate  visibility  to  scrutinize 
schedules for component-level items which prevents reliable forecasting and risk analysis. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

33

these  increases  in  time  and  resources  because  of  limitations  in  the  Coast  Guard’s 
data,  the  need  for  increasing  amounts  of  maintenance  was  a  message  we  consist-
ently heard from operations and maintenance personnel. 

The  Coast  Guard  is  aware  that  keeping  these  legacy  assets  mission  capable  will 
likely  require  an  additional  infusion  of  funds  for  some  assets  that  are  scheduled  to 
be  replaced.  Since  2002,  the  Coast  Guard  has  annually  created  a  compendium  that 
consolidates  information  about  projects  needed  to  maintain  and  sustain  legacy  as-
sets.  The  Coast  Guard  uses  this  compendium  as  a  tool  for  setting  priorities  and 
planning  budgets.  The  most  recent  compendium  (for  Fiscal  Year  2006),  lists  more 
than  $1  billion  worth  of  upgrades  to  the  Deepwater  legacy  assets.  The  planned  up-
grades  identified  in  the  compendium  that  have  been  approved  and  received  initial 
funding  account  for  an  estimated  $856  million  the  Coast  Guard  anticipates  it  will 
need  to  complete  those  projects.  In  addition,  the  compendium  lists  another  esti-
mated  $409  million  in  sustainment  projects  for  the  other  legacy  assets  for  which 
funding has not been requested. If the condition of these assets continues to deterio-
rate  or  replacement  assets  are  further  delayed,  this  additional  funding  will  likely 
be needed. 

We  are  not  questioning  the  Coast  Guard’s  decisions  about  which  projects  within 
the compendium should receive priority. We believe it is important, however, for the 
Coast  Guard  to  make  Congress  aware  of  the  magnitude  of  the  potential  funding 
needs for sustaining the assets that are eventually scheduled for replacement. Given 
the  schedule  slippages  we  have  seen  and  the  continued  possibility  that  Deepwater 
requirements  may  yet  change,  this  information  will  be  important  to  determine  a 
thoughtful and accurate estimate of future maintenance budget needs. 

One  planning  effort  under  way  within  the  Coast  Guard  illustrates  the  kinds  of 
considerations  that  may  be  needed  with  regard  to  these  assets.  This  effort  is  being 
undertaken  by  the  Coast  Guard’s  Pacific  Area  Command,  which  to  accomplish  its 
missions,  relies  on  378-foot  cutters—the  first  asset  scheduled  to  be  replaced  under 
the Deepwater program. 26 Under the original Deepwater proposal, the final 378-foot 
cutter  was  to  be  decommissioned  in  2013,  but  by  2005,  that  date  had  slipped  to 
2016. To help keep these cutters running through 2016, Pacific Area Command offi-
cials  are  considering  such  strategies  as  designating  some  of  the  378-foot  cutters  as 
capable  of  performing  only  certain  missions,  rather  than  attempting  to  keep  them 
all  fully  capable  of  performing  all  missions.  Even  so,  the  Pacific  Area  Commander 
told  us  that  in  order  for  the  378-foot  cutters  to  be  properly  maintained  until  their 
replacements  become  operational;  the  Coast  Guard  will  have  to  provide  more  fo-
cused  funding.  So  far,  the  Coast  Guard’s  budget  plans  and  requests  do  not  address 
this potential need. 
Concluding Observations 

Over  the  past  several  years,  the  Coast  Guard  has  been  in  the  vortex  of  the  na-
tion’s  response  to  homeland  security  concerns.  It  has  been  charged  with  many  new 
responsibilities related to ports and to marine security in general, and from the out-
set, we have often used the word ‘‘daunting’’ to describe the resulting tasks. In addi-
tion, expectations continue that the Coast Guard will be able to rescue those in dis-
tress, protect the nation’s fisheries, keep vital marine highways operating efficiently, 
and respond effectively to marine accidents and natural disasters. Congress has ac-
knowledged that these added responsibilities carry a price tag and has, through the 
appropriations process, provided substantially more money for the job. 

As  these  efforts  begin  to  move  into  a  more  mature  phase,  allowing  lessons  that 
can  already  be  learned  to  better  inform  judgments  about  the  future,  it  is  increas-
ingly  important  to  explore  ways  to  enhance  mission  effectiveness  while  stretching 
taxpayer dollars for maximum effectiveness. This is particularly true in the current 
budget  climate.  While  we  have  found  the  Coast  Guard  to  be  a  willing  participant 
in  such  efforts,  the  agency’s  focus  on  achieving  all  of  its  missions  can  make  it  dif-
ficult  to  carry  through  with  the  many  intermediate  steps  that  may  be  needed  to 
keep management problems to a minimum. We think the issues we have highlighted 
are potential areas for ongoing congressional attention, and we will continue to work 
with the Coast Guard on them. 

Madame  Chair  and  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  this  completes  my  prepared 
statement. I would be happy to respond to any questions that you or other Members 
of the Subcommittee may have at this time. 

26 The  Pacific  Area  Command  is  responsible  [0]  for  operations  covering  74  million  square 

miles, ranging from South America, to the Arctic Circle and west to the Far East. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

34

APPENDIX I: OBJECTIVES, SCOPE AND METHODOLOGY 

To provide a strategic overview of the President’s Fiscal Year 2006 budget request 
for  the  Coast  Guard,  focusing  on  several  areas  of  particular  congressional  interest, 
we reviewed the Coast Guard’s Congressional-stage budget and other financial docu-
ments provided by the Coast Guard. We also interviewed Coast Guard headquarters 
officials familiar with the Coast Guard’s budget and acquisition processes. 

To  determine  the  status  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  performance  measures  and  results, 
we  reviewed  Coast  Guard  performance  data  and  performance  documentation.  We 
also  obtained  confirmation  from  knowledgeable  Coast  Guard  officials  that  the  per-
formance data sources and the systems that produced them have not changed since 
our  2003  data  reliability  analysis.  We  determined  that  Coast  Guard  performance 
measures are sufficiently reliable for the purposes of this testimony. 

To determine the status of key outstanding Coast Guard recommendations, we re-
viewed past GAO reports and testimonies related to the Coast Guard and identified 
the  GAO  recommendations  contained  in  those  reports.  In  addition,  we  consulted 
with GAO staff who performed the work that resulted in the recommendations and 
interviewed  Coast  Guard  headquarters  officials  regarding  the  status  of  the  rec-
ommendations—including  any  progress  made  to  implement  them.  We  also  obtained 
and reviewed relevant documents from the Coast Guard. 

To  assess  the  Coast  Guard’s  recapitalization  efforts,  we  analyzed  data  and  condi-
tion  measures  used  by  the  Coast  Guard  for  determining  Deepwater  legacy  assets’ 
condition, reviewed Coast Guard actions to maintain and upgrade the legacy assets, 
and  assessed  the  improvements  the  Coast  Guard  is  making  in  its  management  of 
the  Deepwater  acquisition.  We  will  be  following  up  this  testimony  with  a  written 
report  that  will  contain  detailed  information  related  to  the  condition  of  Deepwater 
legacy  assets,  and  the  actions  the  Coast  Guard  is  taking  to  maintain  and  upgrade 
them. As part of the follow-on report we will also provide more detailed information 
on the Coast Guard’s management of the Deepwater program. 

This testimony is based on published GAO reports and briefings, as well as addi-
tional audit work that was conducted in accordance with generally accepted govern-
ment  auditing  standards.  We  conducted  our  work  for  this  testimony  between  Feb-
ruary and March 2005. 

APPENDIX II: RELATED GAO PRODUCTS 

Coast Guard: Station Readiness Improving, but Resource Challenges and Manage-

ment Concerns Remain (GAO–05–161, January 31, 2005). 

Maritime Security: Better Planning Needed to Help Ensure an Effective Port Secu-

rity Assessment Program (GAO–04–1062, September 30, 2004). 

Maritime  Security:  Partnering  Could  Reduce  Federal  Costs  and  Facilitate  Imple-
mentation  of  Automatic  Vessel  Identification  System  (GAO–04–868,  July  23,  2004). 
Maritime Security: Substantial Work Remains to Translate New Planning Require-

ments into Effective Port Security (GAO–04–838, June 30, 2004). 

Coast Guard: Deepwater Program Acquisition Schedule Update Needed (GAO–04–

695, June 14, 2004). 

Coast Guard: Station Spending Requirements Met, but Better Processes Needed to 

Track Designated Funds (GAO–04–704, May 28, 2004). 

Coast  Guard:  Key  Management  and  Budget  Challenges  for  Fiscal  Year  2005  and 

Beyond (GAO–04–636T, April 7, 2004). 

Coast Guard: Relationship between Resources Used and Results Achieved Needs to 

Be Clearer (GAO–04–432, March 22, 2004). 

Contract  Management:  Coast  Guard’s  Deepwater  Program  Needs  Increased  Atten-

tion to Management and Contractor Oversight (GAO–04–380, March 9, 2004). 

Coast  Guard:  New  Communication  System  to  Support  Search  and  Rescue  Faces 

Challenges (GAO–03–1111, September 30, 2003). 

Maritime Security: Progress Made in Implementing Maritime Transportation Secu-

rity Act, but Concerns Remain (GAO–03–1155T, September 9, 2003). 

Coast Guard: Actions Needed to Mitigate Deepwater Project Risks (GAO–01–659T, 

Coast  Guard:  Progress  Being  Made  on  Deepwater  Project,  but  Risks  Remain 

May 3, 2001). 

(GAO–01–564, May 2, 2001). 

Coast  Guard’s  Acquisition  Management:  Deepwater  Project’s  Justification  and  Af-
fordability  Need  to  Be  Addressed  More  Thoroughly  (GAO/RCED–99–6,  October  26, 
1998). 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

35

APPENDIX III: BREAKDOWN OF THE COAST GUARD’S FISCAL YEAR 2006 REQUEST 
In  addition  to  operating  expenses  and  acquisition,  construction,  and  improve-
ments,  the  remaining  Coast  Guard  budget  accounts  include  areas  such  as  environ-
mental compliance and restoration, reserve training and oil spill recovery. (See table 
2 below.)

APPENDIX IV: COAST GUARD PERFORMANCE RESULTS, FISCAL YEARS 2001–2004
Table  3  shows  a  detailed  list  of  performance  results  for  the  eight  programs  for 
which  the  Coast  Guard  has  Fiscal  Year  2001  through  2004  data. 1 Shaded  entries 
in  the  table  indicate  those  years  that  the  Coast  Guard  reported  meeting  its  target; 
unshaded  entries  indicate  those  years  that  the  Coast  Guard  reported  not  meeting 
its  target.  The  table  also  shows  that  there  are  three  programs  for  which  perform-
ance results are pending and data is not available across the four-year period. Each 
program is discussed in more detail below. 

1 According  to  the  Coast  Guard,  performance  results  for  all  four  Fiscal  Years  (2001  to  2004) 
are not available for three programs. They are: (a) marine safety—Fiscal Year 2004 performance 
results  will  not  be  available  until  spring  2005,  when  the  recreational  boating  data  is  reported; 
(b) illegal drug interdiction—Fiscal Year 2004 results will be calculated and released once illegal 
drug  flow  information  for  Fiscal  Year  2004  is  known—sometime  in  the  spring  of  2005;  and  (c) 
ports, waterways, and coastal security—performance measures are still under development.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

s
p
e
.
4
o
a
g
7
1
3

36

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

s
p
e
.
5
o
a
g
7
1
3

37

Programs Not Meeting Targets in Fiscal Year 2004

• Foreign  fish  enforcement.  The  performance  results  for  foreign  fish  enforcement, 
which  indicate  the  number  of  foreign  vessel  incursions  into  the  United  States 
Exclusive  Economic  Zone  (EEZ), 2 has  experienced  fluctuations  from  152  incur-
sions to 250 incursions in the last 4 years. Such fluctuations can be due to oce-
anic  and  climatic  shifts  that  affect  the  migratory  patterns  of  important  fish 
stocks, and limited Coast Guard assets, which the Coast Guard believes are un-
able  to  cover  the  entire  3.4  million  square  mile  EEZ.  We  reported  previously 
that performance measures for foreign fish may not reflect agency efforts. 3 Be-
cause  EEZ  encroachments  can  be  affected  by  oceanic  and  climatic  shifts  that 
can  cause  significant  fluctuations  in  the  migratory  patterns  of  fish,  they  could 
increase  (or  decrease)  as  fishermen  follow  their  intended  catch  across  EEZ 
boundaries. According to Coast Guard officials, this type of migratory factor can 
influence  the  number  of  encroachments  in  a  given  year.  Consequently,  the 
Coast  Guard  has  added  two  additional  measures  to  foreign  fish  that  focus  on 
interception  and  interdiction.  These  two  submeasures  are  not  reflected  in  the 
Coast Guard’s foreign fish performance goal. However, the Coast Guard believes 
that  they  help  it  to  better  distinguish  between  those  incursions  that  it  is  able 
to  identify  (for  example,  with  a  C–130  it  can  identify  a  foreign  fishing  vessel 

2 Pursuant  to  the  1976  Magnuson-Stevens  Fishery  Conservation  and  Management  Act,  as 
amended,  the  EEZ  for  the  U.S.  is  an  area  within  200  nautical  miles  of  U.S.  shores  in  which 
the  U.S.  has  sovereign  rights  to  natural  resources  such  as  harvesting  rights  to  fish  stocks. 
Pub.L. 94–265, 90 Stat. 333 (1976). 

3 GAO,  Coast  Guard:  Relationship  between  Resources  Used  and  Results  Achieved  Needs  to  Be 

Clearer, GAO–04–432 (Washington, DC: March 22, 2004).

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

s
p
e
.
6
o
a
g
7
1
3

38

incursion)  and  those  incursions  that  it  can  actually  respond  to  (for  example, 
378-foot cutter can interdict a stray foreign fishing vessel). 

• Living  marine  resources.  The  performance  measure  for  living  marine  re-
sources—defined as the percentage of fishermen complying with federal regula-
tions—has  varied  from  96.3  percent  to  98.6  percent  between  Fiscal  Years  2001 
to  2004.  According  to  Coast  Guard  performance  documents,  the  agency  missed 
the  Fiscal  Year  2004  target  because  of  poor  economic  conditions  in  the  U.S. 
shrimp  fisheries,  which  appear  to  have  made  U.S.  fishermen  in  the  Southeast 
region more willing to violate regulations in order to maintain operations. How-
ever,  the  Coast  Guard  reported  that  while  the  number  of  fishermen  in  compli-
ance  decreased  slightly,  its  total  number  of  fishery  boardings  (4,560)  was  the 
highest number of boardings since 2001.

• Ice  operations.  To  meet  this  performance  target,  the  Coast  Guard’s  ice  oper-
ations  program  must  keep  winter  waterway  closures  under  8  days  per  year  for 
severe  winters  and  under  2  days  per  year  for  average  winters.  In  Fiscal  Year 
2004,  the  Coast  Guard  reports  missing  its  target  for  an  average  winter  with  4 
days  of  waterway  closures  instead  of  2  or  less.  The  Coast  Guard  reports  that 
it  extended  the  ice-breaking  season  for  an  additional  10  days  and  because  of 
worsened winter conditions within that period, its icebreaking assets were chal-
lenged to provide services in nine critical waterways of the Great Lakes. In Fis-
cal Year 2006, the Coast Guard plans to complete the construction of the Great 
Lakes  Icebreaker,  which  will  significantly  improve  icebreaking  on  the  Great 
Lakes.
• Defense  readiness.  Defense  readiness,  as  measured  by  the  percentage  of  time 
units that meet combat readiness status at a C–2 level, 4 improved from 67 per-
cent to 78 percent during Fiscal Years 2001 to 2003 but decreased to 76 percent 
in  Fiscal  Year  2004  due  to  a  personnel  shortage  according  to  the  Coast  Guard. 
The  Coast  Guard  identified  its  need  to  supply  personnel  for  the  war  in  Iraq  as 
the  main  reason  for  failing  to  meet  this  performance  target.  To  support  Fiscal 
Year  2004  efforts  in  Iraq,  the  Coast  Guard  provided  personnel  for  six  patrol 
boats, one patrol boat support unit, one port security unit, four law enforcement 
detachments, as well as two ships and cutters. 

Programs Meeting Fiscal Year 2004 Performance Targets 

• Undocumented migrant interdiction. The Coast Guard reported that it achieved 
its Fiscal Year 2004 performance goal of interdicting or deterring 87 percent of 
undocumented aliens attempting to enter the United States. The undocumented 
migrant  interdiction  performance  measure  assesses  the  percentage  of  migrants 
interdicted  or  deterred  on  maritime  routes. 5 In  2004,  the  Coast  Guard  identi-
fied  4,761  successful  arrivals  out  of  an  estimated  threat  of  37,000  migrants.  In 
Fiscal  Year  2003,  the  Coast  Guard  missed  this  target,  interdicting  or  deterring 
85.3  percent  of  migrants.  Since  2001,  the  greatest  percentage  of  migrants  de-
terred or interdicted—88.3 percent—was achieved in Fiscal Year 2002. 
• Search  and  rescue.  The  Coast  Guard’s  performance  in  this  area,  as  measured 
by the percentage of mariners’ lives saved from imminent danger, was 86.8 per-
cent, above the goal of 85 percent for Fiscal Year 2004. The Coast Guard identi-
fied continuing improvements in response resources and improvements made in 
commercial vessel and recreational boating safety as the main reasons for meet-
ing the target.
• Marine  environmental  protection.  The  Coast  Guard  measures  the  marine  envi-
ronmental  protection  target  as  the  5-year  average  of  oil  and  chemical  spills 
greater  than  100  gallons  per  100  million  tons  shipped.  Since  Fiscal  Year  2001, 
the  reported  average  number  of  oil  and  chemical  spills  has  dropped  from  40.3 
to  22.1  in  Fiscal  Year  2004.  The  Coast  Guard  identified  its  prevention,  pre-
paredness,  and  response  programs—including  industry  partnerships  and  incen-
tive programs—as reasons for the drop.
• Aids  to  navigation.  The  aids  to  navigation  program  performance  measure—
which  assesses  the  total  number  of  collisions,  allisions,  and  groundings—im-
proved  to  1,876  in  Fiscal  Year  2004,  more  than  a  6  percent  improvement  over 

4 According  to  Coast  Guard  information,  the  C–2  level  is  defined  as  the  level  at  which  a  unit 
possesses  the  resources  and  is  trained  to  undertake  most  of  the  wartime  missions  for  which  it 
is organized or designed. 

5 According to Coast Guard officials, the undocumented migrant interdiction performance tar-
get was set at 87 percent based on a study done to incorporate deterrence as a measure of Coast 
Guard performance.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

39

Fiscal Year 2003’s total of 2,000, and below the target of 1,923. 6 (Since the aim 
is to prevent these accidents, a lower number than the target represents attain-
ing the goal). The number has varied from year to year, but has remained below 
or at the target in each of the 4 years. The Coast Guard attributes this success 
to a multifaceted system of prevention activities, including radio aids to naviga-
tion,  communications,  vessel  traffic  services,  dredging,  charting,  regulations, 
and licensing. 

Programs with Pending Results 

• Marine  safety.  The  marine  safety  measure,  a  5-year  average  of  passenger  and 
maritime deaths and injuries, decreased from 1,651 in Fiscal Year 2001 to 1,307 
in Fiscal Year 2003. The Coast Guard is currently waiting on the states to sup-
ply recreational boating numbers in order to release their total performance re-
sult for calendar year 2004. Coast Guard officials identified ongoing inspection, 
investigation,  prevention,  and  response  programs,  as  well  as  work  with  indus-
try,  states,  and  volunteers  to  promote  boating  safe  operations,  as  factors  in  re-
ducing the number of deaths.
• Illegal  drug  interdiction.  The  illegal  drug  interdiction  performance  measure 7—
the  rate  at  which  the  Coast  Guard  seizes  cocaine—is  currently  being  modified 
by the Coast Guard. The Coast Guard expects their performance results will be 
available in April 2005. 
• Ports, waterways, and coastal security. The Coast Guard is currently developing 

a performance measure for ports, waterways, and coastal security.

Senator  SNOWE.  Thank  you,  Ms.  Wrightson,  for  your  testimony 
and  also  for  your  evaluation  of  the  current  challenges  facing  the 
Coast  Guard  with  respect  to  Deepwater,  and  also  the  sustainment 
of  the  legacy  assets,  as  well,  and  we’ll  get  into  that  in  a  moment. 
Let  me  begin  with  you,  Admiral  Collins.  I  think,  first  and  fore-
most, obviously, of concern, as we discussed yesterday—and I know 
it’s  a  mutual  concern—is  the  issue  of  the  Deepwater  Recapitaliza-
tion  Program  and  where  it  currently  stands.  And  I  know  we  can 
expect  a  rebaselining  report.  Is  that  going  to  be  forthcoming,  you 
said, on March 25th? 

Admiral  COLLINS.  March  25th  is  the  date  that  has  been  dis-
cussed on the House side that we’re committed to providing the re-
port. And it’s, again, the final tuning of that report and consensus-
building  within  the  Administration  on  the  out-year  dimensions  of 
that  plan  being  finalized,  as  we  speak,  and  a  full  expectation  that 
we will meet that deadline. 

Senator SNOWE. Well, I think it is going to be critical that we do 
so,  because  that,  obviously,  is  going  to  run  concurrent  with  the 
budgetary considerations and what we can expect from that rebase-
lining  in  terms  of  projected  increases.  And  so,  I  think  it’s  going  to 
be absolutely paramount that we see that sooner rather than later, 
and  hopefully  that  you  can  meet  that  deadline  of  March  25th  in 
order to submit it to the Committees. 

Admiral  COLLINS.  Absolutely.  And  it’ll  forecast  in  detail  the 
five—the  next  5  years,  and  then  summarize  the  balance  over  the 
course of the entire project, and it’ll give detailed information about 
the  capability  adjustments,  asset  by  asset,  that  we  have  incor-
porated  into  this  new  baseline,  based  upon  two  factors,  primarily. 
One, the post–9/11 environment and what that means to the Deep-
water requirement that was developed back in 1998, and what ad-
justments  need.  And  then,  second,  the  impact  of  the  current  state 

6 The  Coast  Guard  defines  allisions  as  vessel  collisions  with  fixed  objects,  as  distinguished 

from collisions, which are vessel collisions with movable objects. 

7 The illegal drug interdiction performance measure includes only cocaine, because cocaine has 

an analyzed flow rate and is the preponderant illegal drug.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

40

of  our  legacy  systems,  the  current  fleet,  and  what  that  means. 
Those  drive  the—the  former  drives  a  lot  of  capability  adjustments 
that you put in each system, and the latter impacts which ones you 
do  first,  second,  and  third,  because  of  the  condition  of  the  current 
asset.  So  those  are  the  variables,  and  the  rebaseline  will  delineate 
all those issues. 

Senator SNOWE. Have you seen the RAND studies?——
Admiral COLLINS. Absolutely. That——
Senator SNOWE.—in that regard of post-9/11 evaluation? 
Admiral  COLLINS.  The  course  of  events  here  in  developing  this 
new baseline was direction from me, as soon as I got aboard in the 
new Department, by the Secretary—Deputy Secretary, ‘‘We want to 
take a re-look at Deepwater, based upon 9/11. The fact that you’re 
a new department, 9/11, please review the bidding, in terms of the 
requirement.’’  We  had  an  effort  by  RAND  to  look  at  that  issue,  by 
CNA,  Center  for  Naval  Analysis,  to  take  a  look  at  that  issue,  and 
then  we  had  our  own  internal  assessment,  which  we  called  a  Per-
formance  Gap  Analysis.  And  so,  we  had,  sort  of,  triangulated  lines 
of  position,  if  you  will,  on  the  issue.  And  the  mission  needs  state-
ment that we have put forth to the Department, a revised mission 
needs statement, which is, of course, part of the formal acquisition 
process, was submitted to the Department and approved last Janu-
ary,  that  details  all  those  new  capabilities,  based  on  the  collection 
of these multiple analyses. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  suffice  it  to  say,  I  think,  the  deep  concern 
that  we  all  have  is  the  proposed  schedule  for  the  recapitalization 
of  the  Deepwater  Project  and  fleet  readiness.  And  I  know  that 
you’ve mentioned in your statement that the Coast Guard is experi-
encing  a  continuing  decline  in  fleet  readiness;  and  it  goes  to  the 
point  that  Master  Chief  Welch  mentioned,  in  terms  of  the  impact 
on  the  ground,  and  as  Ms.  Wrightson  mentioned,  on  schedule  slip-
pages. And even with the increase proposed by the Administration, 
it  doesn’t  put  us  even  on  a  20-year  schedule.  That  concerns  me. 
You know, we’re close to being behind schedule by 10 years. Would 
you agree with that? 

Admiral  COLLINS.  Well,  clearly,  the—you  know,  the  one  thing 
that  has—you  know,  we  forecasted,  back  in  1998,  you  know,  the 
condition of the legacy fleet and how it would deteriorate over time. 
And  we  had  a  certain  curve  plotted—a  negative  slope,  obviously, 
over  time.  That  is  steeper  and  more  negative  than  we  anticipated. 
And  so,  that  fleet  is  eroding  in  front  of  our  eyes.  You  can  expect 
that when you have ships that range anywhere from, you know, 30 
to 60 years old. And so, you see, in this request—and we’ve talked 
about  it,  Madam  Chair—the  fact  that  the  legacy  systems  are  tak-
ing more money out of the pot to keep them going while we replace. 
So that is a balancing act that we have to continue to juggle. 

One  of  the  things  I  should  note  in  the  2006  budget,  Deepwater 
request, which, incidentally, that request is simpatico with the new 
mission  needs  statement.  Everything  that’s  in  that  Deepwater  re-
quest  is  consistent  with  the  new  capability  adjustments.  And  even 
in  the  timing  adjustments—you’ll  note,  in  that  2006  request,  two 
design  works  going  on—108  million  for  the  middle  cutter,  the  off-
shore  patrol  cutter,  and  design  work  for  the  patrol  boat.  That’s 
much  advance  of  the  initial  Deepwater  baseline.  Initially,  the  off-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

41

shore  patrol  cutter  was  supposed  to  be,  like,  a  2012  phenomenon, 
and  the  response  cutter,  the  new  patrol  boat,  the  ultimate  patrol-
boat replacement, like, at 2018. We’re designing them in 2006. And 
because  that’s  some  of  the  adjustment—those  are  the  two  parts  of 
our  fleet  that  are  wearing  out  the  most,  and  we  need  to  get  the 
new things designed quicker. 

So,  there’s  a  reflection  of  our  urgency—I  guess  what  I’m  saying 
is  that  2006—a  reflection  of  our  urgency  to  get  design  work  done, 
the  up-front  engineering  done,  so  we  can  prepare  to  go  to  produc-
tion for those two aspects of the fleet. 

Senator  SNOWE.  No,  I  understand  that,  I  think  the  bottom  line 
is, we’re unacceptably behind schedule on the Deepwater recapital-
ization. When you’re talking about your oldest ships being 30 years 
old, 40 years old, and the maintenance requirements is taking two 
cutters  per  year  out—since  1999,  maintenance  increased,  as  I  said 
in my opening statement, 400 percent. This is unacceptable, it’s un-
conscionable.  I’ve  suggested  maybe  some  members  of  the  OMB 
should be on some of those Coast Guard cutters, in treacherous wa-
ters when you’re having to perform your missions, to get an under-
standing of what we’re dealing with here. 

And so here we are, we’re 20 years-plus to get this program fully 
underway,  let  alone  sustaining  all  the  rest  of  the  fleet—20  years-
plus, that is where we are right now. We’re behind schedule. I don’t 
know  if  the  realities  are  permeating  downtown.  Is  there  anybody 
understanding the conditions of the fleet? 

Admiral COLLINS. I think that there’s a clear——
Senator SNOWE. Does anyone understand the degradation of this 

fleet? 

Admiral COLLINS.—I think there is a clear support for this issue. 

No one’s questioning the requirement. And——

Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  I  know,  but  I  think  it’s  reconciling  the  re-
quirements with reality. I mean, it’s not enough to send up a budg-
et that doesn’t reflect the true reality, the grim reality that, really, 
ultimately, men and women’s lives are at stake here. 

Admiral COLLINS. We are pleased——
Senator SNOWE. It does not make sense. And It’s unconscionable 
we’re at this point that there has been no adjustments made to this 
score.  We  have  said  it  repeatedly,  as  Members  of  this  Committee. 

Admiral COLLINS. We are pleased——
Senator  SNOWE.  And  I  can’t  believe  that  they’re  not  under-

standing it. 

Admiral COLLINS. We are pleased that the level is close to a bil-
lion  dollars,  because  the  budget  did  come  up.  It’s  the  highest  it’s 
been. 

Senator SNOWE. It’s not doing what it needs to do. 
Admiral COLLINS. I think——
Senator  SNOWE.  That’s  great,  but  it’s  not  doing  what  it  needs  to 
do.  We  know  that.  If  the  requirement  is  so  much  greater  to  get 
some  of  these  ships  onboard  now—to  do  it  now—your  oldest  ship 
is, what, 65? What is it, 62, 65? 

Admiral  COLLINS.  The  Storis—the  venerable  Storis,  up  in  Ko-

diak, is approaching 65. 

Senator SNOWE. Sixty-five years old. Great age, right? 
[Laughter.] 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

42

Admiral  COLLINS.  I  think  the  key—we’re  pleased—in  a  nutshell, 
I  think  we’re  pretty  pleased  with  the  2006  budget.  We’re  pleased 
that  we’ve  got  this  level.  And  the  key,  going  forward,  is  the  out-
year budgets. 

Senator  SNOWE.  That’s  right,  The  point  is,  we’re  still  looking  at 
20-plus years. That’s the point. It’s not moving anything. The need 
is so great. 

Admiral  COLLINS.  The  consequence,  of  course,  is,  depending  on 
the rate at which we replace these assets—has a direct bearing on 
the  amount  of  money  we  pour  into  the  maintenance  and  the 
sustainment of the existing fleet. So the direct—there’s a direct re-
lationship, a balance, between those two things. And you’ll see the 
legacy  sustainment  curve  costs  go  up.  And  it—you  can  look  at 
every asset we have, and that’s the curve. 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you. And I will get to the other panelists 
in a moment. I’ll move to Senator Cantwell, and hopefully you can 
respond. Thank you. 

Senator CANTWELL. Madam Chairman, did you want to recognize 

the Chairman of the full Committee? 

STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS,

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

Senator STEVENS. I would like to go forward, thank you. 
I do hope, Senator, that we’ll keep things in perspective. Senator 
Inouye  and  I,  on  the  Appropriations  Committee,  have  seen  to  it 
that  this  budget’s  been  increased  every  year.  We  put  168  million 
more in 2004 bill. We put 724 million into the Deepwater in 2005. 
And  we  now  have  a  242  million  increase  over  2005,  and  up  to  al-
most  a  billion  dollars  in  2006.  That’s  a  total  of  almost  2.4  billion 
in  the  last  3  years  on  this  Deepwater  side  alone.  The  problem  is 
that because of the homeland-defense missions, these ships, planes, 
and helicopters are being used, I am told, at 40 percent higher lev-
els than scheduled in the plan that was for 20 years. 

Now,  I—you  know,  we  have  half  the  coastline  of  the  United 
States,  and  the  Admiral  and  I  are  old  friends,  and  I’m  inclined  to 
be more realistic, I think. There’s no possibility of going much fur-
ther  than  we’ve  gone  right  now.  And  the  question  is,  How  can  we 
improve, really, the utilization of the funds that we have available? 
I  would  like  to  go  into  some  of  the—we  all  have  available  the 
GAO  reports.  What  has  really  happened  is  that  the  Deepwater 
funds have been used for—increasingly, for maintenance and repair 
and  restoration  of  existing  facilities,  and  not  for  modernization. 
That’s  not  the  Coast  Guard’s  fault.  It’s  not  anyone’s  fault.  It’s  the 
result of 9/11 and of the change of the society. 

Now,  Admiral,  have  you  reshaped  your—do  I  understand—is 

that what I understand? You’re going to get a——

Admiral  COLLINS.  Yes,  sir.  On  the  25th,  you’ll  see  the  new  re-
vised plan that’ll—new timeline and some of the changes and when 
each asset starts to appear—you know, the sequence of them. And, 
as  I  mentioned,  for  example,  we  have  adjusted  the  ship  schedules 
of  the  two—the  there’s  classes  of  ships—the  two  lower  classes, 
we’ve  moved  that  schedule  to  the  left,  or  we’ve  advanced  that  de-
sign schedule, given the current condition of the legacy systems. So 
the  idea  is  to  get  those  new  ones  starting  to  come  onboard  sooner, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

43

rather  than  later,  so  we  can  reduce  the  amount  of  money  we  have 
to invest in the maintenance. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  I  appreciate  that.  I  mean,  we  are  going 
to  some  smaller  ships.  I  was  told  the  other  day  the  Chinese  are 
building  a  ship  now  that’s  got  45  knots  on  it,  and  it’s  the  size  of 
our  small  destroyers  from  World  War  II.  Most  of  the  navies  of  the 
world  are  going  to  smaller,  faster  ships.  Are  you  going  to  do  the 
same thing? 

Admiral  COLLINS.  Yes,  sir.  Of  course,  we’ve  been  in  the—you 
know,  below  the  frigate  category  forever,  building  smaller  vessels. 
That’s where we are. Those three classes of ships are, I think, well 
conceived. The lowest one, the smaller one, the patrol-boat replace-
ment,  Senator,  is  a—we’re  very  excited  about  it—it’s  a  composite 
technology  design.  And  the  advantage  of  that  is  that  it  has  double 
the  life  of  a  steel  hull,  less—a  lower  life-cycle  maintenance  to  it. 
And  that’s  going  to  be—we’re  going  to—presently  designing  that, 
and have a sort of a proof of concept, the prototype, that Northrop 
will be building down in Pascagoula. That’s being designed as part 
of  the  2006  budget.  So  that’s  great  use  of—that’s  innovation  to  ex-
tend the life of these five forms, to reduce the maintenance and the 
maintenance  burden  on  the  crews,  and  so  forth.  So  we’re  excited 
about that. 

The other thing we’re doing——
Senator STEVENS. Let me interrupt. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. What size is that vessel? 
Admiral  COLLINS.  It’s—really,  it’s  conceptual  design  right  now, 

Senators, but 140 feet. 

Senator STEVENS. Do you want to comment, Ms. Wrightson? 
Ms. WRIGHTSON. Yes, I would, thank you. 
I  have  two  things  I’d  like  to  add  to  the  discussion  which  I  think 
might  help.  Number  one,  we  have  work  ongoing  now  on  the  condi-
tion  of  legacy  assets,  and  we  will  be  issuing  that  report  this  sum-
mer.  Work  to  date  suggests  that,  while  it  takes  a  fair  amount  of 
digging  and  qualitative  data  to  show  it,  the  Coast  Guard’s  assets 
really do have significant condition problems. But it’s important to 
distinguish  between  their  aircraft  and  their  cutters  in  this  regard. 
And when you think of aircraft and cutters and how much of the 
resources in Deepwater are being pulled away to take care of aging 
assets, we did an analysis for this hearing that I thought would be 
helpful. And it’s nothing that I haven’t spoken to Admiral Stillman 
about  or  that  he  doesn’t  agree  with.  We  think  there  needs  to  be 
more  transparency  in  this  situation.  For  example,  there’s  a  figure 
that’s  touted,  25  percent  of  the  Deepwater  2006  is  going  to  take 
care of legacy assets, but if you take—break that out by Deepwater 
legacy assets that are really hybrid assets and are going to be part 
of  the  Deepwater  solution,  such  as  the  HC–130,  the  HH–65,  and 
the  HH–60,  which  are  their  helicopters  and  fixed-wing,  you  see 
that  20.9  percent  of  2006  is  for  those;  whereas,  for  cutters,  which 
is  truly  the  sustainment  part  of  the  picture,  it’s  only  3.9  percent. 
Even the contract management is 4.1 percent. 

So  we’re  not  seeing  the  resources  sucked  away  in  the  way  that’s 
being  discussed.  And,  in  fact,  I  would  argue,  as  I  did  to  Admiral 
Stillman,  that  accelerating  the  HH–65  represents  a  prudent  deci-
sion and an investment. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

44

ject——

So  it’s  important  to  have  that  kind  of  transparency  in  the—in 
looking  at  it,  without  at  all  discounting  the  cost  of  maintenance 
that you mentioned, Senator, are rising exponentially. That is true. 
They’re in different accounts——

Senator  STEVENS.  Thank  you.  I  want  to  get  to  another  sub-

Ms. WRIGHTSON. Yes, thank you. 
Senator STEVENS.—Admiral. Senator Cantwell mentioned the Oil 
Spill  Recovery  Fund.  That  started  as  a  Trans–Alaska  Pipeline  Li-
ability Fund, and we changed it into a general tax on refined crude 
oil.  It’s  paid  at  the  refinery,  and  it’s  got  a  cap  of  a  billion  dollars. 
Now,  it’s  my  understanding  that,  currently,  according  to  the 
briefing  you  gave  our  staff,  that  funding  will  run  out  something 
like 2010, and, for the first time, it’s gone down below a billion dol-
lars.  But  we’re  consuming  more  and  more  oil  every  year,  and  it’s 
a fixed fee of five cents a barrel. Tell me, why are we dipping below 
the cap right now? Why do you predict that it will be—it would be 
a net loss of 200 million a year? 

Admiral  COLLINS.  Of  course,  the  tax  is  no  longer  in  effect.  I 
think—I  want  to  say—looking  at  Senator  Lautenberg—I  think  it 
was  1994  or  1995  that  was—that  tax  stopped.  And  so,  there  is 
that—incoming  source  isn’t—doesn’t—is  not  there.  That  tax  is  no 
longer in—that’s no longer in existence. 

And so, what we’ve had since—we’ve had since the mid-1990’s is 
about 19 spill cases, where the spill exceeded, you know, the liabil-
ities  of  the  spiller,  and  so  forth,  and  the  spill  had  to  be  under-
written by the fund. 

So  our  projection  is  that  continuing  negative  drain  on  this  fund 

is about 200—projected to be about 200 million. 

Senator  STEVENS.  Admiral,  I’ve  got  to  tell  you,  the  statute  says 
no tax applies if the unobligated balance in the fund exceeds a bil-
lion dollars. But you’re—you brought it down below a billion dollars 
last  year.  The  tax  should  go  back  into  effect.  I  want  to  make  sure 
we find out what’s going on here, because I don’t want to see a re-
quest for money to be appropriated to go into that fund. It is a fund 
that  is  charged  against  both  domestically  produced  and  imported 
oil  at  the  refinery.  So,  under  the  circumstances,  it  should  be  going 
back  into  effect  if  it  has,  in  fact,  dropped  down.  And  I  am  told  it 
did  drop  down  below  a  billion  dollars,  in  terms  of  the  net  in  the 
fund as of the end of last year. 

Admiral  COLLINS.  Let  me  consult  with  my  fund  center,  National 
Pollution Fund Center, and my staff on the details of that. But my 
brief was that that source is no longer available. 

Senator  STEVENS.  But  the  fund  is  still  there.  It  does  not  exceed 
a  billion  dollars  anymore.  And,  under  the  statute,  it’s  supposed  to 
go  back  into  effect  when  the  fund  drops  below  a  billion  dollars.  So 
I think you ought to have your people check it. 

Admiral  COLLINS.  We  will,  sir.  And,  of  course,  there’s  categories 
within the fund for spill response, and there may be some relation-
ship there. Let me consult with my experts on that. But, again, I’ve 
been repeatedly briefed——

Senator  STEVENS.  We’ll  consult  with  the  Finance  Committee, 
also.  But  it  does  seem  to  me—Madam  Chairman,  I  do  hope  we’ll 
look  into  the  question  of  how  the  money  is  being  used.  We  have 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

45

had  an  annual  increase  over  your  request  for—and  it  has  been  for 
the  Deepwater  Program.  But  because  of  the  circumstances  of  the 
Administration  and  the  Department,  they  have  taken,  from  the 
Deepwater  Program,  the  moneys  for  operation  and  maintenance  of 
your  existing  assets,  as  I  understand  it.  Now,  I  think  we’d  better 
have  some  conversation  about  that  with  the  Department  as  a 
whole, because I don’t see that we can continue to increase, at the 
rate  we’re  increasing  right  now  and  the  period  we’re  in—we  have 
the same problem with airplanes in the military. We have the same 
problem  with  almost  every  single  agency  of  the  Federal  Govern-
ment because of 9/11. 

Admiral COLLINS. Right. 
Senator STEVENS. 9/11. 
Admiral  COLLINS.  The  point  that  Ms.  Wrightson  made,  I  think, 
is  right  on  target.  I  mean,  she  said  that  it’s—you’ve  got  to  look  at 
that  money  that  we’ve  called  legacy  sustainment.  A  good  chunk  of 
that  portion,  sir,  is  really  an  investment  in  Deepwater,  because 
the—give  you  an  example.  The  best  example  is  the  HH–65  re-
engining. The HH–65 is not an asset that’s going to be replaced by 
Deepwater.  It’s  going  to  be  one  of  the  new  Deepwater  assets,  be-
cause  it’s  going  to  be  transformed  into  new  engines,  new  gearbox, 
and so forth. So it is, in fact——

Senator  STEVENS.  Well,  let  me  close  with  this.  I’m  using  too 
much  of  my—we  fought  putting  the  Coast  Guard  in  Homeland  Se-
curity  for  just  this  reason.  The  moneys  have  been  taken  for  home-
land  security  from  the  basic  funding  for  the  Coast  Guard  in  Deep-
water.  Now,  that’s  not  homeland  security  out  in  Deepwater,  nec-
essarily. But what you’re spending on, basically, is—40 percent in-
crease  in  deterioration  of  your  assets,  is  within  the  50  miles  off-
shore.  We’re  talking  about  further  than  50  miles  offshore,  as  I  un-
derstand it, in terms of Deepwater, right? 

Admiral  COLLINS.  Sir,  Deepwater  goes  from  our  ports  and  out, 
it’s—they’re  very  versatile  assets,  and  they  can  cover  that  whole 
range.  The  other  part—but,  again,  let  me  reiterate,  without  abus-
ing  this  point—but  the—a  lot  of  that  legacy  sustainment  category 
is, in fact, ultimate Deepwater assets. So it really is an investment 
in  the  replacement.  Not  only  the  helicopters,  sir,  but  the  part  of—
you’ll  see  the  new  baseline  report,  coming  up,  and  it  will  propose 
doing a service-life extension on the C–130’s, doing a service-life ex-
tension on the H–60s——

Senator STEVENS. Thank you very much. I look forward to——
Senator  SNOWE.  Well,  I  agree  with—and  let  me  just  say,  to  the 
Chairman’s point, because it’s a good one—we need to separate out. 
Because  if  25  percent  of  the  Deepwater  recapitalization  funds  are 
being  used  for  legacy  sustainments,  we  have  to  make  the  distinc-
tion, in terms of what is going to be continuing ongoing equipment, 
as  opposed  to  total  replacement.  So  if  we’re  investing  in  ongoing 
equipment,  that’s  one  thing.  It’s  quite  another  if  that  equipment 
needs  to  be  replaced.  And  so,  we  have  to  make  those  distinctions. 
And  I’d  appreciate  it  if  you  could  submit  to  the  Committee  a  cata-
loging of that by aircraft——

Admiral COLLINS. We would be——
Ms. WRIGHTSON. Actually, I was just——
Senator LAUTENBERG. Madam Chairman? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

46

Senator SNOWE. Yes. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Before Senator Stevens leaves, it is my un-
derstanding  that  the  tax  is  not  reinstated  once  the  trust  fund  bal-
ance  falls  below  a  billion  dollars.  That  was  an  all-time  cap;  that, 
at a billion dollars, the tax would stop being collected. Is there any 
staff question about that? Do you know, Commandant? 

Admiral  COLLINS.  Again,  I’ve  been  briefed  that  that  source  is  no 

longer available——

Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes. 
Admiral  COLLINS.—Senator,  that  the  mechanism  is  no  longer 

available to support——

Senator LAUTENBERG. Right. 
Admiral COLLINS.—that spill fund. 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Right. That’s our understanding. 
Senator  STEVENS.  We  examined  the  statute  before  we  came  in. 
We’ve got it right here. You can look at it right here. It says it re-
sumes  when  it  drops  below  a  billion  dollars.  Now,  whether  it  has 
or not——

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Well,  it  hasn’t,  but,  OK,  we’ll—thank  you. 
Senator SNOWE. Yes, we need to clarify that. 
Senator Cantwell? 
Senator  CANTWELL.  Thank  you,  Madam  Chairman.  And,  obvi-
ously,  we’re  very  interested—given  the  oil  spill  in  Puget  Sound  for 
which liability has yet to be determined—we certainly want to con-
tinue  the  program.  And  so,  we’ll  look  for  clear  resolution  of  that 
issue  and  whether  the  fund  automatically  starts  up  again  or  not. 
It  sounds  like  there  is  some  confusion  about  that,  but  it  is  my  un-
derstanding that it doesn’t automatically startup again. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. That it does? 
Senator CANTWELL. That it doesn’t. But hopefully we will get this 
resolved and get the commitment. I think we’re at least all heading 
in  the  same  direction,  even  if  we  don’t  have  agreement  yet  on  the 
current statute language. 

I’d  like  to  turn  to  the  issue  of  the  polar  icebreakers.  Part  of  the 
Administration  proposal  is  that  the  Coast  Guard  no  longer  be  re-
sponsible for the operation and maintenance of the three polar ice-
breakers.  I  don’t  know  if  you  know  why  the  Administration  has 
made the proposal to transfer maintenance and operation responsi-
bility to NFS, but I’m very interested. Don’t you think that this cre-
ates a certain amount of uncertainty regarding the stream of fund-
ing,  if  responsibility  is  transferred  to  NSF?  How  can  we  be  sure 
that the funding needed for the program is maintained if responsi-
bility  is  transferred  out  of  the  Coast  Guard?  I  think  the  Coast 
Guard’s  Ice  Breaker  Budget  is  something  like  47.5  million,  and  I 
think  estimates  are  that  closer  to  75  million  is  needed.  So  aren’t 
we  already,  with  this  proposal,  short-changing  the  operations  and 
maintenance of this program? 

Admiral COLLINS. Senator, the current thinking in that proposal 
in the 2006 was that the requirement owner—in this case, the Na-
tional Science Foundation—as the customer for this service, should 
have  the  funding  base  for  the  icebreakers,  the  three  icebreakers—
the  Healy,  the  Polar  Sea,  and  the  Polar  Star—in  their  appropria-
tion, and then allow them to articulate the requirement and justify 
the requirement to their approp’s committees. And then they would 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

47

reimburse  us  for  services  provided.  We  would  still  operate  and 
maintain.  They  would  be  the  customer,  justifying  the  money  and 
providing the money to us. So that is the theory—that is the theory 
of it. 

The problem here, of course, is that, not only—the 47 was the ex-
isting icebreaker base of funding, historical base of funding, for the 
three  breakers.  The  issue  is  a  funding  problem  relative  to  the 
short-term operation, the continued operation of those vessels, and 
then  follow-on  long  term.  Our  engineers  estimate  that,  from  2006 
to—well,  actually  2005  through  2008—that  there  is  an  additional 
requirement—and  we  keep  those  vessels  running—of  another  $14 
million  per  year  above  that  $47  million  base.  And  that  has  a  lot 
to  do  with  this  legacy-system  curve  we  talked  about.  It  has  to  do 
with—they’re  approaching  30  years  old,  they  have  been  running 
very hard. The last several years, we’ve had—except this year—the 
previous  several  years,  we’ve  had  two  icebreakers  down  in  the  ice 
because  of  the  severity  of  the  ice.  They’re  older  vessels,  and  they 
require money to keep them going. 

So that’s the fundamental dilemma. And then in the post-2009—
if you could keep them going to 2009, how do you sustain the oper-
ation? How do you have a capability for this nation in the polar re-
gions beyond that timeframe? How do you sustain this for the long 
haul? 

So  you’ve  got  a  short-term  problem  of  keeping  the  existing  plat-
forms  alive,  and  you’ve  got  a  longer-term  problem  of,  How  do  you 
sustain  the  nation’s  ability  to  exert  its  influence  in  the  Arctic  and 
Antarctic from now into the future? 

There is a——
Senator  CANTWELL.  Admiral,  how  can  you  maintain  your  oper-
ations  of  those  facilities  when  someone  who’s  determining  what  it 
takes to maintain those operations isn’t even operating those facili-
ties and is somewhere else? 

Admiral  COLLINS.  We  then—we  have  to  communicate—it  is—
there’s  a  communications  challenge.  We’ve  got  to  communicate  to 
them each year, as they prepare their budget, what the next year’s 
requirement  is.  They  have  to  put  it  in  their  budget.  They  have  to 
justify it to their appropriations staff. Then they have to, again, re-
imburse us that amount so we can provide the operation. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Just  so  I  can  be  clear:  they’re  not  involved 

in the operations and maintenance at all? 

Admiral  COLLINS.  No.  So  it  is—part  of  the  direction  was  for  us 
to develop a memorandum of agreement with NSF on the mechan-
ics  of  this  arrangement  and  how  it  would—how  it  would  play  out. 
I  have  to  be  candid  with  you  that  I  have  some  level  of  anxiety 
about  how  efficient  this  process  will  be  over  time  and  the  difficul-
ties  of  being  coordinated  and  having  everyone  on  the  same  sheet 
of music. So, it will be a challenge. 

In terms of the long-range planning for the—What is this nation 
going to do with polar icebreakers in the future?—we’re responding 
to  congressional  direction  to  conduct  a  strategic  study,  in  partner-
ship with the National Academy of Sciences. And there is a deliver-
able that’ll happen in September. It looks like it will be an interim 
report, and then a final report the following, I want to say, spring. 
But it will project the strategic requirement in the future for these. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

48

So  we’ve  got,  again,  to  make  a  long  story  short,  a  short-term 
problem  about  keeping  these  existing—Polar  Sea,  Polar  Star  alive 
and  then  a  longer  term  problem,  How  are  we  going  to  maintain 
this  capability  for  the  nation?  It’s  the  only  breakers  that  this  na-
tion has. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Are  you  concerned  that  this  change  will 

eliminate that capacity for the future? 

Admiral  COLLINS.  Yes,  I  am.  I  think  that—my  personal  opinion 
is,  this  nation—I  think  the  ultimate  study  is  going  to  say—we’ve 
done  these  studies  before.  We  did  one  in—10  years  or  so  ago  that 
said this nation needs at least three polar icebreakers. And I think 
this—I  would—I  don’t  want  to  presume  what  this  next  study’s 
going to say, but I would—if I was a betting man, I would bet some 
money  that  it  would  say,  ‘‘This  nation  needs  polar  icebreakers. 
There  is  strategic  importance  to  this  nation  to  have  an  ability  to 
exert  a  presence  in  the  Arctic  and  the  Antarctic.’’  I  think  that’s 
what  it  will—would  say.  And  I—but  we  have  to,  of  course,  do  the 
study. And we will. 

But I am concerned that this very unique capability—there’s only 
two—the  Healy  is  an  Arctic  research  vessel,  really  not  a  full-
fledged  powerful  polar  breaker.  Only  two.  And  they—at  the  end  of 
their  service  life.  We’re  at  a  very  critical  juncture  of  keeping  them 
alive  for  the  next  couple  of  years,  and  then  replacing  them,  ulti-
mately—either extending their life or replacing them. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  Admiral,  before  my  time  runs  out  in  this 
first  round,  we’ve  had  a  lot  of  discussion  from  my  colleagues  al-
ready  about  the  Deepwater  Program,  in  general.  And  one  of  the 
concerns  that  I  have  is  how  you  maintain  that  expertise,  from  a 
workforce  perspective,  in  shipbuilding.  You  mentioned  something 
about  the  new  level  of  manufacturing  in  shipbuilding  relating  to 
composites.  That’s  near  and  dear  to  the  Northwest,  because  com-
posites  are  playing  a  larger  role  in  airplane  manufacturing.  It  al-
ready  played  a  pretty  large  role  in  commercial  boat-building,  so 
we’re glad to see it transfer to the Coast Guard side. 

But  one  of  the  questions  that  I  think  would  be  important  for 
Members to know is how many of these assets right now are being 
built by foreign companies? 

Admiral COLLINS. How much of the Deepwater? 
Senator CANTWELL. Yes. 
Admiral COLLINS. Of course, all the Deepwater is consistent with 
Buy  America  and  all  the  necessary  constructs  on  that  end  of  the 
business. There are portions of a given system that are foreign. For 
example,  the  two  major  cutters—the  national-security  cutter—the 
high-end cutter and the middle cutter—their engines are Mercedes 
engines  that  are  going  in.  That  was  determined  to  be  the  best 
value  and  the  best  fit  for  the  design  of  that  ship.  The  whole  ship 
is made in Pascagoula. But portions of it could be foreign. 

The HH–65 engine replacement that we’re proceeding with right 
now—replacing engines for almost 100 helicopters, a little less than 
100  helicopters—that’s  a  Turbomeca  engine,  and—but  it’s  assem-
bled in the United States and installed in Texas, and then installed 
at  our  air—our  aircraft  repair  facility  in  North  Carolina.  And 
there’s potential for a second line in Columbus, Mississippi. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

49

is expired. 

So,  Deepwater  is  an  interesting  thing.  It’s  got  contractors  and 
subcontractors,  systems  and  subsystems,  and  suppliers  span—I 
think the latest count was 35 states. There are subcontractors, sup-
pliers, and contractors in 35 states across the country that are sup-
plying for Deepwater. 

The  one  aircraft,  fixed  wing,  the  CASA,  which  is  also  a  Deep-
water  asset,  that  is—EADS  CASA  is  Spanish  aircraft  manufac-
tured  in  Spain,  final  assembly  and  configuration  in  the  United 
States.  That’s  a  Deepwater  component.  So,  it’s  kind  of  mixed,  con-
sistent with acquisition rules and Buy America, and a lot of players 
involved. 

Senator CANTWELL. Thank you, Madam Chairman. I see my time 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you, Senator Cantwell. 
Co–Chair Inouye? 
Senator INOUYE. Thank you very much. 
I’d like to change the pace. Most Americans, Admiral, would look 
up  on  the  Coast  Guard  as  an  agency  to  guard  the  coastline  of 
America—intercepting  smugglers  and  rescuing  fishermen.  But  we 
know  that,  all  during  World  War  II  and  every  war  since  then,  the 
Coast  Guard  has  received  assignments  in  war  zones.  What  sort  of 
assets are now in war-zone assignments? 

Admiral  COLLINS.  Thank  you  for  that  question,  Senator.  And 
you’re absolutely right, we’ve been in every major war or confronta-
tion  this  country’s  had  since  1790.  And  we  played  a  role—at  the 
height  of  Operation  Iraqi  Freedom,  we  had  about  1200  men  and 
women  and  11  ships,  some  in  the  Eastern  Med.—supporting  Navy 
ops  in  the  Eastern  Med.—the  bulk  in  the  Northern  Arabian  Gulf, 
even  including  a  buoy  tender  from  Hawaii  that  supported  oper-
ations  in  the  approach  to  Umm  Qasr,  in  terms  of  aids  to  naviga-
tion. 

Currently,  we  have  six  patrol  boats  there.  They’re  working  in 
tandem  with  four  Navy  patrol  boats  in  a  unified  squadron.  The 
commodore of that squadron is a Coast Guard Captain working out 
of Bahrain. And their mission is marine intercept operations, inter-
cepting  ships  going  back,  boarding  them,  and  also  providing  secu-
rity for the very valuable offshore oil platforms for Iraq. 

The  Master  Chief  and  I  just  got  back  from  a  trip  where  we  got 
out  and—got  offshore,  got  a  little  wet  and  sloppy  and  went  out—
staged  off  the  Duluth,  the  Navy  vessel  Duluth,  took  an  11-meter 
RIB and visited all our patrol boats underway providing such secu-
rity. And there, it’s a year deployment for each one of those crews, 
Senator. So six vessels. 

Senator  INOUYE.  Are  your  people  also  in  the  Philippine  and 

China Seas? 

Admiral  COLLINS.  There  is  a—periodically,  Senator,  we  partici-
pate  in—if  you’re  familiar  with  CARAT,  which  is  Cooperation 
Afloat  for  Readiness  and  Training.  It’s  a  PACOM  engagement 
strategy  in  the  Pacific  Rim,  mil-to-mil  training  and  so  forth.  We, 
every other year, participate in that. 

We  had  the  MUNRO—Coast  Guard  Cutter  MUNRO—that—a 
high-endurance cutter that was involved in the tsunami relief with 
the seventh—under the seventh—the PACOM in the 7th Fleet, and 
provided—worked  in  that  theater,  and  now  proceeded  on—that’s 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

50

another—quite  another  vessel—we  have  it  working  with  the  Navy 
in the Med.—excuse me, in the Arabian Gulf. 

Senator  INOUYE.  And  your  ships  were  assigned  to  the  tsunami 

relief effort, also, weren’t they? 

Admiral COLLINS. Yes. We had a 378 that moved thousands and 
thousands  of  pounds  and  tons  of  relief  material,  and  we  had  two 
C–130s from Barber’s Point that also provided relief, flying into Sri 
Lanka,  the  Maldives,  Indonesia,  with  relief  supplies.  So  we’re  a 
full-fledged  armed-force  partnership.  We  have  transparent  oper-
ations  with  our  counterparts,  the  Department  of  Defense—trans-
parent,  meaning  very  highly  coordinated,  effective  operations—to 
this day. 

Senator INOUYE. So your assignments and your services are very 

similar to those of the Navy? 

Admiral  COLLINS.  We  are  interoperable  with  the  Navy,  Senator. 
We’ve spent a lot of time working—Vern Clark and I engage a lot, 
plan  a  lot,  and  develop  our  fleets  so  they  are  simpatico.  In  other 
words, non-duplicative, but complementary capability built into our 
fleet. 

Senator INOUYE. And may I now ask the Master Chief, How does 

your housing compare with naval housing? 

Chief  WELCH.  Senator,  I  think  the  Coast  Guard’s  government-
owned  housing  is  comparable  to  DoD  housing,  carte  blanche,  sir. 
We  have  done  wonderful  work  for  our  people  who  reside  on  the 
economy  by  increasing  significantly  the  basic  allowances  for  hous-
ing that they receive. Those people, throughout the country, for the 
most  part  now  have  reduced  their  out-of-pocket  housing  expenses 
to  zero.  That’s  significant.  Around  a  20-percent  increase  over  the 
course of the past 4 years. 

Government-owned quarters, in the case of the Coast Guard, sir, 
faces the dilemma of deferred maintenance; in some cases, 10-year 
maintenance  deferrals.  And  we,  as  the  Coast  Guard,  have  decided 
to pursue privatization, to the extent it makes sense and that it is 
possible. 

But,  categorically  speaking,  government  quarters  in  the  Coast 
Guard—Cordova,  Alaska,  being  probably  the  worst  of  our  worst—
is  in  poor  shape.  And  it  is  my  opinion  that  we  either  privatize  the 
housing  or  divest  the  housing  altogether,  particularly  from  a  busi-
ness case, sir. 

Senator INOUYE. Are you suggesting to me that the quality-of-life 
programs  that  you  have  are  just  as  good  as  those  of  the  Navy  or 
the Army or the Air Force? 

Chief WELCH. I think the programs, Senator, are on par with the 
rest  of  the  Department  of  Defense.  Where  the  Coast  Guard,  how-
ever, has challenges is that most of our people are assigned far be-
yond  the  bounds  of  the  facilities  offered  by  the  Department  of  De-
fense, and, in many cases, the facilities offered by our Coast Guard. 
We  are  typically  in  remote,  high-cost,  rural  sorts  of  areas.  So  we 
have  significant  challenges  to  provide  parity  with  respect  to  DoD 
quality-of-life  programs,  but  we  do  our  very  best  to  see  that  that 
happens, Senator. 

Senator INOUYE. Thank you, Master Chief. 
Chief WELCH. Thank you, sir. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

51

Senator INOUYE. Admiral, I will be submitting a question on the 
Coast Guard station on Maui, something we discussed earlier. And, 
if I may, I’d like to have a written response to that. 

Admiral  COLLINS.  Yes,  sir.  We  will  be  glad  to.  But  that’s  the 
issue where we’re looking at the adequacy of that boat to deal with 
the  current  weather  conditions  and  operational  profile  of  that  sta-
tion.  And  I  think  we’ve  come  to  the  conclusion  we’ve  got  a  mis-
match between the operational conditions there and the size of the 
boat we have. And so, we will provide some options. We’re working 
through  some  options  to  fix  that,  and  we’ll  clearly  communicate 
that to your staff. 

Senator  INOUYE.  My  last  question,  if  I  may,  Madam  Chair.  Dis-
trict  14  has  responsibility  for  the  largest  geographical  area.  That’s 
correct, isn’t it? 

Admiral COLLINS. It sure is, sir. 
Senator INOUYE. However, it has the smallest billet of personnel. 

Is that correct? 

Admiral COLLINS. It’s one of our smaller districts, absolutely. 
Senator INOUYE. Smallest number of cutters? 
Admiral COLLINS. Um——
Senator INOUYE. I think I’m correct. 
Admiral COLLINS. You’re probably correct. 
Senator  INOUYE.  And  the  smallest  number  of  aircraft.  How  do 
you  explain  the  largest  area  having  the  smallest  number  of  per-
sonnel and assets? 

Admiral COLLINS. I think you’ve got to look beyond the numbers 
and  look  what  the  capability  that  we  build  into  those  ships  that 
we—the ships that are there, as you know, are high-endurance cut-
ters, they’re very capable cutters. They have long legs, longer legs. 
And  the  C–130s  have  long  legs.  That’s  a  reason  C–130’s  are  in—
at  Barber’s  Point  and  sustained  there.  So  what  we’re  trying  to  do 
is put—and we’ve got, of course, three brand-new buoy tenders that 
we’ve  put  in—so,  in  terms  of  the  workload,  the  aids-to-navigation 
workload  relative  to  buoy  tenders,  for—to  give  you  an  example—
is  a  pretty  good  match.  So  we’re  trying  to  match  capability  and 
workload  with  the  type  of  assets.  And  I  think  we—other  than—
and,  of  course,  we’ve  got  a  new  coastal  patrol  boat  there—other 
than  Maui,  I  think  we’ve  got  a  pretty  good  match  between  work-
load, capability, and the type of assets. 

Senator  INOUYE.  So  you  have  sufficient  assets  to  carry  out  your 

mission? 

Admiral COLLINS. To optimize every mission, probably not. To be 
able  to  respond  to,  on  a  risk  basis—allocate  to  the  highest  risk, 
that’s  what  we  do—I  think  we’re—this  budget  clearly  will  help  us 
continue to do that. 

Senator INOUYE. I thank you very much, sir. 
Admiral COLLINS. Thank you, Senator. 
Senator INOUYE. Thank you, Madam Chairman. 
Senator SNOWE. Thank you, Senator Inouye. 
Senator Lautenberg?

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

52

STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 
Senator LAUTENBERG. Thanks, Madam Chairman. 
And, first, I want to say to our two uniformed friends at the table 
that we’re proud of your service, both individually and collectively. 
And  I  would  also  tell  you  that  I  don’t  remember  seeing  as  many 
hash  marks,  Chief,  as  you’ve  got  there.  I  don’t  know  whether 
they’re putting lights on or what, but there are a lot of them. They 
signify a lot of service. And thank you for your excellent testimony. 
Admiral,  you  and  I  have  known  each  other  for  some  time.  But 
hearing your report is really significant, and it was just a very good 
idea to make your statement here. 

Madam  Chairman,  you  said  something  before.  You  talked  about 
reality—What’s the reality here? When we look at the Coast Guard 
we  realize,  as  you  know,  that  the  assignments  have  changed  so 
radically.  It’s  my  view  that  the  combat  theater  for  the  war  on  ter-
ror  has  moved  from  Iraq  and  Far  East  to  the  internal  boundaries 
of the United States. As a consequence, you’re on a lifesaving mis-
sion every day, whether—and I’m not just talking about search and 
rescue,  I’m  talking  about  this  constant  high-tempo,  on-guard  mode 
that  you’re  in.  I’m  on  the  Hudson  River,  and—funny  enough—you 
had  not  only  bi-coastal  representation  here,  to  use  the  expression, 
but you also had—before my two colleagues left, you had 240 years 
of mankind. All three of——

[Laughter.] 
Senator LAUTENBERG.—all three of us are veterans of World War 
II,  and  I  think  we’re  the  only  ones  remaining  in  the  Senate  who 
were in the combat theater. 

And so, when I looked at the assignment, Madam Chairman and 
colleagues  on  the  Committee,  it’s  extremely  difficult  and,  Ms. 
Wrightson,  you  do  a  great  job,  and  your  report  was  excellent,  but 
I take exception with it, not to the extent that we ought to correct 
what  it  is  that  we’re  not  doing  well,  in  terms  of  the  Administra-
tion’s effort but even farther, we ought to try to catch up. Without 
looking  at  this  thing  in  its  global  context—and  I’m  not  talking 
about  the  Earth—I’m  talking  about  where  Coast  Guard  used  to  be 
as  a  service  and  what  the  missions  were  and  NAVAIDs  and  buoys 
and,  you  know—I  was  a  bit  of  a  sailor,  and—all  those  things  are 
important. We built a gigantic marine industry that only one coun-
try  has  in  its  entirety,  and  that’s  America.  And  the  Coast  Guard 
helped  build  this  by  being  out  there  to  help  when  mariners  are  in 
distress and by making sure that the navigation obstacles are iden-
tified,  and  so  forth.  But  the  list  of  assignments  just  kept  getting 
bigger and bigger and bigger. 

I  would  ask  you,  What  was  the  maximum  population  of  people 
in  uniform,  Admiral,  at  any  time  in  the  history—recent  history  of 
the Coast Guard? 

Admiral  COLLINS.  Well,  World  War  II,  we  had  240,000  people  in 
the  United  States  Coast  Guard.  That,  of  course—it  was  a  wartime 
footing. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  What  would  you  say,  post-World  War  II? 
Admiral  COLLINS.  We’re—we  are  starting  to  approach  the  level 
that  we  were  at  in  the  late  1960’s—was  probably  the  high  point, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

53

in  terms  of  the  population  of  the  Coast  Guard.  I  can  give  you—I 
can get you some historical data on that. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  It’s  just  general  reference.  Because  I  lis-
ten—and  this  is  not  just  for  Ms.  Wrightson’s  benefit,  but  just  any-
body  who  might  hear  what  we’re  discussing—and  that  is,  not  only 
has the personnel reduction been significant over the years, but the 
legacy  equipment,  all  of  that—my  daughter  had  the  privilege  of 
swinging  the  bottle  of  whatever  was  in  there  at  the—I  think  the 
cutter  Mohawk,  if  I’m  not  mistaken.  And  that  was  thought  to  be 
new  and—and  when  we  talk  about  ships  that  are  60  years  old,  or 
50 years old, or 40 years old, and just know what the maintenance 
requirements  are  like,  we’re  not  being  realistic.  So  we  have  larger 
assignments,  more  assignments—and  the  question  about  oil  spill 
came  up  with  Senator  Stevens.  The  oil  spill  that  we  recently  had 
in the Delaware River is—it’s going to cost substantially over $100 
million.  The  liability  limit  for  the  carrier  is  $45  million.  So,  there 
it  is.  And  we’ve  had  these  massive  spills.  One  of  the  biggest  ones 
was probably Exxon Valdez. And we’re still paying a price for that 
spill.  We  had  someone  down  from  Alaska  who  picked  up  a  rock  on 
the  beach—no  depth  to  it—inches—and  there’s  still  an  oil  pool 
below—just  below  the  surface,  or  right  at  the  surface,  left  over 
from 15 years ago. 

So,  I’m  concerned  about  the  breadth  and  the  expansion  of  the 
Coast Guard’s assignments, and the depth of their responsibilities. 
When  I  look  out  the  Hudson  River  from  where  I  live,  and  where 
I  used  to  be  able  to  see  the  World  Trade  Centers  very  clearly,  the 
empty  space  now  is  a  constant  reminder  of  what  happened  on  9/
11. And I see a couple of fellows out there—it looks like either rub-
ber or fiber little tenders out there, with the blue light and the ma-
chine  gun,  and  I  see  the  Coast  Guard  is  out  there.  That  can’t  be 
very  interesting  duty,  but  they’re  out  there  doing  it,  and  doing  it 
diligently.  Wherever  we  look,  we  always  want  to  know  that  the 
Coast Guard is nearby. Maybe that comes from my ‘‘on-water’’ days 
as a recreational sailor, but it is still true for many Americans. 

So, I start and end with a commendation of the Coast Guard, the 
services that you bring, and to say that we’ve got to face up to the 
lack  of  serious  response  by  our  government,  in  terms  of  maintain-
ing  a  fleet  that  doesn’t  require  so  much  of  its  energy,  so  much  of 
its  resource  expended  on  keeping  things  going  that  should  have 
been  retired.  Now,  I  look  in  the  mirror  sometimes,  and  I  say  the 
same thing about me. But——

[Laughter.] 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.—the  fact  of  the  matter  is  that  it  takes  a 

fair amount of maintenance to keep these old——

[Laughter.] 
Senator LAUTENBERG.—old ships afloat. 
I  forgot  about—I’m  reminded  that  Senator  Warner  and  Akaka 

also served in uniform, World War II. 

So, one thing I want to ask you before I close up here. The Coast 
Guard’s  report,  Admiral,  on  the  Oil  Pollution  Act  of  1990,  we’re 
still waiting. What’s the status of that report. Can you tell me? 

Admiral  COLLINS.  We’re  looking  at  the—an  April  timeframe,  no 
later  than  the  end  of  April,  to  get  that  report.  It’s  in  the  final 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

54

stages  of  review,  and  that’s  the  timeframe  we’re  looking  at  now, 
Senator. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. It’s really critical. And the debate that we 
had  about  whether  or  not  the  trust  fund  gets  replenished  is  some-
thing we have to sort out, because we don’t think that there is the 
provision that automatically kicks in to replenish the base. 

Ms. Wrightson, do you have any knowledge of that? 
Ms.  WRIGHTSON.  You  know,  while  that  discussion  was  going  on, 
I was thinking to myself that, if it would be of assistance, we would 
ask  our  GAO  lawyers  to  take  a  look  at  it  and  get  the  Com-
mittee——

Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes, that——
Ms. WRIGHTSON.—an answer. 
Senator LAUTENBERG.—it would be very——
Ms. WRIGHTSON. Absolutely. 
Senator LAUTENBERG.—very helpful. 
And  the—one  of  the  things  that  concerns  us  is  the  fact  that  the 
IG  has  found  major  problems  with  port-security  funding,  because 
the funds, largely, are not based on security risk at the ports. Now, 
does  the  Coast  Guard  have  a  role  in  deciding  which  ports  get  spe-
cial  attention,  particular  attention?  Do  you  have  the  liberty  of  as-
signing  resources  to  these  places?  Or  is  that  coming  from  the  Sec-
retary’s office? 

Admiral COLLINS. Sir, our—the extent of our involvement is, sort 
of,  as  a  expert  witness.  We  provide,  both  at  the  field  level—our 
Captain  of  the  Ports  will  review  the  grant  applications,  from  a 
maritime-security  perspective  and  their  knowledge  of  the  port  and 
the  port  vulnerability  assessment  that  has  been  conducted  in  the 
port,  and  so  forth,  and  makes  some  comment  about  the  merits  of 
that  particular  application.  And  then  that  goes  up  at  the  national 
level, and there is another interagency body that reviews that. But 
the ultimate decision is at the Secretary level, sir. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. And, Ms. Wrightson, will the GAO look at 

the problem about this——

Ms.  WRIGHTSON.  We  actually  have  work  ongoing  for  a  different 
Committee  on  the  Coast  Guard’s  efforts,  which  I  would—I  don’t 
want  to  be  premature,  but  our,  sort  of,  leading  edge  in  using  risk-
based management in resource-allocation decisions——

Senator LAUTENBERG. But we——
Ms. WRIGHTSON.—the—we will, and it will probably be issued in 

the early summer. I’ll make sure you get a copy. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  All  right.  Because  if  we  leave  the  Coast 

Guard out of it, the——

Ms. WRIGHTSON. Oh, we’re——
Senator LAUTENBERG.—the generic question——
Ms.  WRIGHTSON.  Right.  We’re  looking  at  it  from  the  DHS  per-

spective, as well. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Madam  Chairman,  thank  you  very  much. 

And I commend you for having called this hearing——

Senator SNOWE. Thank you. 
Senator LAUTENBERG.—and for your conduct of it. It really got—

we got to the nub, I think, of things today. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Thank  you,  Senator  Lautenberg,  and  thank  you 
for your contributions here this morning. They certainly are invalu-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

55

able  to  the  goal  that  we  all  share  and  want  to  accomplish  as  a  re-
sult of this hearing. 

I just have a couple of questions. And the remainder we will sub-

mit for your responses. 

Admiral  Collins,  I  wanted  you  to  respond  to  Ms.  Wrightson  and 
the GAO with respect to the schedule slippages. I understand that 
it could be well exacerbated with the rebaselining. And I would like 
to  have  you  address  that  question.  Have  you  been  able  to  resolve 
those issues for the future? 

Admiral  COLLINS.  In  terms  of  the  GAO  audit  on  the  project  and 
the project management, I think there was a—Ms. Wrightson, cor-
rect  me  if  I’ve  got  the  number  wrong—I  think  it  was  11  different 
issues that were cited. And we’ve been working collaboratively with 
GAO  to  address  each  and  every  one  of  those.  And  some  have  been 
a  check  next  to  them  that  they’ve  been  addressed,  others  are  still 
work  in  progress,  as  Ms.  Wrightson  has  noted.  And  we  feel  that 
they’re  very  valuable  contributions  or  recommendations  that 
they’ve  made,  whether  it’s  how  we  coordinate  the  project  teams, 
how  we  ensure  cost  competitiveness,  and  the  like,  were  the  rec-
ommendations,  and  we  take  them  very,  very  seriously,  and  we’re 
working hard to put them into effect. 

Some  of  the  schedule  slippage,  you  know,  is  a  function—overall, 
in  the  project  management  perspective—is  a  function  of  what—
when  you  get  the  dollars,  you  know,  and  what  level  of  dollars  you 
get,  relative  to  the  initial  schedule  implementation.  You  know, 
that—it  required  a  certain  amount  of  dollars,  the  implementation 
plan, as designed. We said, ‘‘We need X amount of dollars, adjusted 
for inflation on this timeline to keep this schedule.’’ In the first sev-
eral  years  of  Deepwater,  we  did  not  get  those  levels.  And  so,  that 
directly impacted the schedule. 

Other  cases,  we’ve  taken  a  breather  on  a  system  or  subsystem 
because  we  thought  we—we  had  some  issues  that  had  to  be  dealt 
with, and, before launching forward, we wanted a pause. An exam-
ple  is  the  conversion  of  the  110  to  123.  It  has  some  initial  struc-
tural  problems—the  MATAGORDA  is  the  name  of  the  vessel—and 
we  needed  to  totally  evaluate  that,  make  the  appropriate  adjust-
ments, and do operational evaluation on it before we made an addi-
tional  commitment  for  additional  hulls.  I  think  that  was  the  right 
thing to do. And so, every one, I think, has been a prudent decision. 
But  the  real  driver  on  schedule,  it  all  comes  down  to  cash-flow. 
I  mean,  I—and  hopefully  there—we  will  minimize  schedule  slip-
page  based  on  management  problems.  We  want  to  minimize  that. 
And  with  the  help  of  GAO,  we’ll  continue  to  refine  and  improve 
that,  to  eliminate  that,  or  reduce  that  as  a  cause  of  this  slip.  But 
there’s, again, certainly variables in there. 

Senator  SNOWE.  Ms.  Wrightson,  do  you  have  anything  to  add  on 

that particular question? 

Ms.  WRIGHTSON.  Well,  I  would  concur  that—you  know,  that 
we’ve had a constructive engagement with the Coast Guard in this. 
And in the next month or so, I plan to meet with Admiral Stillman 
and go over the list again. 

I want to make one compliment to the Coast Guard, and one cau-
tion on this. We had an issue last year with the Coast Guard’s not 
updating  its  master  schedule.  And  in  an  acquisition  of  this  kind, 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

56

it’s  very  important  for  them  to  understand  the  relationship  be-
tween  the  subcontracts  the  first  year,  and  so  on.  They  have  done 
that  now,  and  it  should  give  them  a  much  better  visibility  into 
where  they  are  with  each  particular  part  of  the  acquisition,  and 
that should help. 

Other  things,  though,  are  well  beyond  their  control.  And  just 
speeding up the dollars won’t do it. HH–65, good example, doubled 
the  money  the  Coast  Guard  wanted.  The  Coast  Guard  is  probably 
not going to make a 24-month implementation schedule. If they try 
to  do  it,  they  could  be  at  risk  for  paying  premiums  to  the  contrac-
tors who do the work. They could be at risk of taking too many as-
sets out of service. 

So,  we  want  to  be  cautious.  I  appreciate  the  admonition  to  be 
kind  to  the  Coast  Guard,  as  Senator  Lautenberg  said.  But  I  think 
our relationship with the Coast Guard is just right, and we’re con-
tinuing to work the issue. 

Thanks. 
Senator  SNOWE.  Yes,  that’s  certainly  been  my  perception.  And 
you work very well together, and I appreciate that, because it bene-
fits everybody. So, it’s a very constructive relationship, and a coop-
erative  one,  so  it  makes  it  work,  and  we  thank  you  for  that,  and 
we applaud you, as well. 

Would you be evaluating this rebaselining report, as well? 
Ms.  WRIGHTSON.  Absolutely.  We  continue  to  monitor  Deep-

water——

Senator SNOWE. OK. 
Ms.  WRIGHTSON.—and  provide  our  comments  to  the  Committee 

and others and the Coast Guard. 

Senator SNOWE. Thank you. 
Master Chief Welch, I want to ask you a couple of questions. One 
is  on  a  very  high  retention  rate.  What  accounts  for  that?  Do  bo-
nuses help? An 89.5 percent retention rate is amazing, I really ap-
plaud  you,  Admiral  Collins,  and  all  the  men  and  women  of  the 
Coast Guard. I think that’s astounding. 

Chief  WELCH.  Yes,  Madam  Chair.  As  you  know,  there  are  many 
variables that impact retention, whether in the Coast Guard or ex-
ternally.  But  I  believe  that,  as  a  result  of  our  Commandant’s  sin-
cere  and  productive  efforts  to  improve,  not  only  the  quality  of  life, 
but  the  quality  of  work  for  our  work  force,  is  probably  the  single-
most important governing factor. 

Never during the course of my career has there been a 3-year pe-
riod in which so many people initiatives have been delivered to our 
work  force.  Tuition  assistance  has  been  significant,  in  terms  of 
helping our people pursue their education. It’s also a very effective 
retention  tool.  We  have  made  significant  investments  to  provide 
our people with other personal and professional-development oppor-
tunities,  some  of  which  I  mentioned  during  my  verbal  statement. 
We  have  a  senior  enlisted  command  master-chief  course.  We  have 
enlisted cadre in with the core cadets at the Coast Guard Academy. 
We’ve  expanded  our  leadership  school  throughput.  We’ve  intro-
duced  an  enlisted  professional  military  education  program.  We’ve 
revised our Class A School training curriculum. 

Our mission also drives high retention, because the whole notion 
of  being  a  humanitarian  service  with  full-time  employment  in 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

57

peace and at war and at the same time has a great deal of positive 
feel to it. 

And, last, Madam Chair, I would like to say that also at no point 
during  my  25-year  career  have  I  heard  the  word  ‘‘patriotism’’  by 
the  young  men  and  women  of  our  service  as  I  have  in  the  course 
of the past 3 years. 

Thank you. 
Senator SNOWE. That says it all. And we deeply appreciate that, 
and  we’re  profoundly  grateful.  I  know  I’ve  seen  them  on  the  front 
lines, and I just think they’re extraordinary. Thank you. 

Chief WELCH. Thank you. 
Senator SNOWE. Thank you. 
Senator Cantwell? 
Senator  CANTWELL.  Thank  you,  Madam  Chairman.  And  thank 
you,  Master  Chief,  for  that  last  comment.  We  had  a  celebration  in 
Seattle  at  Maritime  Days  where  we  had  members  of  the  Coast 
Guard  and  various  National  Guard  services  back  from  Iraq  who 
helped  with  the  deployment  of  goods  in  Basra.  It  was  exciting  to 
see  the  interagency  involvement  and  the  success  of  that  operation 
of  both  public-  and  private-sector  individuals  and  various  agencies 
working together to make that mission successful. 

Admiral  Collins,  I  had  a  question  for  you  that  is  in  regards  to 
the  security  mission  of  the  Coast  Guard.  And  I  know  you  have  a 
list of over $100 million in additional funding requests for security 
on the unfunded priority list, for needs not in the budget. Does that 
mean  we  have  serious  gaps?  That’s  an  awfully  big  number  for  an 
unfunded  list,  and  it  leaves  one  questioning  where  that  leaves  us. 
Admiral  COLLINS.  Right.  This  was  the—as  you  may  know,  Sen-
ator, this is the first year that the Coast Guard has submitted such 
a  list,  that  this  was  prior—this  was  a  tradition  for  the  other  serv-
ices to their committees to provide this type of mission and the in-
formation,  and  then  the  guidance  last  year  in  legislation  called  for 
me to do this. 

Basically,  this  represents—you  know,  if  you  had  the  next  dollar, 
beyond  the  President’s  budget,  you  know,  where  would  it  fall? 
What  are  your  highest  priorities  beyond  the  President’s  budget? 
Clearly,  the  President’s  budget,  as  submitted,  reflects  the  highest 
priorities  of  the  United  States  Coast  Guard.  And  this  is  if  there 
was  additional  resources,  where  would  you  put  it,  and  why?  And 
it’s  listed  in  priority  order,  that  list.  And  it’s  very  consistent  with 
our  priorities  in  the  2006  budget,  because  the  number-one  item  is 
Deepwater,  over  $600  million  of  that  total.  The  next  one  is  legacy 
asset  sustainment,  or  current-day  readiness.  We’re  managing  fu-
ture  readiness  with  Deepwater,  and  current  readiness  with  legacy 
sustainment. Those are our two top priorities, and they absorb the 
vast percentage of that request. So I think it reads very consistent 
with the 2006 budget, very consistent with the dialog we’ve had in 
this  Committee  this  morning.  And  it  would  help,  obviously—we’re 
the  subject  of  macroeconomics  and  budget  tradeoffs  and  all  those 
things that happen, and we’re thankful for the support in the 2006 
budget  from  the  Administration  and  the  Secretary,  and  these  just 
represent the next increment that would allow us to move out a lit-
tle more sharply——

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

58

Senator  CANTWELL.  Well,  Admiral,  would  you  say  that  you  have 
enough assets, particularly, say, at District 13 in the Northwest, to 
implement  security  protocols  if  the  maritime  threat  level  is  ele-
vated? 

Admiral  COLLINS.  I  think  so.  And  we’ll  continue  to  refine  and 
look  at  that—dynamic  process,  not  a  static  one.  We’ve  added  new 
patrol  boats,  we’ve  added  new—we’ve  got  a  contract  that  would—
with  Safeboat,  from  up  there—for—they’re  terrific  boats,  by  the 
way, Senator—that are outfitting across the Coast Guard that—the 
perfect boat for coastal port security. And we’ve rolled those in. 

We’ve created 13 new commands called Maritime Safety and Se-
curity  Teams  around  the  country,  one  of  which  is  in  Seattle—I  be-
lieve,  the  first  one  is  in  Seattle  that  we  put—and  those  are—
that’s—those  are  huge  accomplishments.  And  in  the  2006  budget, 
we  have  the  enhanced  Maritime  Safety  and  Security  Team,  which 
even a—sort of, even a higher-end assault capability team that we 
have available now, as well. 

So,  we’re  building  out  at  a  pace  that  makes  sense,  I  think,  and 
we’re  building  it  out  at  a  pace  that  we  can  manage,  I  think.  And 
it would—so, I’m pleased where we are. I’m pleased where the 2006 
budget supports continued progress in this area. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  With  the  majority  of  the  nation’s  car/pas-
senger  ferries  in  the  Northwest,  where  do  you  think  we  are  in  im-
plementing  security  requirements  for  that  system?  Since  9/11  this 
Committee  has  frequently  discussed  security  implementation  as  it 
relates  to  air  transportation,  most  recently  in  a  security  bill,  and 
rail  transportation,  yet  we  have  millions  of  Americans  transported 
back  and  forth  on  this  ferry  system.  Where  do  you  think  we  are 
on  implementing  security  plans  with  respect  to  Washington  State 
ferries? 

Admiral COLLINS. Our focus—it’s subject to the Maritime Trans-
portation  Security  Act  and  the  regulation  that  we’ve  promulgated. 
The  ferry  system  is  included  in  the  MARSEC,  Maritime  Security, 
condition  1,  2,  and  3,  and  some  of  the  things  we  do  in  each  phase 
of  that.  And  Seattle  is  our—one  of  our  primary  focuses,  Puget 
Sound, because our focus is on high-capacity ferries, ferries with—
and  those  are—we  define  as  people—over  500  passengers.  And 
you—and  Seattle,  Puget  Sound  area,  is  the  largest  is  the  operator 
of  high-capacity  ferries,  by  far,  in  the  country—22  of  them,  over 
500 people. 

And  we—although  there’s  no  specific  threat  that  says,  ‘‘This  is 
going to happen at this time,’’ the general vulnerabilities and risks 
associated  with  that  kind  of  transportation,  with  that  kind  of  peo-
ple carrying—in the particular case of Puget Sound, carrying vehi-
cles—it  is  the  vehicle-carrying  ferry  system.  And,  you  know,  the—
one  of  the  major  tactics  of  terrorist  organizations  and  terrorists  is 
using  vehicles  to  carry  explosives.  And  so,  that  whole—all  those 
variables  together  means  we’ve  really  got  to  pay  attention  to  this 
as a—from the state, local, and federal perspective. 

What we’ve tried to do is collaborate—and we’ve had enumerable 
discussion with Washington State ferry folks—and how we put this 
together—that  provides  you  the  kind  of  deterrence  you  need  and 
the  transparency  of  potential  threats,  while  not  adversely  impact-
ing  the  flow  of—which  is  commuter  system—the  flow,  and  not  im-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

59

pinging on anyone’s rights. And so, we’ve—there’s a careful balance 
to  put  that  all  together.  And  I  think  we’re  striking  the—we’ve 
struck the right balance. 

I  refrain  from  talking  about  the  actual  screening  levels,  because 
they’re—that’s  classified.  But  I’d—pleased  to  give  you  a  classified 
brief on that. But I think we’ve set screening levels that are—we’ve 
done  it  collaboratively,  and  that  make  sense  for  the  environment. 
We’ll continue to tweak that. 

Senator  CANTWELL.  So  you’re  satisfied  with  the  direction  that 
we’re  going  today,  and  you  have  no  concerns  about  this  unfunded 
priority list, as it relates to the ferry system? 

Admiral  COLLINS.  No,  I’m  pleased  where  we’re  going  with  the 
ferry. If the question is—the ferries—I’m pleased where we’re going 
with that. We’re going to—again, it’s a—again, continue to evaluate 
the  risks,  the  threats,  and  the  consequence  type  of  an  assessment 
of  that.  We  have  funded  over—I  want  to  say  $1.6  million,  as  I  re-
call,  in  R&D  funding  to  look  at  the  study  of  vehicle-borne  explo-
sives, relative to carriage in ferries and all that. We’ve looked at—
tried  to  take  a  systems  look,  and  look  at  what  the  technology  of 
that—the  vulnerabilities  of  that,  and  the  threats  of—the  con-
sequences  of  those  kind  of  threats.  And  we’ll  continue  to  do  that. 
And as—work with the stakeholders involved to make adjustments 
over time, as required. 

But  I’m  really  happy  where  we  are.  We  just  had,  about,  I  want 
to say, a month ago, a meeting in Coast Guard headquarters of all 
the major ferry operators in the country, including the Washington 
State  system,  and  it  was—we  were  very  successful  in  getting  the 
right classification to all the private sector, so they had secret clas-
sification.  We  could  talk  very  detailed  classified  information.  I 
think  that  was  the  first  time  that  we  had  private  sector  together 
to  do  that.  I  think  we’re  leading  the  way,  and  have  been  collabo-
rative, detailed conversations. And the whole construct of Maritime 
Transportation  Security  Act  is  a  collaborative  enterprise.  You 
know,  we’ve  learned  from—I  think  we’ve  learned  from  the  Oil  Pol-
lution  Act  of  1990  and  that  infrastructure  we  created,  and  we’ve 
created a similar type of thing with area maritime security commit-
tees, where all the stakeholders from port are—can participate and 
get their views on the table and get a common view, a collaborative 
view. 

So, a lot more work to be done, but I’m happy with where we are. 
I’m  appreciative  of  the  support  of  this  Committee.  For  instance, 
we’ve added over 500 billets in the 2004–2005 timeframe for—2005 
mostly, to—additional capacity and force structure within our mari-
time  security  to  implement  the—force,  maritime  security  force—to 
implement the Maritime Transportation Security Act. So——
Senator CANTWELL. Well, thank you. Thank you, Admiral. 
And  thank  you,  Chairwoman  Snowe,  for  holding  this  hearing.  I 
don’t  think  there  is  an  agency  that  has  a  bigger  challenge  in  car-
rying  out  such  a  diverse  set  of  missions  than  the  Coast  Guard 
under  this  new  Homeland  Security  regime  as  well  as  continuing 
day-to-day  security  and  non-security  missions.  This  is  particularly 
true  in  the  Northwest,  where  you  have  a  major  port  with  major 
traffic,  issues  of  oil  spill,  issues  on  the  border  relating  to  moving 
illegal  drugs  and  trying  to  stop  and  intervene  that  traffic.  We  also 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

60

have  the  larger  security  mission  of  the  ferry  system  and  the  com-
plexity  associated  with  agencies  like  NSF  tied  to  the  Coast  Guard 
budget  through  the  Polar  Icebreaker.  I  can’t  imagine  a  more  com-
plex  job.  Maybe  Admiral  Collins  would  volunteer  for  an  extension 
of his command to get us through this new period. 

[Laughter.] 
Senator  CANTWELL.  I  certainly  appreciate  the  hard  work  of  the 

Coast Guard in these challenging times. 
Admiral COLLINS. Thank you, Senator. 
Senator SNOWE. I Couldn’t agree more. I certainly share the sen-
timents  expressed  by  Senator  Cantwell.  I  concur.  And  having  seen 
what  the  men  and  women  do,  and  all  of  you  who  provide  the  ex-
traordinary leadership, we thank you and we commend you. 

I  also  wanted  to  followup  on  the  Oil  Spill  Liability  Fund.  It  was 
funded  by  five-dollar  tax  back  in  1990.  And  if  the  fund  fell  below 
one  billion  prior  to  1995,  the  tax  would  reactivate.  After  1995,  the 
tax  can  only  be  reinstated  by  legislation.  Is  that  your  under-
standing? 

Admiral COLLINS. That’s what—that’s how I’ve been briefed, Sen-

ator, that it no longer is operative after the mid 1990’s. 

Senator SNOWE. OK. 
Admiral COLLINS. Without legislation. 
Senator SNOWE. Without legislation, exactly. 
Well, thank you, again. Thank you for your patience. Thank you 
for your testimony. And we’ll be following up on some of these key 
matters. 

Thank you, again. 
Admiral COLLINS. Thank you, Senator. 
[Whereupon, at 11:45 a.m., the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

A P P E N D I X

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG,

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Mr. Chairman, we often say that the world changed on September 11, 2001. And 
that  is  certainly  true  for  the  United  States  Coast  Guard.  The  Coast  Guard  has  al-
ways been a multi-mission agency with a broad and expanding range of responsibil-
ities.  Since  9/11,  however,  significant  new  Homeland  Security  demands  have  been 
placed  on  the  Coast  Guard.  Prior  to  that  tragic  day,  only  two  percent  of  the  Coast 
Guard’s operating budget was devoted to security activities. 

This year’s budget request for security activities represents 28 percent of the Coast 
Guard’s  total  budget—and  an  $81  million  increase  over  last  year.  And  that  might 
not be enough. More than $100 million in additional security needs are included in 
the Coast Guard’s list of ‘‘unfunded priorities.’’ I take a great interest in the security 
mission  of  the  Coast  Guard,  as  I’m  sure  all  my  colleagues  do.  New  Jersey  lost  700 
citizens  on  9/11 . . . and  since  then,  several  warnings  have  indicated  that  we  are 
at high risk for another attempted attack. 

The  security  mission  of  the  Coast  Guard  is  critical . . . but  we  can’t  neglect  the 
Guard’s other responsibilities. Last fall, I offered an amendment to restore $100 mil-
lion that was authorized by Congress for non-security operations, to ensure that the 
Coast Guard has the resources it needs to perform all of its missions. 

I am particularly concerned with the Coast Guard’s activities that protect our wa-
terways from pollution. Just a few months ago we had an oil spill on the Delaware 
River  that  resulted  in  a  single-hull  ship  dumping  265,000  gallons  of  crude  oil  into 
that important shipping channel and environmental habitat. Under the oil spill pro-
tection  scheme  established  in  1990  the  liability  limit  of  the  company  that  caused 
the  spill  was  only  $45  million.  Now  the  cleanup  cost  has  grown  to  more  than  $100 
million, and the Federal Government has taken it over. 

That spill alone will cost between $150–$200 million in the end. But the Oil Spill 
Liability Trust Fund only has about $800 million, and will be empty by 2010. I am 
interested  in  introducing  legislation  shortly  to  address  some  of  these  problems,  in-
cluding getting rid of single-hull vessels. 

I look forward to hearing the views of our witnesses today. 

PREPARED STATEMENT JOSEPH L. BARNES, NATIONAL EXECUTIVE SECRETARY, FLEET 

RESERVE ASSOCIATION 

Certificate of non-receipt of federal funds 

Pursuant to the requirements of the House Rule XI, the Fleet Reserve Association 
has  not  received  any  federal  grant  or  contract  during  the  current  fiscal  year  or  ei-
ther of the two previous fiscal years. 
Introduction 

Madame  Chairman  and  distinguished  Members  of  the  Subcommittee,  the  Fleet 
Reserve  Association  (FRA)  appreciates  the  opportunity  to  present  its  recommenda-
tions on the United States Coast Guard’s FY 2006 Budget. Celebrating its 80th An-
niversary,  the  Association  is  a  Congressionally  Chartered  non-profit  organization 
representing  the  interests  of  U.S.  Coast  Guard,  Navy,  and  Marine  Corps  personnel 
with regard to compensation, health care, benefits, and quality of life programs. 

Prior  to  addressing  these  issues,  FRA  wishes  to  thank  Congress  for  the  generous 
pay,  health  care  and  benefit  enhancements  enacted  in  recent  years.  Of  special  im-
portance  are  the  targeted  pay  increases  for  senior  enlisted  personnel,  health  care 
access improvements, higher housing allowances and additional benefits for Reserve 
personnel. The Association is also grateful for the passage of legislation authorizing 
the  Commandant  of  the  Coast  Guard  the  authority  to  express  his  or  her  personal 
opinion, if asked, while testifying before Congress. 

(61)

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

62

Coast Guard parity with DoD personnel programs remains a high priority for FRA 

with regard to the Coast Guard. 
Pay 

Congress  has  for  the  past  few  years  improved  compensation  that,  in  turn,  en-
hanced  the  recruitment  and  retention  of  quality  personnel  in  an  all-volunteer  envi-
ronment.  Adequate  and  targeted  pay  increases  for  middle  grade  and  senior  petty 
and  noncommissioned  officers  have  contributed  to  improved  morale  and  readiness. 
With  a  uniformed  community  that  is  more  than  50  percent  married,  satisfactory 
compensation  helps  relieve  much  of  the  tension  brought  on  by  demanding  oper-
ational and personal tempos. 

For FY 2006, the Administration has recommended a 3.1 percent across the board 
basic  pay  increase  for  members  of  the  Armed  Forces.  This  is  commensurate  with 
the  1999  formula  to  provide  increases  of  0.5  percentage  point  greater  than  that  of 
the previous year for the private sector. With the addition of targeted raises author-
ized by Congress in FY 2001, the formula has reduced the pay gap with the private 
sector from 13.5 percent to 5.2 percent following the January 1, 2005, pay hike. 

FRA,  however,  is  disappointed  that  no  targeted  pay  increases  are  recommended 
for  FY  2006,  particularly  for  mid-grade  and  more  senior  enlisted  personnel.  FRA, 
the  9th  Quadrennial  Review  of  Military  Compensation  (9thQRMC),  and  even  the 
Department  of  Defense  have  advocated  the  necessity  for  additional  targeted  pays. 
In spite of the targeted pay increases authorized in recent years, the pay of our non-
commissioned  and  petty  officers  remains  compressed,  a  situation  that  has  existed 
since the advent of the all-volunteer force. 

FRA  has  recommended  the  House  and  Senate  Armed  Services  Personnel  Sub-
committees  adopt  a  targeted  pay  table  for  FY  2006,  at  least  proportionate  to  that 
of  January  1,  2004,  and  urges  this  Subcommittee  to  support  the  initiative  as  it 
would greatly benefit Coast Guard personnel and their families. 
Health Care 

Due  in  large  part  to  the  unique  range  of  geographic  locations  in  which  they  are 
assigned,  Coast  Guard  personnel  and  their  families  often  struggle  to  find  medical 
providers  who  accept  the  TRICARE  Standard  benefit.  While  implementation  of 
TRICARE  Prime  Remote  alleviated  many  of  these  problems,  the  standard  benefit 
fee  for  service  option’s  low  reimbursement  rates  can  still  make  finding  health  care 
providers a daunting task. Unfortunately, Coast Guard personnel who choose to re-
ceive care at Military Treatment Facilities (MTFs) may have to travel long distances 
to  receive  care.  FRA  is  concerned  that  low  reimbursement  rates  will  continue  to 
make health care access a challenge for Coast Guard personnel stationed in remote 
locations. 

Dental  costs  and  associated  reimbursement  rates  are  also  challenging  for  Coast 
Guard  personnel.  For  example,  the  orthodontic  benefit  is  capped  at  $1,500  thereby 
causing  substantially  increased  personal  expenses  to  Coast  Guard  personnel,  espe-
cially in high cost areas. 

Reserve Health Care—FRA is grateful to Congress for including in the FY 2005 
National Defense Authorization Act language allowing Reservists to continue receiv-
ing  TRICARE  coverage  for  up  to  180  days  following  separation  from  active  duty. 
While  the  new  provision  will  aid  many  Reservists  who  experience  a  lapse  in  cov-
erage  following  demobilization,  more  needs  to  be  done.  Some  Reservists  have  cov-
erage through private employers, others through the Federal Government, and still 
others  have  no  coverage.  Reserve  families  with  employer-based  health  insurance 
must,  in  some  cases,  pick  up  the  full  cost  of  premiums  during  an  extended  activa-
tion.  Although  TRICARE  ‘‘kicks  in’’  at  30  days  activation,  many  Reserve  families 
prefer  continuity  of  care  through  doctors  and  their  own  health  insurance. 
Disenrollment from private sector coverage as a consequence of extended activation 
adversely affects family morale and military readiness and is a disincentive for Re-
servists  to  reenlist.  FRA  recommends  that  Congress  authorize  legislation  granting 
permanent  authority  for  cost-share  access  to  TRICARE  for  all  members  of  the  Se-
lected  Reserve  and  their  families  in  order  to  ensure  medical  readiness  and  provide 
continuity of health insurance coverage. 

Like  their  active  duty  colleagues,  many  Reserve  families  live  in  locations  where 
it is difficult or impossible to find providers who will accept new TRICARE Standard 
patients.  In  2001,  DoD  recognized  this  problem  and  announced  a  policy  change 
under which DoD would pay the premiums for the Federal Employee Health Benefit 
Program  (FEHBP)  for  DoD  Reservist-employees  activated  for  extended  periods. 
Since  the  current  program  only  benefits  about  ten  percent  of  the  Selected  Reserve 
Force,  FRA  urges  expanding  this  program  to  include  the  authority  for  federal  pay-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

63

ment  of  civilian  health  care  premiums  (up  to  the  TRICARE  limit)  for  dependents 
of mobilized Coast Guard Reserve personnel. 
Housing Standards and Allowances 

FRA  supports  revised  housing  standards  that  are  more  realistic  and  appropriate 
for each pay grade. Many enlisted personnel are unaware of the standards for their 
respective  pay  grade  and  assume  they  are  entitled  to  a  higher  standard  than  au-
thorized. Enlisted members, for example, are not eligible to receive BAH for a three-
bedroom single-family detached house until achieving the rank of E–9—representing 
only  one  percent  of  the  enlisted  force—yet  many  personnel  in  more  junior  pay 
grades do in fact reside in detached homes. As a minimum, the BAH standard (sin-
gle-family detached house) should be extended over several years to qualifying serv-
ice  members  beginning  in  grade  E–8  and  subsequently  to  grade  E–7  and  below  as 
resources allow. 

FRA  is  pleased  that  the  Administration’s  FY  2006  budget  request  includes  full 
funding for Coast Guard military pay and benefits. The Coast Guard also continues 
to receive strong support for benefit parity with DoD and is on par with DoD bene-
fits including requirements to collect Hazardous Duty Incentive Pay (HDIP). 

The  Association  appreciates  Congressional  support  for  increased  BAH  rates  for 
Coast  Guard  personnel  and  enactment  of  a  plan  to  eliminate  average  out  of  pocket 
housing  costs  over  several  years.  The  President’s  FY  2006  budget  includes  funding 
to  support  these  improvements.  BAH  rates  allow  Coast  Guard  members  and  their 
families  to  maximize  housing  choices  in  communities  where  adequate  housing  ex-
ists,  helping  alleviate  the  need  for  government  housing.  That  said,  with  a  large 
number of Coast Guard personnel stationed in high cost areas, the issue of ensuring 
that  average  out  of  pocket  costs  housing  expenses  are  eliminated  needs  to  be 
tracked closely. 

FRA  also  appreciates  enactment  of  Coast  Guard  Housing  Authorities  legislation, 
to  improve  government  housing.  As  a  result  of  this  legislation,  the  Coast  Guard  is 
proactively  exploring  the  Public  Privatization  Venture  (PPV)  program  with  the 
hopes  of  replicating  the  successes  DoD  has  experienced.  It  transferred  318  units  in 
Red Hill, Hawaii to the U.S. Army, which subsequently transferred more than 7,000 
units  to  Actus  Land  Leasing  in  October  2004.  The  Coast  Guard  has  also  entered 
into  a  similar  venture  with  the  Navy  in  New  Orleans,  and  privatization  feasibility 
studies are currently underway in Alaska and Cape May, New Jersey. 
Permanent Change of Station (PCS) Reform Initiatives 

FRA commends Congress for authorizing the Families First Program, which upon 
full  implementation  will  usher  in  much  needed  reforms  to  the  Permanent  Change 
of Station (PCS) process including the full reimbursement of the cost of lost or dam-
aged  household  goods.  The  Association  strongly  supports  full  funding  for  the  pro-
gram in FY 2006. 

Dislocation Allowance—Relocating on government orders is costly and through-
out  a  military  career,  service  members  undergo  a  number  of  permanent  changes  of 
station. Each move usually requires additional expenses for relocating to a new area 
far removed from the service members’ current location. 

Dislocation  allowances  are  authorized  for  military-ordered  moves.  To  aid  service 
members in defraying these additional costs, Congress in 1955 adopted the payment 
of  a  special  allowance—termed  ‘‘dislocation  allowance’’—to  recognize  that  duty  sta-
tion changes and resultant household relocations reflect personnel management de-
cisions of the armed forces and are not subject to the control of individual members. 
Odd as it may appear, service members preparing to retire from the Armed Serv-
ices are not eligible for dislocation allowances, yet many are subject to the same ad-
ditional  expenses  they  experienced  when  effecting  a  permanent  change  of  station 
during the 20 or more years of active duty spent earning the honor to retire. In ei-
ther  case,  moving  on  orders  to  another  duty  station  or  to  retire  are  both  reflective 
of  a  management  decision.  Retiring  military  personnel  after  completing  20  years  of 
service is advantageous to the Armed Services. It opens the ranks to much younger 
and healthier accessions. 

FRA recommends amending 37 U.S.C. § 407, to authorize the payment of disloca-
tion  allowances  to  members  of  the  armed  forces  retiring  or  transferring  to  an  inac-
tive  duty  status  who  perform  a  ‘‘final  change  of  station’’  move  of  50  or  more  miles, 
and urges the Subcommittee to support such an amendment. 

Weight  Allowances—FRA  also  recommends  modifying  PCS  household  goods 
weight  allowance  tables  for  personnel  in  pay  grades  E–7,  E–8  and  E–9  to  coincide 
with  allowances  for  officers  in  grades  0–4,  0–5,  and  0–6,  respectively.  These  allow-
ances were recently increased for grades E–1 through E–4, but weight allowance in-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00067 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

64

creases are also needed for service members in other grades, to more accurately re-
flect the normal accumulation of household goods over the course of a career. 

Shipment  of  Privately  Owned  Vehicles—Expanding  the  number  of  privately 
owned  vehicles  a  military  family  can  ship  during  a  PCS  from  one  to  two  for  per-
sonnel  assigned  to  Alaska  and  Hawaii  is  another  FRA  supported  initiative  which 
falls  into  the  category  of  family  readiness  as  well  as  PCS  reform.  This  is  an  issue 
of  particular  concern  to  Coast  Guard  personnel  stationed  in  these  locations  as  it  is 
becoming  increasingly  difficult  to  commute  to  the  workplace  of  the  now  common, 
two working adults, and would greatly benefit from the Subcommittee’s support. 
Family Readiness 

It is often said that the military recruits the service member, but retains a family. 
As our nation asks its all-volunteer force, at least 50 percent of whom are married, 
to deploy into harms way, family readiness has never been more important. 

FRA  wholeheartedly  supports  initiatives  to  enhance  survivor  benefits  to  include 
increasing  the  death  gratuity  to  $100,000  and  the  amount  of  Service  members 
Group  Life  Insurance  (SGLI)  coverage  from  $250,000  to  $400,000  at  no  additional 
cost to the service member. The Association also maintains that eligibility for death 
benefit  enhancements  should  include  dependents  of  any  service  member  who  dies 
in the line of duty regardless of whether or not the death was combat related. 

Another  effective  method  of  maintaining  a  high  level  of  family  readiness  is 
through  the  effective  and  consistent  communication  of  existing  programs  and  re-
sources  available  to  active  and  Reserve  personnel  and  their  families.  The  increased 
use of Reserve units to serve along side active duty components has caused consider-
able  challenges  for  certain  individual  Reservists.  Not  only  has  their  mobilization 
placed a strain on employment and income, but on the family as well. 

Benefits  information,  spouse  employment  assistance,  options  for  child  care  and 
guidance on utilizing the TRICARE benefit are just a few issues that are constantly 
being  updated,  creating  a  need  for  easily  accessible  and  current  information.  DoD 
services  have  worked  to  enhance  the  lines  of  communication  via  its  Military  One 
Source  web  sites,  and  the  Coast  Guard  provides  family  members  with  a  multitude 
of  resources  on  its  Personnel  Service  Center’s  web  site  ( http://www.uscg.mil/hq/
psc/ ).  Online  resources  combined  with  a  strengthened  Ombudsman  program  will 
help Coast Guard family members stay up to date on their benefits. 

Availability  and  Affordability  of  Child  Care—The  availability  and  accessi-
bility of affordable childcare is a very important quality of life issue for Coast Guard 
personnel and their families. There are approximately 700 children in Coast Guard 
childcare  facilities  and  the  program  operates  under  the  same  standards  for  care  as 
that of DoD. 

High  cost  childcare  can  often  be  attributed  to  the  fact  that  most  of  the  unit  loca-
tions preclude access to DoD and Coast Guard child development centers. As in the 
past,  FRA  stresses  the  importance  of  adequately  funding  this  important  program. 
The  Coast  Guard  continues  to  explore  ways  to  defer  childcare  costs  to  members 
in  remote,  high  cost  areas.  This  includes  exploring  possible  partnerships  with  GSA 
and private industry. FRA strongly supports these initiatives and encourages timely 
research and implementation for the benefit of personnel and their families. 
Education Benefits 

Increased  funding  for  personnel  benefits  in  the  President’s  FY  2006  budget  will 
enable  the  Coast  Guard  to  adequately  support  its  education  programs,  specifically 
the  Tuition  Assistance  Program.  This  enables  the  service  to  maintain  parity  with 
DoD.  Tuition  Assistance  is  a  high  priority  for  the  active  and  Reserve  forces  and  is 
a  key  element  associated  with  successful  recruiting  initiatives.  Enhancements  to 
this  program  and  Montgomery  GI  Bill  (MGIB)  have  significantly  impacted  recruit-
ing and retention efforts. 

FRA advocates the creation of a benchmark for the MGIB so its benefits will keep 
pace with the cost of an average four year college education. Even with the October 
1,  2004  increases  in  basic  rates,  the  MGIB  only  covers  about  60  percent  of  current 
tuition expenses. 

Coast  Guard  personnel  are  among  the  61,000  senior  enlisted  personnel  who  en-
tered service during the Veterans Education Assistance Program (VEAP) era (1977–
1985),  and  have  not  had  the  opportunity  to  sign  up  for  the  MGIB.  FRA  urges  au-
thorization  of  an  open  enrollment  period  giving  enlisted  leaders  the  opportunity  to 
sign up for increased educational benefits provided by the GI Bill. 

The  Montgomery  GI  Bill  is  often  characterized  as  a  form  of  compensation  or  as 
a  ‘‘recruiting  tool.’’  However,  FRA  would  argue  that  it  would  be  more  appropriate 
to consider the benefit an investment in our nation’s future. Military personnel can 
use  the  MGIB  on  active  duty  to  aid  in  their  professional  development,  giving  them 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00068 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

65

the  tools  to  become  better  leaders,  mentors  and  representatives  of  their  respective 
service.  Many  veterans  who  leave  the  military  and  use  the  GI  bill  to  further  their 
education have become more productive members of our society. From the offensive 
backfield  of  the  Denver  Broncos  to  the  halls  of  Congress  to  several  Fortune  500 
Companies to small businesses in Main Street, America, there are college graduates 
who  used  the  MGIB  stipend  to  help  pay  for  their  education.  These  veterans  pay 
taxes,  returning  more  in  revenue  to  the  Treasury  than  what  they  might  have  con-
tributed  without  a  degree.  ( Persons  with  Bachelor  Degrees  earn  70  percent  more  on 
average than those with a high school diploma. ) 

Our  nation  has  a  responsibility  to  ensure  the  MGIB  investment  remains  a  rel-
evant  supplement  to  completing  one’s  education.  We  must  give  our  veterans  the 
tools to excel in an academic environment. 

MGIB–SR—The  Selected  Reserve  MGIB  has  failed  to  maintain  a  creditable  rate 
of  benefits  with  those  authorized  in  Title  38,  Chapter  30.  Other  than  cost-of-living 
increases,  only  two  improvements  in  benefits  have  been  approved  since  1985.  In 
that  year  MGIB  rates  were  established  at  47  percent  of  active  duty  benefits.  This 
past  October  1,  the  rate  fell  to  27  percent  of  the  Chapter  30  benefits.  While  the  al-
lowance has inched up by only 7 percent since its inception, the average cost of tui-
tion  at  a  4-year  university  increased  by  10.5  percent  in  the  2004–2005  school  year 
alone. 

FRA  stands  four  square  in  support  of  the  Nation’s  Reservists.  To  provide  an  in-
centive  for  young  citizens  to  enlist  and  remain  in  the  Reserves,  FRA  recommends 
that  Congress  enhance  the  MGIB–SR  rates  to  the  intended  level  for  those  who 
choose to participate in the program. 

Academic  Protection  for  Reservists—There  are  cases  where  Reservists,  at-
tending  higher  institutions  of  learning,  called  to  active  duty  in  the  defense  of  the 
Nation  and  its  citizens,  lose  credits  or  prepaid  tuition  costs  because  they  did  not 
complete  the  course  of  instruction.  FRA  believes  Congress  should  adopt  legislation 
requiring  colleges  and  universities  to  retain  and  reactivate  the  credits  and  prepaid 
costs for the Reservists upon demobilization. 
Other Reserve Initiatives 

Eliminate  BAH  II—To  ensure  Reservists’  compensation  reflects  the  duties  our 
Nation  has  asked  them  to  perform,  FRA  recommends  a  policy  change  authorizing 
Reservists  activated  30  days  or  more  to  become  eligible  for  locality  based  Basic  Al-
lowance for Housing (BAH). Current policy requires Reservists serving less than 140 
days to receive ‘‘BAH–II,’’ which is generally a flat-rate amount based on pay grade 
and  marital  status  rather  than  the  market-influenced,  geographically  driven  allow-
ance that active duty personnel receive. 
Training and End Strengths 

FRA fully supports the Coast Guard’s professional development enhancements in-
cluding the placement of a senior enlisted cadre within the U.S. Coast Guard Acad-
emy  Corps  of  Cadets  for  the  purpose  of  providing  an  enlisted  perspective, 
mentorship  and  experienced  physical  guidance.  Other  initiatives  include  the  suc-
cessful  launch  of  an  Enlisted  Professional  Military  Education  Program,  increased 
participation  in  the  Coast  Guard’s  Leadership  and  Management  School  for  mid 
grade enlisted personnel, and the development of a comprehensive Unit Leadership 
Development Program (ULDP) for unit-level training. 

The Coast Guard’s focus on developing opportunities for, and encouraging partici-
pation in, professional development is a clear indicator of the service’s commitment 
to retaining quality personnel. Not only does it better prepare enlisted and commis-
sioned leaders for negotiating an oftentimes rigorous operations tempo, but it helps 
the  Coast  Guard  continue  to  define  itself  as  an  ‘‘employer  of  choice’’  for  prospective 
recruits. 
Recruiting and Retention 

FRA  is  pleased  that  the  President’s  FY  2006  budget  fully  supports  all  Coast 
Guard  recruiting  initiatives  and  incentives.  The  Coast  Guard  exceeded  its  active 
duty recruiting mission and the current retention rate within its enlisted workforce 
is  at  impressive  89.6  percent.  Increased  visibility  and  a  robust  recruiting  system 
coupled  with  enlistment  bonuses  is  enabling  the  Coast  Guard  to  maintain  a  steady 
flow of new recruits. 

The  Coast  Guard  has  also  opened  new  recruiting  offices  to  target  diversity  rich 
communities.  Increased  opportunities  for  advancement,  improved  sea  pay  and  se-
lected reenlistment bonuses contributed to the aforementioned retention rates. 

Recent  officer  continuation  legislation  as  well  as  steadily  increased  promotion  se-
lection opportunities for mid-grade officers has also helped contribute to a better of-

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00069 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

66

ficer retention rate. The Coast Guard continues the always-difficult recruiting chal-
lenge  to  meet  the  diversity  and  skill  sets  required  to  best  fill  the  future  workforce. 
USSBP Reform 

With an average age of 68 on its membership roll, reform of the Uniformed Serv-
ices  Survivor  Benefit  Plan  (USSBP)  remains  a  legislative  priority  for  the  Associa-
tion. The FRA commends Congress for passing legislation to eliminate the social se-
curity  offset,  ending  an  unfair  policy  that  adversely  affected  nearly  1.7  military  re-
tirees  and  survivors  alike,  and  views  changing  the  effective  date  for  paid-up  cov-
erage from 2008 to 2005 as the next step in reforming the plan. 

There  are  three  compelling  reasons  to  amend  the  Plan.  One,  the  cost  of  partici-
pating  in  USSBP  has  increased  from  60  percent  for  the  military  retiree  to  more 
than 80 percent allowing the Department of Defense to renege on its original charge 
to provide 40 percent of the cost. Two, the USSBP was fashioned from the survivor 
program  for  retired  federal  employees,  yet  the  military  retiree  on  the  average  will 
pay more for participating in his or her Plan. Three, the military retiree on the av-
erage  will  pay  into  the  USSBP  over  a  longer  period  than  the  federal  retiree.  Al-
though  Congress  has  adopted  a  time  for  USSBP  participants  to  halt  payments  of 
premiums  (when  payments  of  premiums  equal  30  years  and  the  military  retiree  is 
70 years of age) the date is more than three years away. Military retirees enrolling 
on  the  initial  enrollment  date  (1972)  will  this  September  be  paying  premiums  for 
33 years, by 2008, thirty-six years. FRA recommends and urges Congress to restore 
the value of participating in the program by adopting legislation to change the date 
2008 to 2005. 
Exchange/MWR Programs 

The  Coast  Guard  relies  heavily  on  vital  non-pay  compensation  programs  to  pro-
vide for the health and well-being of its personnel and their dependents, and to en-
sure good morale as well as mission readiness. 

The  Coast  Guard’s  Morale,  Welfare,  and  Recreation  (MWR)  program  and  the 
Coast  Guard  Exchange  System  (CGES)  provide  important  services  to  members  and 
their families. Proceeds from CGES sales generate funds for MWR programs includ-
ing retail stores, fitness centers, gymnasiums, libraries, and child development cen-
ters.  All  indirectly  support  the  Coast  Guard’s  mission  while  helping  ease  the  chal-
lenges and rigors of often demanding duty assignments. 

FRA  is  closely  tracking  the  development  of  DoD’s  Unified  Exchange  Task  Force’s 
proposal for shared services among military exchanges, and asks that Congress pro-
vide appropriate funding support for CGES and MWR programs to ensure the well-
being and morale of all Coast Guard personnel and their families. 
Conclusion 

Madame  Chairman,  FRA  appreciates  the  opportunity  to  submit  its  views  for  the 
record on pay, health care and other programs important to Coast Guard personnel. 
The  Association  salutes  you  and  Members  of  your  distinguished  Subcommittee  for 
effective  oversight  of  our  Nation’s  all-important  fifth  Armed  Service,  and  for  your 
untiring  commitment  to  the  men  and  women  serving  so  proudly  in  our  United 
States Coast Guard. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE TO

ADMIRAL THOMAS H. COLLINS 

Mission Balance 

Question. What checks and performance goals have you established to ensure the 
Coast  Guard  effectively  maintains  its  traditional  missions  as  well  as  its  expanded 
homeland security role? Of particular concern to myself and several Members of this 
Committee as you know is fisheries enforcement and also commercial fishing vessel 
safety (the recent tragedies in New England alone has cost the lives of 10 fishermen 
in recent months). 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  continues  to  implement  the  President’s  Management 

Agenda (PMA). 

Consistent  with  the  PMA  and  PART,  the  Coast  Guard  has  established  perform-
ance  targets  and  long-term  goals  for  each  of  the  11  Coast  Guard  missions,  as  de-
fined  in  Section  888  of  the  Homeland  Security  Act  of  2002.  The  Coast  Guard  mon-
itors  and  tracks  performance  within  each  of  these  missions,  and  documents  results 
in  an  annual  report.  The  Coast  Guard  continues  to  strive  toward  meeting  perform-
ance  targets  across  the  entire  spectrum  of  Coast  Guard  missions.  In  Fiscal  Year 
2004  the  Coast  Guard  met  or  exceeded  Fiscal  Year  2001  performance  levels  in  five 
of  its  six  non-homeland  security  missions  and  met  2004  performance  targets  for 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00070 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

67

Search  and  Rescue,  Migrant  Interdiction,  Aids-to-Navigation,  and  Marine  Environ-
mental Protection. Specifically, in Fiscal Year 2004 the Coast Guard:

formance goal of 85 percent.

• Rescued  86.8  percent  of  all  mariners  in  imminent  danger,  exceeding  the  per-
• Prevented  illegal  entry  into  the  U.S.  of  10,899  illegal  migrants—the  highest 
level  in  10  years—meeting  the  performance  target  to  interdict  or  deter  at  least 
87 percent of illegal migrants entering the U.S. through maritime means.
• Continued  to  safely  and  efficiently  manage  America’s  waterways,  meeting  Aids 
to Navigation mission performance targets, reducing the number of distinct col-
lisions (down to 218 from 280), allisions (down to 616 from 738), and grounding 
events (down 709 from 802) by 15 percent from 1,820 in FY03 to 1,543 in FY04.
• Protected  the  marine  environment  by  reducing  the  five-year  average  of  oil  and 
chemical  spills  greater  than  100  gallons  per  100  million  tons  shipped  to  22.1 
from 29.4 in Fiscal Year 2003 and well below the Marine Environmental Protec-
tion mission performance target of 41.
• Continued to focus on improving maritime safety, reducing the number of mari-
time worker and passenger injuries and deaths from 597 in 2003 to 582 in 2004, 
well below the program sub-target of 771. (Full calculation of program perform-
ance includes recreational boating fatalities, which depends on state data which 
will not be available until later this Spring).
• Broke  previous  counter  drug  seizure  records,  seizing  241,713  pounds  (previous 
record was 138,393 pounds) of cocaine and removing over 350,000 pounds of co-
caine from the marketplace. (Full calculation of the Coast Guard’s counter drug 
performance  (Removal  Rate)  depends  on  flow  rate  data  which  will  be  provided 
by the Interagency Assessment of Cocaine Movement later this Spring).
• Continued to achieve high Ice Operations and Living Marine Resources mission 
performance levels, despite just missing performance targets. Efforts in connec-
tion  with  the  Ice  Operations  mission-program  resulted  in  four  days  of  water-
ways  closures  (target  was  two  days  or  less).  The  Living  Marine  Resources  mis-
sion  achieved  a  compliance  rate  of  96.3  percent  vice  a  goal  of  97  percent—al-
though the total number of fisheries boardings soared to 4,560, the highest total 
since Fiscal Year 2001.

The Coast Guard also employs several readiness standards to ensure mission per-
formance.  For  example,  all  units  with  primary  Search  and  Rescue  responsibility 
(most  notably,  multi-mission  small  boat  stations  and  rotary  wing  air  stations)  are 
required to be able to respond within a set time frame to a distress call. Compliance 
with  these  types  of  readiness  standards  helps  to  ensure  desired  performance  out-
comes (e.g. save 85 percent of mariners in distress) are achieved. 

The President’s Fiscal Year 2006 budget requests an increase of $570 million over 
Fiscal Year 2005 funding levels, ensuring the Coast Guard is adequately funded and 
prepared  to  meet  its  mission  demands,  reduce  maritime  risk  and  improve  perform-
ance across all missions. 

In addition to sustaining current levels of operational funding, the Coast Guard’s 
Fiscal  Year  2006  budget  funds  several  recapitalizing  initiatives  (e.g.  Deepwater, 
Rescue  21,  Response  Boat-Medium,  High  Frequency  Communications  Recapitaliza-
tion),  critical  to  restoring  readiness  to  Coast  Guard  operational  assets  and  sub-
systems—the  very  foundation  of  Coast  Guard  operational  capability  and  capacity. 
The enhanced capabilities delivered through these major acquisition projects will en-
sure readiness and contribute to improved performance in all Coast Guard missions 
and activities, including fisheries enforcement and commercial fishing vessel safety. 
The Fiscal Year 2006 budget continues aggressive implementation of Maritime Se-
curity  Strategy  to  increase  Maritime  Domain  Awareness  (MDA),  operational  pres-
ence, and response posture with the ultimate goal of reducing maritime risk. Fiscal 
year  2006  initiatives  include  implementing  the  Common  Operational  Picture,  con-
tinuing the nationwide deployment of the Automatic Identification System, increas-
ing  maritime  patrol  aircraft  flight  hours,  enhancing  radiological  and  nuclear  detec-
tion  capabilities,  equipping  organic  helicopters  with  Airborne  Use  of  Force  capa-
bility,  replacing  obsolete  cutter  small  boats  with  more  capable  Cutter  Boats—Over 
the Horizon, and providing additional Response Boat-Small allowances. These initia-
tives will enhance MDA and operational presence—improving maritime security and 
the Coast Guard’s ability to perform all Coast Guard missions. 
Future Port Security Grants 

Question.  How  would  port  and  facility  operators  be  assured  that  port  security 
funds would be available to carry out the federally-mandated security plan require-
ments if a single grant program was established? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00071 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

68

Answer.  The  Office  of  State  and  Local  Government  Coordination  and  Prepared-
ness  (SLGCP)  and  the  Coast  Guard  are  currently  working  together  to  design  a  co-
ordinated  risk  management  planning  process  that  builds  on  and  compliments  work 
already accomplished under the Maritime Transportation Security Act (MTSA). The 
port-wide planning process will be prototyped during Fiscal Year (FY) 2005 and im-
plemented  as  a  program  requirement  during  FY  2006.  Development  of  this  process 
will  ensure  that  the  security  needs  of  our  ports  are  documented  and  addressed 
through  a  risk-based  framework  consistent  with  the  decision  information  needs  of 
the Targeted Infrastructure Protection Program (TIPP) program. 

DHS  is  committed  to  providing  the  resources  needed  to  secure  our  Nation’s  crit-
ical  infrastructure,  including  seaports  and  port  facilities.  The  TIPP  proposed  in  the 
President’s  FY  2006  budget  would  consolidate  grants  to  protect  critical  infrastruc-
tures  such  as  seaports,  mass  transit,  railways  and  energy  facilities  into  a  single, 
comprehensive  program  based  on  risk.  The  President’s  FY  2006  budget  request  for 
TIPP  also  represents  an  increase  of  approximately  $235  million  above  the  FY  2005 
appropriated  level  for  all  infrastructure  protection,  including  port  security,  mass 
transit security, and buffer zone protection efforts among others. 
Proposal of RDT&E Consolidation 

Question.  The  budget  request  proposes  to  consolidate  the  Coast  Guard’s  research 
and  development  efforts  within  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security’s  (DHS) 
Science  and  Technology  Directorate.  Section  888  of  the  Homeland  Security  Act  re-
quires  the  Coast  Guard  to  remain  intact  within  DHS,  and  Congress  rejected  this 
proposal last year. Could you inform the Committee as to why the Department once 
again makes this proposal when it is contrary to Section 888 of the Homeland Secu-
rity Act and it was rejected by the Congress last year? 

Answer. The intent of this proposal is not to consolidate or eliminate Coast Guard 
Research  and  Development  (R&D)  functions.  Rather,  it  is  focused  on  consolidating 
R&D  funding  to  maximize  efficiencies  and  effective  use  of  R&D  funding  across  the 
entire Department while eliminating redundant R&D efforts. The Coast Guard and 
the  Department  of  Homeland  Security’s  Science  and  Technology  Directorate  (S&T) 
are proposing to continue a productive collaborative relationship in 2006 through re-
imbursable agreements. As presented in the budget, the Coast Guard anticipates re-
ceiving  $24  million  from  the  S&T  directorate  in  FY  2006  as  reimbursement  for  the 
R&D projects it will execute. 

The  Coast  Guard  will  work  in  close  coordination  with  DHS  S&T  to  ensure  R&D 
programs  address  known  capability  gaps  and  scarce  resources  are  most  effectively 
leveraged to the Nation’s best advantage. 
Availability of RDT&E Funding 

Question.  Under  the  budget  proposal,  it  is  estimated  that  the  Service’s  Research 
and Development Center could receive up to $24 million in Fiscal Year 2006 for the 
research  and  development  efforts  of  the  center.  Is  it  also  possible  that  the  Coast 
Guard could receive no funds under this consolidation scenario? 

Answer. No. The Coast Guard and the Department of Homeland Security’s Direc-
torate of Science and Technology (DHS S&T) will continue a productive and collabo-
rative  relationship.  The  Coast  Guard  anticipates  receiving  $24  million  in  Research 
and  Development  (R&D)  reimbursable  funds  from  DHS  S&T,  including  funding  to 
operate  the  Coast  Guard  R&D  Center.  Throughout  the  remainder  of  the  year  the 
Coast Guard can also compete for additional Departmental R&D in accordance with 
DHS S&T prioritization protocols. 
Communications Interoperability 

Question.  What  efforts  is  the  Coast  Guard  taking  to  insure  the  full  communica-
tions interoperability among its own assets, and between those assets and other fed-
eral,  state  and  local  emergency  responders  that  allows  for  information  within  the 
maritime domain to be shared? 

Answer. The Coast Guard currently has communications interoperability between 
its  assets;  primarily  with  voice  communications  and  some  data  communications  ca-
pabilities.  The  Deepwater  and  Rescue  21  acquisitions  will  provide  enhanced  voice 
and  data  communications  interoperability  among  Coast  Guard  assets.  In  addition, 
the  Coast  Guard  is  working  closely  with  the  DHS  Wireless  Management  Office 
(WMO)  and  the  Office  of  Interoperability  and  Compatibility  (OIC)  to  develop  seam-
less communications interoperability between the Coast Guard, DHS, and other fed-
eral,  state,  and  local  emergency  responders  to  allow  information  within  the  mari-
time  domain  to  be  shared.  Through  the  DHS  Wireless  Management  Office,  DHS  is 
coordinating  all  wireless  initiatives  (e.g.  Rescue  21,  Project  SAFECOM,  Integrated 
Wireless  Network)  to  ensure  interoperability  with  Federal,  State,  and  local  emer-
gency responders. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00072 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

69

The Coast Guard remains focused on technology to integrate or make communica-
tions  more  interoperable.  The  Coast  Guard  recently  revised  the  Integrated  Deep-
water  System  (IDS)  Mission  Need  Statement  (MNS)  to  outline  the  C4ISR  Architec-
ture  Framework  and  provide  uniform  methods  for  describing  information  systems 
and  their  performance  in  context  with  mission  and  functional  effectiveness.  The 
C4ISR  suite  on  each  IDS  asset  will  collect  and  transmit  raw  data  to  an  operations 
center  that  uses  the  data  to  produce  a  Common  Operational  Picture  which  in  turn 
is  sent  back  to  assets  for  their  use.  The  Common  Operational  Picture  is  being  de-
signed  to  ensure  seamless  interoperability  with  Coast  Guard  units,  DHS,  DoD, 
Navy,  and  other  agencies—a  true  force  multiplier  in  the  fullest  sense.  When  Deep-
water is fully implemented, Coast Guard cutters and aircraft will have improved ca-
pabilities to receive information from a wide array of mission-capable platforms and 
sensors—enabling them to share a Common Operating Picture as part of a network-
centric  force  operating  in  tandem  with  other  cutters,  boats,  and  both  manned  air-
craft and unmanned aerial vehicles. 

The  Coast  Guard  is  also  updating  our  short-range  communications  systems 
through  the  Rescue  21  acquisition  to  be  compatible  with  the  Association  of  Public 
Safety Communications Officials (APCO P25) standard. For example, Rescue 21 pro-
vides  the  capability  to  ‘‘patch’’  our  communications  systems  to  other  responders’ 
communications  infrastructure  so  that  our  mobile  assets  will  be  able  to  exchange 
sensitive  but  unclassified  (SBU)  information  with  non-Coast  Guard  mobile  assets. 
This  standard  was  established  to  improve  interoperability  between  federal,  state, 
and  local  emergency  responders.  Rescue  21  is  updating  the  shore-based  National 
Distress System and numerous small vessel types. 
Rescue 21 Status 

Question. Could you please update the Committee as to where the Rescue 21 pro-
gram  stands  now?  What  level  of  funding  would  you  anticipate  needing  in  the  out 
years to complete full implementation of Rescue 21? 

Answer.  Rescue  21  completed  Operational  Testing  and  Evaluation  (OT&E)  on 
February  25,  2005.  The  results  have  been  evaluated  and  the  Coast  Guard  is  devel-
oping  a  plan  to  address  OT&E  issues  in  order  to  achieve  Initial  Operating  Capa-
bility  (IOC)  as  soon  as  possible.  Approval  of  Key  Decision  Point  (KDP)  3,  currently 
scheduled  for  May  2005,  will  allow  the  project  to  complete  installation  within  the 
first  21  regions  and  design  for  an  additional  11  regions.  The  FY06  budget  request 
of  $101  million  is  critical  to  keep  the  project  on  track  to  complete  installation  at 
the next 11 regions and complete design of the final 14 regions. 

The  Coast  Guard’s  Capital  Investment  Plan  (CIP)  includes  $100M  in  FY  2007  to 

complete the project. 
Coast Guard and DoD BRAC 

Question. What role is the USCG playing in the DoD’s BRAC process? 
Answer.  The  United  States  Coast  Guard  (CG)  does  not  have  a  formal  role  in  the 
Department  of  Defense  (DoD)  Base  Realignment  and  Closure  (BRAC)  process.  The 
CG is potentially impacted, however, due to co-locations, shared resources and sup-
port  agreements.  In  locations  where  the  Coast  Guard  is  potentially  impacted,  the 
DoD services have afforded the CG to provide input into their process. 

The  CG  has  and  will  continue  to  share  concerns  with  DoD  regarding  sites  where 
CG operations and/or facilities are co-located and where CG/DoD service agreements 
exist. 

The  CG  will  work  with  DoD  to  develop  mitigation  strategies  for  impacted  units 

and services. 
Pay Gap 

Question.  Do  you  believe  there  is  more  progress  to  be  made  [in]  the  area  con-
cerning  pay  gaps?  Is  the  gap  still  too  large  in  your  opinion  for  comparable  civilian 
occupations? 

Answer.  Military  compensation  has  improved  significantly  in  the  areas  of  Basic 
Pay,  Basic  Allowance  for  Housing  (BAH),  and  Basic  Allowance  for  Subsistence 
(BAS). As a result, Military Basic Pay raises have greatly contributed to the reduc-
tion  of  the  gap  between  equivalent  military  and  civilian  compensation  levels.  Ac-
cording  to  DoD—including  the  proposed  2006  Basic  Pay  increase,  military  com-
pensation is within an estimated 93 percent overall comparability with similar civil-
ian compensation levels. BAH is now a market-based allowance that provides an al-
lowance to offset the cost of median rental housing for Coast Guard members. BAS 
benefits all enlisted personnel and is appropriately indexed to the actual cost of food 
(as  measured  by  USDA  market  basket  indices).  For  enlisted  ranks,  I  believe  more 
attention is needed at the mid-grade (E5) and lower senior grade (E7) levels. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00073 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

Educating Members on Non-Pay Benefits 

70

Question.  What  efforts  does  the  Coast  Guard  undertake  to  educate  its  members 

on the value of the other, non-pay compensation benefits of serving? 

Answer.  Non-pay  benefits  are  a  critical  part  of  the  overall  compensation  of  Coast 
Guard  members.  Recognizing  the  impact  non-pay  benefits  have  on  member  morale 
and  retention,  the  Coast  guard  strives  to  take  advantage  of  every  opportunity  to 
educate  its  members  of  those  benefits—beginning  with  initial  indoctrination  during 
the recruiting process and continually throughout a member’s career to ensure they 
are kept abreast of any changes to the benefits. 

Recruiters explain non-pay benefits to potential recruits and their families. Below 

is a list of the non-pay benefits covered during recruiting activities:

etc.) 

• Available  Work-Life  services  (e.g.,  divorce,  marital,  &  bereavement  counseling, 
• Morale, Welfare and Recreation (MWR) benefits 
• Commissary and exchange privileges (Non-Tax) 
• Coast Guard owned housing opportunities 
• Medical and dental benefits 
• Legal assistance 
• Tuition assistance 
• Mutual assistance 
• Veterans Administration benefits (home buying, educational, retirement) 
• Coast Guard spouses clubs
During a member’s career, the Coast Guard employs various communication medi-
ums through which current benefits and any new changes are explained. Examples 
of some of the main communication vehicles are as follows:

• ALCOAST messages (sent to all Coast Guard units)
• Navy Times/Coast Guard Magazine/Reservist Magazine articles
• Flag  Voices  (notifications  from  the  Assistant  Commandant  for  Human  Re-

sources Coast Guard field units)

CG Biggest Challenge 

Question. If you had to pick just one item, what would you say is the biggest con-

cern facing your men and women? What is their biggest challenge? 

Answer. The biggest challenge facing our Coast Guard men and women is having 
the  resources  and  time  to  do  their  best  work,  and  balancing  that  work  with  family 
and  life  goals.  Data  shows  that  our  people  see  that  we  have  made  progress  in  pro-
viding  the  resources  they  need  and  the  time  necessary  to  do  their  best  work,  but 
we  still  have  more  to  do  in  these  areas.  Those  with  families  have  the  challenge  of 
how best to balance their duties to their country and family. Those looking to start 
a family are concerned about how they will deal with this challenge. 

The Coast Guard uses the U.S. Office of Personnel Management’s Organizational 
Assessment Survey (OAS) to gauge the perceptions of the Active Duty, Selected Re-
serve,  and  Civilian  workforces.  Coast  Guard  OAS  results  are  used  by  leadership  to 
gain a better understanding of the issues and concerns affecting members/employees 
and to determine the Coast Guard’s success in addressing these issues and concerns. 
Denied Privileges from Other Services Installations 

Question. Have there been any instances where members of the Coast Guard have 
been denied privileges from other services or their respective military installations? 
Answer.  To  the  Coast  Guard’s  knowledge,  no  Coast  Guard  personnel  have  been 

denied privileges from other services or their respective military installations. 
Military Families Military Health Care System Concerns 

Question.  Is  the  military  health  care  system  broke  in  your  opinion?  I  understand 
that  many  military  families  experience  extreme  difficulties  with  simple  tasks  like 
making routine appointments or scheduling well-baby checks . . . is this true? 

Answer. The Military Healthcare System, while it needs improvement, is not bro-
ken.  Based  on  current  customer  survey  results,  the  overall  satisfaction  rate  with 
TRICARE  is  good.  While  some  individuals  may  experience  difficulties  making  ap-
pointments,  most  of  these  problems  are  resolved  expeditiously  when  the  customer 
contacts  either  a  TRICARE  Service  Center  or  a  Coast  Guard  Health  Benefits  Advi-
sor.  The  Coast  Guard  has  not  received  reports  of  individuals  experiencing  extreme 
difficulties. Reported difficulties are relatively minor in nature and are due, in part, 
to the recent change in TRICARE Regional Contractors along with revised operating 
guidelines  under  the  new  contracts.  As  beneficiaries,  providers,  and  the  TRICARE 
Regional  Contractors  gain  more  experience,  the  frequency  of  even  minor  difficulties 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00074 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

71

is expected to decline. Military Treatment Facilities (MTFs) and the TRICARE con-
tractors monitor their performance in making appointments and arranging referrals. 
TRICARE  has  access-to-care  standards  that  must  be  adhered  to  by  the  MTFs  and 
civilian  providers.  Alternate  health  care  source  referrals  are  made  when  these 
standards  can  not  be  met.  Military  families  experiencing  extreme  difficulties  may 
contact a TRICARE Service Center (usually co-located with a military clinic) or con-
tact  the  Health  Benefits  Advisor  assigned  to  the  military  clinic.  In  addition,  the 
Coast  Guard  Maintenance  and  Logistics  Commands,  located  on  both  the  East  and 
West  coasts,  operate  a  toll-free  Health  Benefits  Advisor  call  line  (1–800–9HBA–
HBA)  to  assist  our  members  and  their  families  who  are  unable  to  resolve  their 
health care problems locally. 
Benefits of Having a Reserve Force 

Question.  Can  you  share  some  of  the  benefits  of  having  a  reserve  force  and  the 

challenges you experienced in attempting to integrate reserve and active forces? 

Answer. The U.S. Coast Guard (CG) must be prepared to respond to a wide range 
of contingencies at home and abroad in accordance with the authorities and respon-
sibilities  vested  in  the  Service  by  law.  The  proper  training  and  use  of  the  CG  Re-
serve  component  is  vital  to  accomplishing  the  CG’s  contingency  missions.  The  CG 
Reserve  is  fully  organized  and  integrated  within  the  CG’s  Active  Duty  component 
force structure. 

Benefits of the CG Reserve:
• The CG Reserve component exists for contingency mobilization, while providing 

a cost-effective peacetime augmentation force.

• The CG Reserve component is available to dramatically expand the CG’s active 

duty force at an annual cost of less than 2 percent of the Service’s budget.

• The Reserve forces provide a critical ‘‘flex’’ factor in the CG’s ability to respond 

immediately to contingency requirements.

• Reservists  can  be  called  up  on  short  notice  to  respond  to  natural  disasters/na-

tional emergencies, and then stood down as conditions stabilize.

• Augmentation  (on-the-job)  training  supports  CG  operational  missions  and  re-
quirements,  thereby  adding  substance  to  the  total  force  and  supporting  day-to-
day  operations.  Mobilization  readiness,  however,  is  always  the  paramount  con-
sideration  when  implementing  a  mobilization  training  program  during  normal 
drills and two-week annual active duty periods.

• The  CG  continues  its  effective  mission  performance  by  leveraging  technology 

and optimizing the employment of all its human resources.

• CG  Reserve  forces  provide  a  visible  and  exercised  relationship  between  the  CG 

and DoD, as well serve as a link to the public.

• These benefits have a tremendous impact on the CG’s ability to perform its mis-
sions.  Most  recently,  they  have  been  exercised  extensively  in  the  implementa-
tion  of  the  Maritime  Transportation  Security  Act  (MTSA)  as  well  as  contrib-
uting to operations in support of the Global War on Terrorism. Without its Re-
serve component, it would have been impossible for the CG to implement MTSA 
on  schedule,  support  overseas  operations  or  the  domestic  military  outloads  in 
support of those operations.

Challenges facing the CG Reserve:
• Identifying  the  highest  priority  use  of  the  Reserve  Force  in  a  post-September 

11th environment, given the vast amount of contingency requirements.

• Ensuring augmentation performed by Reservists directly relates to their mobili-

zation assignments.

• Educating  the  Active  Duty  component  regarding  the  nuances,  unique  polices, 

and employer issues specific to the CG Reserve.

• Assuring  that  a  strong  focus  remains  on  the  Reserve  force  so  that  Reservists 
are fully ready to mobilize to respond to a wide variety of contingencies on short 
notice.

• Sustaining  an  effective  Reserve  recruiting  effort  to  meet  the  needs  of  the  serv-

• Maintaining  the  specialty  skill  sets  needed  to  meet  Reserve  component  work-

ice.

force requirements.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00075 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

Administrative and Processing Nightmares 

72

Question.  What  measures  have  been  put  into  place  to  ensure  that  Coast  Guard 
members  do  not  suffer  from  the  administrative  and  processing  nightmares  that  we 
continue to read and hear about with members from other services? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  has  made  it  a  priority  to  minimize  pay  and  personnel 
issues  resulting  from  reserve  mobilization/demobilization  while  cumulatively  recall-
ing  6,813  Reservists  since  September  11th,  representing  84  percent  of  the  8,100 
member  reserve  workforce,  the  highest  percentage  of  any  of  the  military  services. 
Coast Guard efforts to quickly address pay and personnel issues focused on execu-
tion of a very aggressive plan that mobilized teams of senior-level pay and personnel 
experts to regions where the largest recall processing requirements existed. 

In conjunction with lessons learned since September 11th, the Coast Guard char-
tered the Reserve Strategic Assessment Team (RSAT) to conduct a review of the Re-
serve  program.  The  RSAT  review  identified  84  corrective  actions  that  address  ad-
ministrative  and  procedural  problems  experienced  by  Reservists  and  their  families 
during  mobilization  and  demobilization.  An  action  plan  was  developed  to  correct 
these problems over the next three years. 
Morale or Retention Negative Effects of CG Assets 

Question.  Do  you  believe  the  condition  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  assets  is  having  a 

negative effect on the morale or retention of enlisted personnel? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  does  not  have  data  that  indicates  a  relationship  be-

tween the condition of its assets and morale or retention. 
Enlisted Personnel Safety Concerns 

Question. Have enlisted personnel ever expressed concerns to you about their safe-

ty while they are on Coast Guard assets? 

Answer.  Among  the  military  services,  the  Coast  Guard  has  an  enviable  safety 
record. There has not been a Coast Guard fatality resulting from an operational ac-
cident in over four years. Through the adoption and use of operational risk manage-
ment programs, a web-based accident reporting system, and other web-based, stand-
alone  safety  risk  management  systems,  the  Coast  Guard  has  been  able  to  dramati-
cally reduce risk to personnel and equipment. 

Both formal and informal processes are in place within the Coast Guard for indi-
viduals to address safety questions and concerns. Specific figures regarding the per-
ception of safety among Coast Guard enlisted service members were provided in the 
2004 Organizational Assessment Survey (OAS). Unit-specific OAS results were pro-
vided  to  unit  commanding  officers,  enabling  them  to  focus  their  leadership  efforts 
on any areas that needed attention and/or improvement. Seventy-two percent of en-
listed  respondents  to  the  OAS  agreed  with  the  statement  that  they  are  ‘‘protected 
from health and safety hazards on the job,’’ while only 10 percent disagreed. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO

ADMIRAL THOMAS H. COLLINS 

Is the Coast Guard’s Budget Adequate 

Question.  It  is  unclear  whether  the  budget  request  for  security  missions  is  ade-
quate. Over $100 million in additional funding for security is included in the Coast 
Guard’s  ‘‘unfunded  priorities’’  list.  This  includes  $31  million  for  maritime  domain 
awareness,  and  $70  million  for  enhanced  maritime  safety  and  security  teams.  The 
Coast  Guard  has  indicated  that  it  does  not  have  sufficient  assets  to  implement  its 
own  security  protocols  at  District  14  and  elsewhere  when  the  maritime  security 
level is elevated due to threats. 

Is  the  budget  request  for  security  missions  adequate?  Why  is  over  $100  million 
additional  funding  for  security  included  in  the  Coast  Guard’s  ‘‘unfunded  priorities’’ 
list, and not in the budget? 

Answer. Increased resources provided by the Congress over the past several years 
have  significantly  enhanced  the  Coast  Guard’s  ability  to  continue  performing  tradi-
tional  missions  while  considerably  improving  maritime  security.  For  example,  the 
Fiscal Year 2005 enacted budget represents 51 percent growth in funding authority 
since  September  11,  2001.  This  increased  funding  by  enabling  the  Coast  Guard  to 
establish 13 Maritime Safety and Security Teams across the nation, deploy over 80 
new  small  boats  and  accompanying  crews,  expand  our  intelligence  capabilities,  and 
implement  the  2002  Maritime  Transportation  Security  Act  (MTSA).  Each  of  these 
initiatives,  among  many  others,  have  been  critical  to  allowing  the  Coast  Guard  to 
meet  post  9/11  mission  demands,  while  ensuring  no  degradation  in  other  perform-
ance areas. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00076 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

73

The  President’s  Fiscal  Year  2006  budget  request  represents  an  11  percent  in-
crease over the comparable Fiscal Year 2005 discretionary funding levels, and dem-
onstrates  extremely  strong  commitment  by  the  Administration  to  ensure  the  Coast 
Guard  is  adequately  funded.  The  resources  contained  in  the  budget  continue  to  ag-
gressively  implement  the  core  elements  of  the  Department’s  Maritime  Security 
Strategy. 

For  the  Fiscal  Year  2006  budget,  more  specifically,  robust  implementation  of  or-
ganic  Airborne  Use  of  Force  capability,  replacement  of  obsolete  cutter  small  boats 
with more capable Cutter Boats—Over the Horizon, additional Response Boat-Small 
allowances,  and  continued  replacement  of  aging  41-foot  utility  boats  with  the  more 
capable  Response  Boat-Medium  will  greatly  improve  the  Department’s  maritime 
operational presence and response posture. The President’s budget also includes sev-
eral  maritime  domain  awareness  initiatives;  such  as  implementing  the  Common 
Operational Picture, continuing the nationwide deployment of the Automatic Identi-
fication System, increasing maritime patrol aircraft flight hours, and enhancing ra-
diological  and  nuclear  detection  capabilities.  Finally,  the  Fiscal  Year  2006  budget 
requests  $966  million  in  Deepwater  funding  (a  $242  million  increase  over  Fiscal 
Year  2005)  to  recapitalize  the  Coast  Guard’s  aging  fleet  of  cutters  and  aircraft,  de-
livering new/modernized assets equipped with post-9/11 capabilities critical to reduc-
ing  maritime  security  risk  and  enhancing  the  Coast  Guard’s  ability  to  execute  all 
its missions. 

The  initiatives  contained  in  the  Fiscal  Year  2006  budget  represent  the  Coast 
Guard’s  highest  priorities  and  are  the  necessary  next  steps  in  the  Coast  Guard’s 
multi-year plan to implement its Maritime Security Strategy. 
Insufficient Assets for Security Protocols in the 14th District 

Question.  The  Coast  Guard  has  indicated  that  it  does  not  have  sufficient  assets 
to implement its own security protocols at District 14 and elsewhere when the mari-
time security level is elevated due to threats. How does the budget request address 
these gaps? 

Answer. The 2006 Budget continues to improve the Coast Guard’s maritime home-
land security capabilities and reduce maritime risk. Specifically, it provides for crit-
ical  Maritime  Domain  Awareness  (MDA)  initiatives  and  increased  or  enhanced 
Coast  Guard  operational  presence,  both  critical  components  of  the  Coast  Guard’s 
maritime security strategy and posture. 

infrastructure throughout regional Coast Guard command centers;

The 2006 Budget furthers efforts to improve MDA by:
• Continuing  deployment  of  a  nationwide  Automatic  Identification  System  (AIS) 
• Providing  additional  Maritime  Patrol  Aircraft  (MPA)  resources  to  fill  docu-
mented  flight  hour  gaps  in  support  of  detection,  surveillance,  and  tracking  ac-
tivities;
• Deploying  a  Common  Operational  Picture  (COP)  through  Coast  Guard  com-
mand centers nationwide. The COP will help fuse surveillance and tracking in-
formation  from  systems  such  as  AIS,  Rescue  21,  and  the  Ports  and  Waterways 
Safety System (PAWSS);
• Increasing the capability of Coast Guard cutters and Maritime Safety and Secu-
rity  Teams  (MSSTs)  to  detect  Rad/Nuc  materials,  intercept  suspect  ships,  and 
respond to incidents involving the release of Rad/Nuc substances.

In  addition,  the  2006  Budget  further  increases  and  enhances  the  Coast  Guard’s 

operational presence by:

• Accelerating deployment organic Airborne Use of Force (AUF) capability to five 
Coast Guard Air Stations, increasing the ability to respond to maritime security 
threats;
• Replacing  existing  obsolete  and  unstable  cutter  boats  on  the  High  Endurance 
Cutter (WHEC) and Medium Endurance Cutter (WMEC) fleet with the more ca-
pable  Cutter  Boat—Over  the  Horizon  (CB–OTH).  This  platform  nearly  doubles 
the  speed  of  the  existing  cutter  boat,  increases  secure  communication  capabili-
ties,  and  when  used  in  conjunction  with  AUF  capability  has  a  98  percent  suc-
cess rate in stopping suspicious vessels;
• Providing  14  additional  Response  Boat-Smalls  (RB–S)  and  associated  crews  to 
provide vessel escorts, and enforce security zones near critical infrastructure in-
cluding enhancing the LNG tanker and waterside security;
• Reallocating existing Coast Guard resources to immediately fill an existing gap 
in  national  maritime  Law  Enforcement  and  Counter-Terrorism  (LE/CT)  capa-
bility. The permanent establishment of the Coast Guard’s Enhanced MSST (E–

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00077 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

74

MSST) will provide an offensive DHS force able to operate across the full spec-
trum of LE and CT response in support of homeland security and homeland de-
fense  objectives,  including  CT  response  capability  for  scheduled  security  events 
out  to  50  nautical  miles  from  shore  and  augments  interagency  assets  in  high 
visibility venues such as National Special Security Events (NSSEs).

IDS Implementation Plan 

Question.  The  budget  requests  $996  million  for  the  Coast  Guard’s  Deepwater  re-
capitalization  program,  yet  $240  million  of  this  is  for  legacy  assets.  It  is  unclear 
whether  the  budget  request  is  adequate.  Quite  telling  is  the  fact  that  the  Coast 
Guard’s  ‘‘unfunded  priorities’’  list  includes  an  additional  $637  million  of  money  for 
Deepwater,  and  an  additional  $63  million  for  maintaining  existing  ‘‘legacy’’  assets. 
However, it is difficult to evaluate the budget request or this statement of additional 
needs  because  the  Coast  Guard  has  not  provided  Congress  with  its  revised  Deep-
water plan—requested by Congress last year. Moreover, it is unclear that the Coast 
Guard is adequately planning for its shore-based infrastructure needs as Deepwater 
assets are delivered. 

We have been expecting a revised plan for the Coast Guard’s Deepwater program, 
but have not received such a plan. Given the increasing costs and the post-9/11 envi-
ronment,  is  the  amount  requested  adequate?  When  do  you  anticipate  providing  us 
with the plan? 

Answer.  The  Deepwater  Revised  Implementation  Plan  was  delivered  to  Congress 
on  March  25,  2005.  Further  information  requested  by  Congress  is  under  develop-
ment and will be submitted shortly. 
Deepwater Unfunded Priorities 

Question.  The  ‘‘unfunded  priorities’’  list  includes  an  additional  $637  million  of 
money for Deepwater, plus another $63 million for maintaining existing ‘‘legacy’’ as-
sets. Is that, plus the $966 million the amount Coast Guard thinks is needed as part 
of the new plan? 

Answer. The Coast Guard’s Fiscal Year 2006 budget requests $966 million for the 
Integrated Deepwater System to fund the Coast Guard’s highest priority Deepwater 
recapitalization and modernization initiatives:

cle,

• Production of the third National Security Cutter,
• Design and long lead materials for the first Offshore Patrol Cutter,
• Six legacy Medium Endurance Cutter mission effectiveness projects,
• Acquisition of the third Vertical Take Off and Landing Unmanned Aerial Vehi-
• Design and demonstration of the first Fast Response Cutter,
• Re-engining  the  operational  fleet  of  84  HH–65  helicopters  to  eliminate  safety 
and  reliability  issues  and  restore  operational  effectiveness  of  these  critical  air-
craft,
• Enhanced  legacy  fixed  and  rotary  wing  aircraft  capabilities  through  recapital-
• Continued development of the command and control system, common operating 

ization of avionics and radar systems,

picture, and integrated logistics system.

As  discussed  in  the  transmittal  letter  that  accompanied  the  Coast  Guard’s  list  of 
‘‘unfunded priorities,’’ to the extent that provisions of the Act requiring the list (Pub-
lic  Law  108–334),  including  section  514,  called  for  submission  of  legislative  rec-
ommendations  to  the  Congress,  the  executive  branch  construed  such  provisions  in 
a  manner  consistent  with  the  President’s  constitutional  authority  to  supervise  the 
unitary  executive  branch  and  to  recommend  for  the  consideration  of  the  Congress 
such  measures  as  the  President  judged  as  necessary  and  expedient.  However,  the 
Commandant of the Coast Guard provided the ‘‘unfunded priorities’’ list to Congress 
as a matter of comity. 

Coast Guard staff and managers are available to discuss the contents of the ‘‘un-

funded priorities’’ list. 
Foreign Fishing Vessel Incursions 

Question. During Fiscal Year 2000 to Fiscal Year 2004, the Coast Guard reported 
a total of 216 suspected illegal incursions of foreign fishing vessels within the West-
ern/Central  Pacific  Exclusive  Economic  Zone.  Coast  Guard  assets  detected  only 
three of these incursions. All other incursions during this five-year time period were 
reported from other national or industry sources. None of the 24 incursions detected 
in 2004 were interdicted, and it is unclear whether any of the incursions in previous 
years were interdicted. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00078 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

75

Over the past five years, only 3 of 216 suspected illegal foreign fishing incursions 
into  the  Western/Central  Pacific  Exclusive  Economic  Zone  were  observed  by  the 
Coast  Guard  during  the  Fiscal  Years  2000  through  2004.  Isn’t  this  part  of  Coast 
Guard’s responsibility? Why aren’t the C130s or cutters spotting these incidents? 

Answer. The Coast Guard is responsible for patrolling the 1.3 million square nau-
tical  miles  of  ocean  comprising  the  Western/Central  Pacific  (WCP)  Exclusive  Eco-
nomic  Zones  (EEZ).  Recognizing  the  surveillance  challenges  for  such  a  vast  ocean 
area, in 1993 the Coast Guard entered into a MOU with the Secretaries of Defense 
and  Commerce  for  the  use  of  all  source  intelligence  assets  to  monitor,  collect  and 
report vessels that may be in violation of U.S. and international fisheries law. This 
federal agency partnership has improved U.S. fisheries surveillance capability in the 
WCP. 

From  2000  to  2004,  the  Coast  Guard  dedicated  over  6,900  cutter  hours  and  908 
aircraft  hours  to  patrol  the  WCP  EEZ.  The  vastness  of  the  WCP  EEZ,  combined 
with the limited number of Coast Guard assets with long-range capabilities to patrol 
this  area,  makes  detecting  illegal  fishing  activity  solely  by  Coast  Guard  assets  dif-
ficult.  For  example,  a  10  hr  C–130  surveillance  patrol  may  result  in  only  2  hrs  of 
on  scene  EEZ  patrol  time  due  to  the  lengthy  transit  time  and  involves  forward  de-
ployment of a C–130 to Guam to patrol the EEZs of Guam, Wake and the Common-
wealth of the Northern Marianas Islands. It takes 1-week for a high endurance cut-
ter  to  transit  to  the  scene  of  suspected  illegal  activity;  by  then  the  suspect  vessel 
has usually departed. The Coast Guard relies on federal agency and fishing industry 
partnerships to overcome these gaps in capability and capacity to monitor this vast 
ocean area. Improved maritime domain awareness and asset capability, such as un-
manned  aerial  vehicles  acquired  through  the  Coast  Guard’s  Fiscal  Year  2006  Inte-
grated Deepwater System budget request, will improve surveillance and monitoring 
of  not  only  the  WCP  but  all  high  threat  EEZ  areas.  The  Coast  Guard’s  Fiscal  Year 
2006  budget  also  includes  funding  for  additional  C–130H  and  C–130J  flight  hours, 
a  portion  of  which  will  help  increase  patrols  in  Coast  Guard  District  14,  which  in-
cludes the WCP EEZ. 
Successfully Interdicted Incursions 

Question. How many of the 216 incursions detected were successfully interdicted? 
Answer.  None  of  the  216  detected  incursions  from  2000  to  2004  were  interdicted. 
The vastness of the 1.3 million square nautical miles of ocean comprising the West-
ern/Central Pacific (WCP) Exclusive Economic Zones (EEZ), combined with the lim-
ited  number  of  Coast  Guard  assets  with  long-range  capabilities  to  patrol  this  area, 
makes  intercepting  illegal  fishing  activity  difficult.  For  example,  it  takes  approxi-
mately 1 week for a high endurance cutter to transit to the scene of suspected illegal 
activity.  For  a  C–130  to  respond  to  suspected  illegal  activity  in  the  EEZs  of  Guam, 
Wake and the Commonwealth of the Northern Marianas Islands, it requires a long-
range  flight  to  Guam  to  re-fuel,  then  another  flight  to  the  location  of  suspected  ac-
tivity. If the suspect vessel departs the U.S. EEZ before a Coast Guard unit arrives 
on  scene  to  establish  hot  pursuit  or  document  the  violation  for  flag  state  enforce-
ment, the Coast Guard lacks legal authority under international law to interdict the 
vessel. 
District 14 Maritime Patrol Aircraft 

Question.  There  is  approximately  $34  million  being  requested  for  improvements 
and  expansion  of  the  use  of  maritime  patrol  aircraft  (MPA).  How  much  of  the  new 
resources, both in terms of actual aircraft and flight time, are being allocated to Dis-
trict 14? 

Answer.  The  referenced  MPA  budget  request  reflects  a  collation  of  multiple  re-
quests  focused  on  the  build  up  and  support  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  MPA  capabilities. 
Initiatives included are:

(1) C–130H maintenance and sensor personnel, flight hour augments; 
(2) C–130J flight hours and missionization; 
(3) Contract logistics flight services to free up existing MPA airframes; 
(4)  Personnel  and  logistics  support  for  the  stand-up  of  the  first  three  EADS 
CASA C–235Ms due for initial delivery in Fiscal Year 2007.

Within these requests, at least one 100-hour C–130H augment is planned for Air 
Station Barbers Point, including funding for operating expenses and 3 additional en-
listed aviation personnel for maintenance. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00079 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

76

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. MARIA CANTWELL TO

ADMIRAL THOMAS H. COLLINS 

Operations and Maintenance Cost Responsibility for Polar Ice Breakers 

Question.  Admiral  Collins,  why  is  the  Administration  proposing  that  the  Coast 
Guard  no  longer  be  responsible  for  the  operations  and  maintenance  costs  of  the 
three polar icebreakers? 

Answer.  The  Budget  proposes  to  transfer  funding  for  the  Polar  Icebreaking  Pro-
gram  to  the  National  Science  Foundation  to  better  align  resources  with  those  who 
benefit from the program. While the Coast Guard will continue to operate the polar 
icebreaking fleet on a reimbursable basis in FY 2006, the National Science Founda-
tion will ultimately be responsible for the long-range planning required to refurbish 
or  replace  the  ships,  as  necessary,  which  are  nearing  the  end  of  their  serviceable 
lives. 
Funding Uncertainties for Polar Ice Breaking Capability 

Question  Admiral  Collins,  won’t  this  approach  lead  to  significant  uncertainty  in 
funding  streams  needed  to  maintain  these  vessels?  Are  any  other  Coast  Guard  as-
sets  maintained  solely  through  funding  from  other  agencies?  How  likely  is  it  that 
this move could eliminate our nation’s polar icebreaker capacity? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  is  working  closely  with  the  NSF  to  address  mainte-
nance of the nation’s polar icebreakers and pay for the Coast Guard personnel who 
operate  them.  The  agencies  are  developing  a  new  Memorandum  of  Understanding 
(MOU) that will detail the responsibilities of both parties. 

The Coast Guard does not operate any other assets solely through reimbursement 
from other agencies. The intent of this arrangement is to align funding responsibil-
ities with the benefiting agency in the short-term in order to maintain existing polar 
icebreaker  capabilities.  With  several  studies  planned  and/or  ongoing,  including  a 
National Academies of Sciences study, we anticipate further policy decisions will be 
forthcoming regarding our nation’s future polar icebreaker capacity. 
NSF Contracting for Ice Breaking Services 

Question  Admiral  Collins,  does  anything  prevent  NSF  from  contracting  with  ice-
breakers  from  other  countries,  such  as  Russia,  which  they  did  this  year  while  the 
Polar Sea was undergoing repairs? 

Answer.  There  are  no  restrictions  stated  explicitly;  however  this  approach  is  in-
consistent  with  existing  policy  decisions  such  as  the  1990  Presidential  Decision  on 
U.S.  polar  icebreaker  requirements  and  the  1996  Presidential  Decision  (PDD/NSC–
26)  on  U.S.  Antarctic  Policy.  These  documents  envision  only  U.S.  owned  and  oper-
ated ice breakers for the Arctic and Antarctic missions. 
American Interest for Polar Ice Breaking 

Question.  Admiral  Collins,  how  would  the  loss  of  our  nation’s  only  polar 

icebreaking fleet affect American interests in the Arctic and Antarctica? 

Answer. In general terms, the loss of our nation’s polar icebreaker fleet would se-
verely limit our nation’s ability to project sovereignty and influence in the polar re-
gions. The specific long-term affects on American interests will be addressed by the 
ongoing National Academies of Sciences polar icebreaker study, which is on schedule 
to  provide  an  interim  report  by  September  2005  and  a  final  report  by  July  2006. 
Resource Hours on Non-Homeland Security Missions 

Question.  Admiral  Collins,  are  resource  hours  that  Coast  Guard  spends  on  non-

security missions still lower than their pre-9/11 levels? 

Answer.  Coast  Guard  operational  efforts  will  continue  to  be  focused  to  meet  the 
performance  targets  of  all  our  eleven  mission-programs.  Adherence  to  specific  tar-
get-levels  of  activity  for  particular  mission  areas  is  detrimental  to  achieving  per-
formance  targets  in  a  multi-mission  service.  We  must  allocate  resources  based  on 
the  greatest  need  as  dictated  by  the  changing  risk  picture  within  the  maritime  do-
main.  This  risk-based  decision-making  by  local  commanders  will  continue  to  be  the 
driving  factor  in  how  the  Coast  Guard  manages  towards  an  effective  mission  bal-
ance, not striving toward historical resource-hour totals that don’t fully reflect effort 
or the current threat environment.

Total Non-Security mission hours in 2004 were 297,106. 
Total Non-Security mission hours in 2001 were 344,113.

Per Section 888 of the Homeland Security Act of 2002 (Pub.L. 107–296), the Coast 
Guard’s activities are categorized within eleven missions. As summarized below, five 
of  these  missions  are  considered  homeland  security,  while  the  other  six  are  consid-
ered non-homeland security missions.

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00080 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

77

Homeland Security Missions 

Non-Homeland Security Missions 

Ports, Waterways & Coastal Security 
Drug Interdiction 
Migrant Interdiction 
Defense Readiness 
Other law enforcement 

Marine Safety 
Search and Rescue 
Aids to Navigation 
Living Marine Resources 
Marine Environmental Protection 
Ice Operations 

In  Fiscal  Year  2004,  the  Coast  Guard  met  its  performance  targets  for  six  of  the 
ten  mission-programs  that  have  performance  measures.  In  particular,  the  Coast 
Guard  met  performance  targets  for  four  of  its  six  non-homeland  security  mission-
programs: Search and Rescue, Marine Safety, Aids to Navigation, and Marine Envi-
ronmental Protection. 

The remaining two non-homeland security missions nearly met their performance 
targets for Fiscal Year 2004. Efforts in connection with the Ice Operations mission-
program resulted in four days of waterways closures while the target was two days 
or  less.  The  Living  Marine  Resources  mission  achieved  a  compliance  rate  of  96.3 
percent  vice  a  goal  of  97  percent—although  the  total  number  of  fisheries  boardings 
soared to 4,560, the highest total since Fiscal Year 2001. 

Furthermore,  it  is  important  to  understand  that  several  of  our  mission-programs 
such  as  Marine  Safety  and  Marine  Environmental  Protection  are  performed  with 
very  little  use  of  the  boats,  ships  or  aircraft  that  figure  into  resource  hour  sum-
maries. This is another reason the Coast Guard focuses on the outcomes represented 
by our performance targets rather than the outputs of resource hours. 
District 13 Resource Hours on Non-Homeland Security Missions 

Question.  Is  this  also  the  case  in  District  13  (Washington  State/Oregon/Idaho/

Montana)? Please provide specific examples. 

Answer. The Coast Guard manages performance on a nationwide level by empow-
ering  local  Coast  Guard  operational  commanders  from  the  District  Commander 
down  to  the  local  Station  Commanding  Officer  to  use  their  specialized  knowledge 
and understanding of regional conditions as additional factors in making risk-based 
decisions  regarding  employment  of  operational  assets  to  effectively  balance  mission 
activities. 

Through  local  management  of  operations,  the  Coast  Guard  is  able  to  target  use 
of  personnel  and  operational  assets  to  best  respond  to  local  threats.  For  example, 
in areas where there is a large volume of oil cargo traffic and/or commercial fishing 
activity (e.g. District 13, District 17), local operational commanders are able to allo-
cate the appropriate amount of resources to perform Marine Environmental Protec-
tion and Living Marine Fisheries activities to meet these regional threats and meet 
mission performance goals. 

Coast  Guard  operational  efforts  will  continue  to  be  focused  upon  simultaneously 
meeting the performance targets of all our eleven mission-programs at the national 
level.  Adherence  to  specific  target-levels  of  activity  for  particular  mission  areas  is 
detrimental  to  achieving  performance  targets  in  a  multi-mission  service.  The  Coast 
Guard will continue to allocate resources based on the greatest need as dictated by 
the  changing  risk  picture  within  the  maritime  domain.  This  risk-based  decision-
making by local commanders will continue to be the driving factor in how the Coast 
Guard manages towards an effective mission balance, not striving toward historical 
resource-hour totals that don’t fully reflect effort. 

In  Fiscal  Year  2004,  the  Coast  Guard  met  its  performance  targets  for  six  of  the 
ten  mission-programs  that  have  performance  measures.  In  particular,  the  Coast 
Guard  met  performance  targets  for  four  of  its  six  non-homeland  security  mission-
programs: Search and Rescue, Marine Safety, Aids to Navigation, and Marine Envi-
ronmental Protection. 
Non-Homeland Security Missions and Fewer Resource Hours 

Question.  Although  the  Coast  Guard  claims  that  it  can  do  ‘‘more  with  less,’’  it 
seems  that  only  the  non-homeland  security  missions  are  suffering  from  fewer  re-
sources. Is that a fair statement? 

Answer. The Coast Guard continues to strive toward meeting performance targets 
across  the  entire  spectrum  of  Coast  Guard  missions.  In  Fiscal  Year  2004  the  Coast 
Guard  met  or  exceeded  Fiscal  Year  2001  performance  levels  in  five  of  its  six  non-
homeland  security  missions  and  met  2004  performance  targets  for  Search  and  Res-
cue,  Migrant  Interdiction,  Aids-to-Navigation,  and  Marine  Environmental  Protec-
tion. Specifically, in Fiscal Year 2004 the Coast Guard:

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00081 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

78

• Rescued  86.8  percent  of  all  mariners  in  imminent  danger,  exceeding  the  per-

formance goal of 85 percent.

• Continued  to  safely  and  efficiently  manage  America’s  waterways,  meeting  Aids 
to Navigation mission performance targets, reducing the number of distinct col-
lisions (down to 218 from 280), allisions (down to 616 from 738), and grounding 
events  (down  709  from  802)  by  15  percent  from  1,820  in  Fiscal  Year  2003  to 
1,543 in Fiscal Year 2004.

• Protected  the  marine  environment  by  reducing  the  five-year  average  of  oil  and 
chemical  spills  greater  than  100  gallons  per  100  million  tons  shipped  to  22.1 
from 29.4 in Fiscal Year 2003 and well below the Marine Environmental Protec-
tion mission performance target of 41.

• Continued to focus on improving maritime safety, reducing the number of mari-
time worker and passenger injuries and deaths from 597 in 2003 to 582 in 2004, 
well below the program sub-target of 771. (Full calculation of program perform-
ance includes recreational boating fatalities, which depends on state data which 
will not be available until later this Spring).

Efforts  in  connection  with  the  Ice  Operations  mission-program  resulted  in  four 
days  of  waterways  closures  while  the  target  was  two  days  or  less.  The  Living  Ma-
rine  Resources  mission  achieved  a  compliance  rate  of  96.3  percent  vice  a  goal  of  97 
percent—although the total number of fisheries boardings soared to 4,560, the high-
est total since Fiscal Year 2001. 

The President’s Fiscal Year 2006 budget requests an increase of $570 million over 
Fiscal Year 2005 funding levels, ensuring the Coast Guard is adequately funded and 
prepared  to  meet  its  mission  demands,  reduce  maritime  risk  and  improve  perform-
ance across all missions. 
Insufficient Assets for Security Patrols in the 13th District 

Question 1. The Coast Guard has indicated in staff briefings that it does not have 
sufficient  assets  to  implement  its  own  security  protocols  at  District  13  and  else-
where  when  the  maritime  security  level  is  elevated  due  to  threats.  How  does  the 
President’s Fiscal Year 2006 budget request address these gaps? 

Answer. The 2006 Budget continues to improve the Coast Guard’s maritime home-
land security capabilities and reduce maritime risk. Specifically, it provides for crit-
ical  Maritime  Domain  Awareness  (MDA)  initiatives  and  increased  or  enhanced 
Coast  Guard  operational  presence,  both  critical  components  of  the  Coast  Guard’s 
maritime security strategy and posture. 

The 2006 Budget furthers efforts to improve MDA by:
• Continuing  deployment  of  a  nationwide  Automatic  Identification  System  (AIS) 

infrastructure throughout regional Coast Guard command centers;

• Providing  additional  Maritime  Patrol  Aircraft  (MPA)  resources  to  fill  docu-
mented  flight  hour  gaps  in  support  of  detection,  surveillance,  and  tracking  ac-
tivities;

• Deploying  a  Common  Operational  Picture  (COP)  through  Coast  Guard  com-
mand centers nationwide. The COP will help fuse surveillance and tracking in-
formation  from  systems  such  as  AIS,  Rescue  21,  and  the  Ports  and  Waterways 
Safety System (PAWSS);

• Increasing the capability of Coast Guard cutters and Maritime Safety and Secu-
rity  Teams  (MSSTs)  to  detect  Rad/Nuc  materials,  intercept  suspect  ships,  and 
respond to incidents involving the release of Rad/Nuc substances.

In  addition,  the  2006  Budget  further  increases  and  enhances  the  Coast  Guard’s 

operational presence by:

• Accelerating  deployment  of  organic  Airborne  Use  of  Force  (AUF)  capability  to 
five Coast Guard Air Stations, increasing the ability to respond to maritime se-
curity threats;

• Replacing  existing  obsolete  and  unstable  cutter  boats  on  the  High  Endurance 
Cutter (WHEC) and Medium Endurance Cutter (WMEC) fleet with the more ca-
pable  Cutter  Boat—Over  the  Horizon  (CB–OTH).  This  platform  nearly  doubles 
the  speed  of  the  existing  cutter  boat,  increases  secure  communication  capabili-
ties,  and  when  used  in  conjunction  with  AUF  capability  has  a  98  percent  suc-
cess rate in stopping suspicious vessels;

• Providing  14  additional  Response  Boat-Smalls  (RB–S)  and  associated  crews  to 
provide vessel escorts, and enforce security zones near critical infrastructure in-
cluding enhancing liquefied natural gas and waterside security;

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00082 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

79

• Reallocating existing Coast Guard resources to immediately fill an existing gap 
in  national  maritime  Law  Enforcement  and  Counter-Terrorism  (LE/CT)  capa-
bility. The permanent establishment of the Coast Guard’s Enhanced MSST (E–
MSST) will provide an offensive DHS force able to operate across the full spec-
trum of LE and CT response in support of homeland security and homeland de-
fense  objectives,  including  CT  response  capability  for  scheduled  security  events 
out to 50 nautical miles from shore and augmenting interagency assets in high 
visibility venues such as National Special Security Events (NSSEs).

Question 2. Admiral Collins, what is the Coast Guard’s role in protecting sensitive 
facilities,  such  as  the  Bangor  Naval  Submarine  Station  in  Silverdale,  Washington? 
Does  the  Coast  Guard  have  adequate  resources  to  fully  implement  this  responsi-
bility at all such facilities nationwide? 

Answer.  In  accordance  with  Homeland  Security  Presidential  Directive-7  (HSPD–
7)—Critical  Infrastructure  Identification,  Prioritization  and  Protection,  each  federal 
department  and  agency  is  responsible  for  the  protection  of  its  own  physical  and 
cyber critical infrastructure and key resources, including sensitive facilities. Primary 
protection  responsibility  for  the  Bangor  Naval  Submarine  Station  in  Silverdale, 
Washington  rests  with  the  U.S.  Navy  (Department  of  Defense).  The  Coast  Guard 
works  with  DoD  to  supplement  security  in  those  areas  where  the  Coast  Guard  is 
better  situated  to  provide  the  necessary  expertise  or  resources.  The  Coast  Guard’s 
most direct role in supporting security for sensitive DoD assets is to provide armed 
escort for certain high-value Navy and DoD vessels such as submarines, aircraft car-
riers,  and  military  supply  vessels  while  transiting  U.S.  ports  and  waterways,  and 
providing  waterside  security  during  military  outload  operations  at  commercial  port 
terminals. Generally, the Coast Guard relies upon its Reserve Forces to bolster secu-
rity operations in support of military outloads. The Coast Guard has not been called 
upon  to  implement  similar  measures  at  all  sensitive  DoD  facilities,  but  applies  re-
sources as needed to address the greatest risks. 
Resources Needed to Protect LNG Terminals 

Question.  Interest  in  building  Liquid  Natural  Gas  (LNG)  facilities  is  increasing 
around the country. The Coast Guard is familiar with the risks to such facilities as 
well as the transportation infrastructure for LNG delivery. How is the Coast Guard 
addressing  these  risks  as  LNG  development  expands?  What  new  resources  will  the 
Coast Guard need to protect any new LNG terminals? 

Answer. Recognizing the surging interest in LNG importation in the U.S. over the 
past  24  months,  the  Coast  Guard  entered  into  an  Interagency  Agreement  with  the 
Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC) in February 2004. The FERC is the 
federal agency that authorizes the construction of shore side LNG terminals. Under 
this  agreement,  the  Coast  Guard  works  with  the  FERC  to  ensure  that  both  land 
and marine security issues are addressed in a coordinated and comprehensive man-
ner.  In  particular,  the  interagency  agreement  requires  the  FERC  to  address  mari-
time  security  related  issues  in  the  Environmental  Impact  Statement  (EIS)  process 
required under the National Environmental Policy Act (NEPA), and disclose this in-
formation to the public to the extent permitted by law. 

The FERC is processing 13 applications for new shore side LNG terminals in the 
U.S.,  and  there  are  an  additional  10  potential  sites  being  contemplated.  The  Coast 
Guard  is  now  in  the  process  of  finalizing  policy  guidance  on  the  scope  of  waterway 
security  assessments  that  need  to  be  conducted  as  part  of  the  FERC’s  EIS  process, 
as  well  as  timelines  to  be  met.  This  comprehensive  guidance  will  be  based  in  part 
on the consequence distances and risk mitigation measures discussed in the Decem-
ber  2004  Sandia  National  Labs  report,  and  will  provide  a  nationally  uniform  risk 
assessment  process  that  yields  port  specific  security  recommendations.  The  Coast 
Guard’s  Fiscal  Year  2006  budget  request  resources  for  additional  Response  Boat-
Smalls  and  screening  personnel  to  provide  increased  security  for  LNG  facilities  in 
Cove  Point,  MD  and  Everett,  MA.  Once  the  port  specific  waterway  security  assess-
ments  have  been  completed  for  subsequent  LNG  facilities,  precise  Coast  Guard  re-
source requirements can then be determined based upon the specific security meas-
ures that have been recommended. 
DW Budget Adequacy/Asset Mix/Plan Submission Date 

Question. Admiral Collins, the Coast Guard has not provided Congress with a re-
vised  Deepwater  plan  that  reflects  its  needs  for  capital  improvements  in  the  post-
9/11  environment,  despite  direction  from  this  Committee  and  the  Appropriations 
Committee to do so. Thus, it is unclear whether the budget request of $966 million 
for Fiscal Year 2006 is adequate, or if the mix of assets covered by this amount are 
appropriate. When can we expect this plan? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00083 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

80

Answer.  The  Deepwater  Revised  Implementation  Plan  was  delivered  to  Congress 
on  March  25,  2005.  Further  information  requested  by  Congress  is  under  develop-
ment and will be submitted shortly. 
Why is the Revised Deepwater Plan Only Five Years Long? 

Question.  The  Coast  Guard  presented  its  original  Deepwater  plan  covering  all  of 
the  20  years  of  the  program;  why  is  a  revised  plan  covering  all  of  the  future  years 
of Deepwater not forthcoming, particularly when Congress, in asking for such a plan 
in  the  Coast  Guard  Authorization  Act  of  2004,  and  in  the  DHS  Appropriations  bill 
for Fiscal Year 2005, did not limit its request to the next five year term of the pro-
gram? 

Answer.  Further  information  covering  all  years  of  the  program  is  under  develop-

ment and will be submitted shortly. 
Long-Term Revised Plan for Deepwater 

Question.  How  can  Congress  scrutinize  the  Fiscal  Year  2006  budget  request  and 
understand  what  it  will  cover,  and  whether  it  is  sufficient,  if  we  are  not  provided 
with the long-term plans for Deepwater? 

Answer.  The  Deepwater  Revised  Implementation  Plan  was  delivered  to  Congress 
on  March  25,  2005.  Further  information  requested  by  Congress  is  under  develop-
ment and will be submitted shortly. 
Additional Funding for DW on Unfunded Priorities List 

Question.  The  ‘‘unfunded  priorities’’  list  that  the  Coast  Guard  provided  to  Con-
gress includes an additional $637 million of money for Deepwater and an additional 
$63  million  for  legacy  assets.  Do  these  amounts  bring  Deepwater  in  line  with  the 
Coast Guard’s post-9/11 plan? 

Answer. The revised Deepwater implementation plan delivered on March 25, 2005 
articulates the Coast Guard’s post-9/11 plan for the Deepwater program. Consistent 
with  the  revised  Deepwater  implementation  plan,  the  Coast  Guard’s  Fiscal  Year 
2006 budget requests $966 million for the Integrated Deepwater System to fund the 
Coast Guard’s highest priority Deepwater recapitalization and modernization initia-
tives:

• Production of the Third National Security Cutter,
• Design and long lead materials for the first Offshore Patrol Cutter,
• Six legacy Medium Endurance Cutter mission effectiveness projects,
• Acquisition of the third Vertical Take Off and Landing Unmanned Aerial Vehi-

cle,

• Design and demonstration of the first Fast Response Cutter,
• Re-engining  the  operational  fleet  of  84  HH–65  helicopters  to  eliminate  safety 
and  reliability  issues  and  restore  operational  effectiveness  of  these  critical  air-
craft,

• Enhanced  legacy  fixed  and  rotary  wing  aircraft  capabilities  through  recapital-

ization of avionics and radar systems,

• Continued development of the command and control system, common operating 

picture, and integrated logistics system.

As  discussed  in  the  transmittal  letter  that  accompanied  the  Coast  Guard’s  list  of 
‘‘unfunded priorities,’’ to the extent that provisions of the Act requiring the list (Pub-
lic  Law  108–334),  including  section  514,  called  for  submission  of  legislative  rec-
ommendations  to  the  Congress,  the  executive  branch  construed  such  provisions  in 
a  manner  consistent  with  the  President’s  constitutional  authority  to  supervise  the 
unitary  executive  branch  and  to  recommend  for  the  consideration  of  the  Congress 
such  measures  as  the  President  judged  as  necessary  and  expedient.  However,  the 
Commandant of the Coast Guard provided the ‘‘unfunded priorities’’ list to Congress 
as  a  matter  of  comity.  Coast  Guard  is  available  to  discuss  the  contents  of  the  ‘‘un-
funded priorities list.’’
GAO Audit Management Concerns—CG Response 

Question. Last year, GAO provided a report that was critical of the Coast Guard’s 
management  and  oversight  of  the  Deepwater  program.  How  have  these  concerns 
been addressed? 

Answer. Since its March 2004 report was issued, we have updated GAO regularly 
on  the  implementation  of  these  improvements  through  four  detailed  reports  and  a 
day-long conference in January 2005. We have taken specific actions to improve pro-
gram management efforts to measure and evaluate cost, schedule, and performance; 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00084 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

81

improve  communications,  and  to  encourage  future  cost  control  through  rigorous 
competition. 

In  short,  the  Coast  Guard  has  aggressively  implemented  the  GAO  report  rec-
ommendation.  Its  11  recommendations  were  grouped  by  three  categories:  program 
management,  contractor  accountability,  and  cost  controls  through  competition.  Ac-
tion has been taken by the Coast Guard on all of these recommendations, GAO has 
closed 2 of the 11 recommendations as completed by the Coast Guard, and we antici-
pate further closures shortly. 
Response Boat-Medium Contract 

Question.  When  do  you  expect  the  contract  for  the  Response  Boat-Medium  to  be 

awarded? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  anticipates  awarding  the  limited  rate  production  con-
tract in the 4th Quarter of Fiscal Year 2005. Should the proposal evaluation require 
discussion  with  the  offerors,  contract  award  may  not  occur  until  early  Fiscal  Year 
2006. 
The OSLTF Balance is Declining 

Question.  The  Coast  Guard  testified  that  the  Oil  Spill  Liability  Trust  Fund 
(OSTLF) will run out of funding by 2010. Does the Fiscal Year 2006 budget address 
this  issue?  Describe  steps  that  the  Administration  is  planning  to  address  this  pro-
jected decline. 

Answer. The Fiscal Year (FY) 2006 Budget does not address this issue. The Coast 
Guard and Maritime Transportation Act of 2004 requires the Coast Guard to submit 
a report on the health of the Oil Spill Liability Trust Fund (OSLTF), which was pro-
vided to Congress in April. 

The OSLTF has now assumed full financial responsibility for the T/V Athos I spill 
response  in  Philadelphia,  PA.  Due  to  projected  expenses  from  this  and  other  spills 
exceeding revenues by approximately $250 million per year over the next two years, 
the  Coast  Guard  now  anticipates  that  the  OSLTF  to  be  exhausted  by  the  start  of 
FY 2008. Additional major oil spills like that involving the ATHOS I will only accel-
erate exacerbate the rate of decline of the Fund. 

Based  on  the  findings  contained  in  the  OSLTF  report  to  Congress  discussed 
above, the Coast Guard is working with the Department of Homeland Security and 
the Administration to develop a plan to address the projected decline in OSLTF bal-
ances. 
Changing OPA Liability Limits 

Question. Why has the Administration not raised the liability caps for responsible 

parties, as it is required to do under the Oil Pollution Act of 1990? 

Answer. The Coast Guard is currently seeking the authority under the provisions 
in Oil Pollution Act of 1990 (OPA 90) to increase liability limits to reflect significant 
increases  to  the  Consumer  Price  Index  (CPI).  The  President  delegated  that  author-
ity  in  section  4  of  Executive  Order  12777  to  various  agency  heads  (Administrator, 
Environmental  Protection  Agency,  Secretary  of  the  Interior,  Secretary  of  Transpor-
tation)  in  respect  to  various  classes  of  facilities  and  vessels.  Certain  authorities 
transferred  from  the  Secretary  of  Transportation  to  the  Secretary  of  Homeland  Se-
curity  when  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security  was  created  and  we  are  cur-
rently requesting this authority be delegated further to the Coast Guard. 

In  anticipation  of  the  Secretary  of  Homeland  Security  further  delegating  this  au-
thority  to  the  Coast  Guard,  the  Coast  Guard  is  proceeding  with  a  rulemaking 
project  to  make  CPI  based  adjustments  for  vessels  through  regulation.  The  Coast 
Guard  anticipates  that  with  notice  and  comment  and  required  reviews  it  may  take 
more than a year to finalize the required rulemaking. 
Polar Texas Spill in Puget Sound 

Question.  According  to  a  March  23,  2005  article  in  the  Seattle  Post  Intelligencer, 
‘‘the  Coast  Guard  said  a  ConocoPhillips  ship,  the  POLAR  TEXAS,  was  the  likeliest 
culprit in a crude oil spill in Puget Sound.’’ Please provide the context and analysis 
that resulted in this determination by the Coast Guard. Do you feel that under the 
status  quo  a  Puget  Sound  oil  spill  is  likely  in  the  next  decade?  What  can  be  done 
to further minimize this risk? 

Answer.  The  oil  analysis  conducted  by  the  Coast  Guard  for  the  October  2004 
Dalco  Passage  oil  spill  is  part  of  an  ongoing  investigation  and  is  currently  not  re-
leasable.  However,  this  analysis,  performed  by  the  Coast  Guard’s  Marine  Safety 
Laboratory (MSL), indicates that the oil spilled matches with oil from the tank ves-
sel  POLAR  TEXAS.  The  MSL,  a  forensic  laboratory  for  oil  pollution,  draws  upon 
four  analytical  methods  to  measure  different  chemical  properties  of  an  oil  to  match 
spilled oil to source oil. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00085 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

82

It is impossible to predict with any degree of certainty the likelihood of an oil spill 
occurring in any particular location. However, prevention measures, especially those 
measures enacted as part of the Oil Pollution Act of 1990 have greatly reduced the 
number and size of marine oil spills in the United States. 

Active continuation of existing prevention measures provides a significant protec-
tion  against  potential  future  marine  oil  spills.  Such  prevention  measures,  however, 
can  not  provide  complete  protection  from  incidents  that  may  involve  terrorism,  se-
vere weather, human error, and/or mechanical failure. 
Coast Guard R&D Funding With New DHS Process 

Question.  Admiral  Collins,  the  budget  proposes  no  money  directly  to  the  Coast 
Guard for research and development, which in the past has funded a variety of im-
portant  initiatives  for  both  security  and  non-security  missions.  Is  the  Coast  Guard 
assured of getting this money within the proposed new Department process? 

Answer.  As  presented  in  the  budget,  the  Coast  Guard  anticipates  receiving  $24 
million  in  Research  and  Development  (R&D)  reimbursable  funds  from  the  DHS 
Science and Technology directorate (S&T) in FY 2006. The Coast Guard and the De-
partment of Homeland Security’s Directorate of Science and Technology (DHS S&T) 
have  established  and  will  continue  a  productive  and  collaborative  relationship 
wherein  S&T  ensures  that  Department-wide  R&D  priorities  are  being  met  and  the 
Coast  Guard  Research  and  Development  program  proposes  and  executes  R&D  pro-
grams that are important for the Coast Guard. Throughout the fiscal year the Coast 
Guard  can  also  compete  for  additional  Departmental  R&D  funding  in  accordance 
with DHS S&T prioritization protocols. 
Strait of Juan de Fuca Vulnerabilities to Spills 

Question.  Admiral  Collins,  the  outer  coast  of  Washington  and  the  western  Strait 
of  Juan  de  Fuca  are  vulnerable  to  oil  spills  from  the  high  volume  of  marine  traffic 
carrying  large  quantities  of  oil  as  cargo  and  fuel.  As  you  may  know,  since  the  late 
1990s  a  dedicated  rescue  tug  has  been  established  in  Neah  Bay,  WA  to  be  able  to 
respond to emergency maritime situations. Please describe the Coast Guard historic 
involvement and use of resources towards this effort. 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  provided  limited  support  for  a  dedicated  rescue  tug  in 

• The Federal Government is a trustee of natural resources in the area including 
the Olympic National Marine Sanctuary, Olympic National Park, and the coast-
al national wildlife refuges;
• The  Federal  Government  has  designated  certain  species  found  in  the  area  as 
threatened and endangered. These species and their habitats would be affected 
by major oil spills;
• The  Federal  Government  has  a  responsibility  to  protect  the  treaty  rights  of 
• Washington  is  meeting  a  regional  energy  supply  need.  The  north  Puget  Sound 
marine transportation corridor contains a regional crude oil refining center and 
is a conduit of refined petroleum products to other western states;
• The  Strait  of  Juan  de  Fuca  conveys  more  tonnage  of  cargo  to  and  from  Pacific 

Puget Sound tribes in their usual and accustomed fishing areas;

Rim ports than any other west coast waterway;

Neah Bay in 1999. 

A  Coast  Guard  sponsored  regulatory  assessment  considered  a  dedicated  rescue 
tug  alternative  alongside  200  other  potential  risk  reducing  measures  as  a  part  of 
the ‘‘Use of Tugs to Protect Against Oil Spills in the Puget Sound Area’’ assessment 
conducted in 1999. This analysis supported the use of the International, private-sec-
tor Tug of Opportunity System (ITOS) as the most cost effective risk reducing meas-
ure. This system employs the use of transponders on a fleet of voluntary tugs of op-
portunity that are monitored by both U.S. Coast Guard and Canadian Vessel Traffic 
Services.  This  provides  trans-boundary  decision  makers  with  the  awareness  essen-
tial to direct a tug that is closest to a potential threat. 

The low probability of drift groundings compared to other types of accident limits 
the  cost  effectiveness  of  rescue  tugs.  In  fact,  a  substantial  portion  of  the  potential 
pollution  averted  by  the  rescue  tug  is  attributable  to  its  use  as  an  escort  for  laden 
tank  vessels.  While  the  use  of  pre-positioned  rescue  tugs  would  reduce  the  risk  of 
drift  groundings  in  specific  high  traffic  areas,  the  ITOS  provides  a  more  cost  effec-
tive means to prevent pollution throughout the Strait of Juan de Fuca. 
Federal Funding for Tug Boats in WA State 

Question.  Admiral  Collins,  the  State  of  Washington  maintains  that  the  Federal 
Government  should  provide  funding  for  future  tug  deployments  based  upon  the  fol-
lowing premises:

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00086 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

83

• Puget Sound is homeport for a large portion of the nation’s strategic naval fleet 

which also poses a risk of major spills; and

• There  is  potential  for  international  tension  with  Canada  should  a  major 

transboundary oil spill occur in this waterway.

I would appreciate hearing your response to each of these potential federal obliga-
tions  and  what  role  you  feel  the  Coast  Guard  should  play  in  meeting  these  respon-
sibilities. 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  recognizes  the  federal  responsibilities  outlined  above, 
but  does  not  agree  that  a  rescue  tug  is  required  to  meet  those  responsibilities.  The 
Coast  Guard  has  a  vigorous  program  in  place  to  prevent  oil  spills  in  the  Strait  of 
Juan de Fuca. This program includes:
Northwest Area Contingency Plan.
International  Tug  of  Opportunity  System,  paid  for  by  industry  fees  collected 
through Puget Sound Marine Exchange,

• Participating  tugs  have  transponders  to  make  them  readily  identifiable  by 

Vessel Traffic Services Puget Sound radar and the Marine Exchange.

• Allows for quicker identification & dispatch of tugs.

The  US-Canadian  Joint  Coordination  Group  established  a  3-5  year  strategic 
plan to formally link our radar and communications networks across the border, 
synchronize training, and jointly embed our operational processes.

• Annual exercise of CANUSPAC Spill Response Plan involves deployment of 
equipment  and  joint  training  on  behalf  of  both  countries;  including  annual 
exercise of joint emergency procedures

The  Cooperative  Vessel  Traffic  Service  (CVTS),  established  in  1979  by  inter-
national agreement between U.S. and Canada and

• Partnership  between  the  United  States  and  Canada  to  manage  vessel  traf-
fic  in  the  shared  waters  of  the  Strait  of  Juan  de  Fuca  and  the  connecting 
waterways.

• The  CVTS  assists  in  preventing  collisions,  groundings,  and  other  maritime 
casualties,  dividing  the  region  into  several  zones  each  managed  from  one 
of several vessel traffic centers (Tofino, Victoria, and Seattle.)

A Traffic Separation Scheme, adopted by the International Maritime Organiza-
tion.

A  Coast  Guard  sponsored  regulatory  assessment  considered  a  dedicated  rescue 
tug  alternative  alongside  200  other  potential  risk  reducing  measures  as  a  part  of 
the ‘‘Use of Tugs to Protect Against Oil Spills in the Puget Sound Area’’ assessment 
conducted in 1999. This analysis supported the use of the International, private-sec-
tor Tug of Opportunity System (ITOS) as the most cost effective risk reducing meas-
ure. 

The low probability of drift groundings compared to other types of accident limits 
the  cost  effectiveness  of  rescue  tugs.  In  fact,  a  substantial  portion  of  the  potential 
pollution  averted  by  the  rescue  tug  is  attributable  to  its  use  as  an  escort  for  laden 
tank  vessels.  While  the  use  of  pre-positioned  rescue  tugs  would  reduce  the  risk  of 
drift  groundings  in  specific  high  traffic  areas,  the  ITOS  provides  a  more  cost  effec-
tive means to prevent pollution throughout the Straight of Juan de Fuca. 
Moving Coast Guard Headquarters to St. Elizabeth Hospital 

Question. Admiral Collins, why is the Administration requesting $38 million with 
a view to moving the Coast Guard headquarters to the St. Elizabeth Hospital West 
Campus  in  DC,  when  no  studies  have  apparently  been  done  on  the  costs  to  the 
Coast  Guard  of  such  a  move,  or  of  alternative  locations?  Are  such  studies  forth-
coming? 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  submitted  its  requirements  for  a  Coast  Guard  Head-

quarters facility to the General Services Administration (GSA) last year. 

In the GSA Public Buildings Service Federal Buildings Fund for Fiscal Year 2006, 
GSA requested $24.9 million for Coast Guard Consolidation in response to the Coast 
Guard  requirements  and  $13  million  to  redevelop  the  St  Elizabeth’s  West  Campus 
Infrastructure. 

GSA  is  the  project  lead  for  the  Coast  Guard  headquarters  move  and  would  also 

be the lead for any studies. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00087 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

84

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. JOHN F. KERRY TO

ADMIRAL THOMAS H. COLLINS 

Northern Edge Marine Casualty Investigation 

Question. Five crew members of the Northern Edge fishing vessel died after their 
boat  capsized  off  the  coast  of  Nantucket  in  December  2004.  While  the  Coast  Guard 
personnel acted bravely in their Search and Rescue (SAR) effort, the operation faced 
difficulties including equipment failure. This incident, while hopefully isolated, high-
lighted  concerns  that  I  and  others  have  expressed  over  funding  for  Coast  Guard 
SAR operations and its aging infrastructure. On January 26, I sent you a letter out-
lining these concerns. I have your responses, however several questions still remain. 
In  my  letter  I  asked  the  Coast  Guard  to  investigate  the  incident.  Your  letter 
states that you have investigated the cause of the mechanical failures and that the 
Coast  Guard  will  conduct  a  Marine  Casualty  Investigation,  which  is  not  a  formal 
internal investigation. 

Will  the  informal  Marine  Casualty  Investigation  be  released  to  the  public  after 

it is completed? 

Answer. Yes, the Marine Casualty Investigation will be available to the public as 

soon as it is completed. 
Formal Investigation of Northern Edge SAR Case 

Question.  Will  the  Coast  Guard  conduct  a  formal  investigation  into  the  Northern 

Edge incident in addition to the Marine Casualty Investigation? If not, why? 

Answer. The Coast Guard is using the informal rather than the formal investiga-
tion  process  in  this  case.  By  using  a  single  officer,  the  investigation  will  proceed 
more efficiently, and enable the Coast Guard to share findings with the public more 
quickly. Given the findings from the preliminary investigation, the existence of only 
one  survivor,  and  the  inability  to  complete  an  extensive  post-casualty  vessel  exam-
ination,  we  believe  that  in  this  case,  a  formal  investigation  would  not  reveal  any 
more information than would a comprehensive informal investigation. 
Coast Guard Overall Preparedness 

Question.  You  recently  presented  Congress  with  a  list  of  the  Coast  Guard’s  un-
funded  priorities  totaling  nearly  $1  billion.  If  the  Congress  does  not  provide  the 
needed  funding,  what  will  you  do  to  maintain  overall  preparedness,  including  in 
SAR? 

Answer. The Coast Guard continues to maintain high overall preparedness as evi-
denced  by  consistently  strong  performance  in  all  mission  areas.  The  Coast  Guard 
met its 2004 performance targets for Search and Rescue, Migrant Interdiction, Aids-
to-Navigation,  and  Marine  Environmental  Protection.  Specifically,  in  Fiscal  Year 
2004 the Coast Guard:

• Rescued  86.8  percent  of  all  mariners  in  imminent  danger,  exceeding  the  per-

formance goal of 85 percent.

• Prevented  illegal  entry  into  the  U.S.  of  10,899  illegal  migrants—the  highest 
level  in  10  years—meeting  the  performance  target  to  interdict  or  deter  at  least 
87 percent of illegal migrants entering the U.S. through maritime means.

• Continued  to  safely  and  efficiently  manage  America’s  waterways,  meeting  Aids 
to Navigation mission performance targets, reducing the number of distinct col-
lisions (down to 218 from 280), allisions (down to 616 from 738), and grounding 
events  (down  709  from  802)  by  15  percent  from  1,820  in  Fiscal  Year  2003  to 
1,543 in Fiscal Year 2004.

• Protected  the  marine  environment  by  reducing  the  five-year  average  of  oil  and 
chemical  spills  greater  than  100  gallons  per  100  million  tons  shipped  to  22.1 
from 29.4 in Fiscal Year 2003 and well below the Marine Environmental Protec-
tion mission performance target of 41.

• Continued to focus on improving maritime safety, reducing the number of mari-
time worker and passenger injuries and deaths from 597 in 2003 to 582 in 2004, 
well below the program sub-target of 771. (Full calculation of program perform-
ance  includes  recreational  boating  fatalities  which  depend  on  state  data  which 
will not be available until later this Spring).

• Broke  previous  counter  drug  seizure  records,  seizing  241,713  pounds  (previous 
record was 138,393 pounds) of cocaine and removing over 350,000 pounds of co-
caine from the marketplace. (Full calculation of the Coast Guard’s counter drug 
performance  (Removal  Rate)  depends  on  flow  rate  data  which  will  be  provided 
by the Interagency Assessment of Cocaine Movement later this Spring).

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00088 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

85

The President’s Fiscal Year 2006 budget requests an increase of $570 million over 
Fiscal Year 2005 funding levels, demonstrating extremely strong commitment by the 
Administration  to  ensure  the  Coast  Guard  is  adequately  funded  and  prepared  to 
meet its mission demands and improve operational performance. 

In addition to sustaining current levels of operational funding, the Coast Guard’s 
Fiscal  Year  2006  budget  funds  several  recapitalizing  initiatives  (e.g.  Deepwater, 
Rescue  21,  Response  Boat-Medium,  High  Frequency  Communications  Recapitaliza-
tion),  critical  to  restoring  readiness  to  Coast  Guard  operational  assets  and  sub-
systems—the very foundation of Coast Guard operational capability and capacity. 

The Fiscal Year 2006 budget continues aggressive implementation of Maritime Se-
curity  Strategy  to  increase  Maritime  Domain  Awareness,  operational  presence,  and 
response posture with the ultimate goal of reducing maritime risk. Fiscal year 2006 
initiatives  include  implementing  the  Common  Operational  Picture,  continuing  the 
nationwide deployment of the Automatic Identification System, increasing maritime 
patrol  aircraft  flight  hours,  enhancing  radiological  and  nuclear  detection  capabili-
ties,  equipping  organic  helicopters  with  Airborne  Use  of  Force  capability,  replacing 
obsolete cutter small boats with more capable Cutter Boats—Over the Horizon, and 
providing additional Response Boat-Small allowances. 

The  Coast  Guard’s  Fiscal  Year  2006  budget  also  provides  operation  and  mainte-
nance  funding  for  the  new  Great  Lakes  Icebreaker,  scheduled  to  be  commissioned 
in 2006. This cutter will replace the less capable Coast Guard Cutters ACACIA and 
MACKINAW  resulting  in  improved  Aids-to-Navigation  and  Ice  Operations  perform-
ance on the Great Lakes. 

The  funding  provided  in  the  Coast  Guard’s  Fiscal  Year  2006  budget  funds  the 
Coast Guard’s highest priority initiatives and represents the resources necessary to 
meet Fiscal Year 2006 performance goals. 
SAR Aircraft in Ready Status for Northern Edge SAR Case 

Question. In my January 26 letter, I also expressed concern that Coast Guard pro-
tocol in District 1 requires only one rescue helicopter to be in Bravo (ready) status. 
Your letter provides the readiness rate for the H–60 helicopters based in Cape Cod 
but does not respond to this specific concern that a single helicopter in Bravo state 
is  inadequate  to  respond  to  fishing,  commerce,  recreation,  and  security  needs.  Will 
the  Coast  Guard  increase  the  number  of  aircraft  required  to  be  in  ready  status  for 
SAR in District 1? If not, explain the Coast Guard readiness strategy. 

Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  maintains  one  Bravo–0  (B–0)  HH–60J  and  one  B–0 
HU–25A  at  Air  Station  Cape  Cod.  Additionally,  the  southern  portion  of  the  First 
District is also supported by a B–0 HH–65A maintained at Air Station Atlantic City. 
These  aircraft  are  on  search  and  rescue  (SAR)  standby.  This  response  posture  has 
been steady for several decades, and was not altered after September 2001. 

The SAR case load and SAR resource hours for Air Station Cape Cod (Both HH–
60 and HU–25 aircraft) are listed in the table below. The figures reflect a relatively 
consistent  workload  in  the  SAR  program  for  the  Air  Station  over  the  past  four 
years.

# SAR Cases 
SAR Resource Hours 

FY01 FY02 FY03 FY04

248
688

318
808

262
768

271
770

As  outlined  in  the  Coast  Guard’s  March  11,  2005  letter,  the  problems  with  the 
aircraft response to the fishing vessel NORTHERN EDGE incident were mechanical 
in  nature.  They  were  not  related  to  the  availability  of  aircraft  or  B–0  response 
crews. All four HH–60J’s at Air Station Cape Cod were available, and the helicopter 
ready crew responded through the four of them. 

The  SAR  readiness  requirements  for  the  First  District  are  met  with  the  existing 
number of B–0 aircraft. Barring extensive mechanical failures, this posture has been 
sufficient  to  provide  a  search  and  rescue  response  even  in  the  most  severe  weather 
and sea conditions encountered in the North Atlantic. 
Search and Rescue and Traditional Mission Preparedness 

Question. In your response to my inquiry, you point out that the Coast Guard met 
its SAR program goals as they relate to the 2004 Government Accountability Office 
report. However, that same report found that resources allocated to traditional mis-
sions such as foreign fishing enforcement and SAR are still down considerably from 
pre-9/11 levels. Please outline for the Committee the Coast Guard’s preparedness for 
SAR and other traditional missions. Explain any shortcomings in the Coast Guard’s 
preparedness related to funding or any other issue. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00089 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

86

Answer. While the Coast Guard recognizes the difference between the baseline re-
source  hours  and  the  actual  Search  and  Rescue  (SAR)  activity  level,  we  emphasize 
that performance is our primary concern, and in Fiscal Year 2004, the Coast Guard 
rescued 86.8 percent of all mariners in imminent danger, exceeding our performance 
goal  of  85  percent.  SAR  will  continue  to  receive  all  of  the  resource  hours  required 
to meet mission demand and there has been no reduction in the SAR readiness pos-
ture at any Coast Guard units. 

Baseline  resource  hours  for  all  cutters,  aircraft  and  boats  represent  estimated 
mission  employment  based  on  historical  information.  SAR  by  its  very  nature  is  an 
‘‘on  demand’’  mission.  Due  to  the  complexity  of  maritime  distress  cases  and  their 
varied  resource  requirements,  it  is  difficult  to  precisely  predict  SAR  activity  levels 
beyond our baseline estimates. 

While  mission  performance  remains  our  primary  concern,  the  decrease  in  SAR 
hours  can  be  attributed  to  a  myriad  of  factors.  Some  of  these  factors  include:  im-
provements  in  technology  for  system  reporting  and  vessel  identification,  success 
from recreational boating safety efforts, and a rise in commercial towing and salvage 
enterprises. 

In  broader  terms,  the  Coast  Guard  continues  to  strive  toward  meeting  perform-
ance  targets  across  the  entire  spectrum  of  Coast  Guard  missions.  In  Fiscal  Year 
2004  the  Coast  Guard  met  or  exceeded  Fiscal  Year  2001  performance  levels  in  five 
of  its  six  non-homeland  security  missions  (as  defined  in  Section  888  of  the  Home-
land  Security  Act  of  2002)  and  met  2004  performance  targets  for  several  of  these 
non-homeland security missions (e.g. Search and Rescue, Migrant Interdiction, Aids-
to-Navigation,  and  Marine  Environmental  Protection)  while  continuing  to  success-
fully  prosecute  homeland  security  missions.  Specifically,  in  Fiscal  Year  2004  the 
Coast Guard:

formance goal of 85 percent.

• Rescued  86.8  percent  of  all  mariners  in  imminent  danger,  exceeding  the  per-
• Continued  to  safely  and  efficiently  manage  America’s  waterways,  meeting  Aids 
to Navigation mission performance targets, reducing the number of distinct col-
lisions (down to 218 from 280), allisions (down to 616 from 738), and grounding 
events  (down  709  from  802)  by  15  percent  from  1,820  in  Fiscal  Year  2003  to 
1,543 in Fiscal Year 2004.
• Protected  the  marine  environment  by  reducing  the  five-year  average  of  oil  and 
chemical  spills  greater  than  100  gallons  per  100  million  tons  shipped  to  22.1 
from 29.4 in Fiscal Year 2003 and well below the Marine Environmental Protec-
tion mission performance target of 41.
• Continued to focus on improving maritime safety, reducing the number of mari-
time worker and passenger injuries and deaths from 597 in 2003 to 582 in 2004, 
well below the program sub-target of 771. (Full calculation of program perform-
ance  includes  recreational  boating  fatalities  which  depend  on  state  data  which 
will not be available until later this Spring).
• Broke  previous  counter  drug  seizure  records,  seizing  241,713  pounds  (previous 
record was 138,393 pounds) of cocaine and removing over 350,000 pounds of co-
caine from the marketplace. (Full calculation of the Coast Guard’s counter drug 
performance  (Removal  Rate)  depends  on  flow  rate  data  which  will  be  provided 
by the Interagency Assessment of Cocaine Movement later this Spring).
• Prevented  illegal  entry  into  the  U.S.  of  10,899  illegal  migrants—the  highest 
level  in  10  years—meeting  the  performance  target  to  interdict  or  deter  at  least 
87 percent of illegal migrants entering the U.S. through maritime means.
• Although the Coast Guard did not meet target levels for its Ice Operations and 
Living  Marine  Resources  missions,  performance  remained  high.  Efforts  in  con-
nection with the Ice Operations mission-program resulted in four days of water-
ways  closures  while  the  target  was  two  days  or  less.  The  Living  Marine  Re-
sources mission achieved a compliance rate of 96.3 percent vice a goal of 97 per-
cent—although  the  total  number  of  fisheries  boardings  soared  to  4,560,  the 
highest total since Fiscal Year 2001.

The Coast Guard will continue seeking the appropriate balance among all its mis-
sion-programs while relentlessly pursuing stated performance goals. In so doing, the 
Coast  Guard  will  continue  to  focus  not  only  on  activity  levels  (hours),  but  most  im-
portantly on achieving the desired outcomes from those levels. The ability to achieve 
desired  outcomes  and  performance  goals  has  been  significantly  enhanced  through 
improved  technology,  tactics  and  procedures.  Risk-based  decision-making  by  local 
commanders will continue to be the primary driving factor behind the specific activ-
ity levels (hours) accrued in the course of Coast Guard operations. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00090 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

87

Increased Costs of Deepwater Program 

Question. The Coast Guard operates an aging fleet of cutters and helicopters, and 
the costs of the Deepwater program have been higher than anticipated. Why are the 
costs higher than predicted? 

Answer.  The  original  Deepwater  Integrated  Coast  Guard  System  (ICGS)  imple-
mentation  plan  was  developed  around  a  set  of  assumptions  about  the  service  life 
and materiel condition of the Coast Guard’s legacy assets. This plan includes invest-
ment in legacy sustainment during the recapitalization effort to maintain capability 
until the assets could be recapitalized. It has become very apparent that our legacy 
fleet was in even worse shape than we understood. Compounding this, increased op-
erating tempo required to meet homeland security mission demands has resulted in 
accelerated degradation of the Coast Guard’s legacy assets. 
Revised DW Implementation Plan 

Question.  When  will  the  Coast  Guard  issue  a  revised  plan  of  the  Deepwater  pro-

gram’s projected mix of assets and their costs? 

Answer.  The  Deepwater  Revised  Implementation  Plan  was  delivered  to  Congress 
on  March  25,  2005.  Further  information  requested  by  Congress  is  under  develop-
ment and will be submitted shortly. 
Coast Guard Loran 

Question. What is the Administration’s or the Coast Guard’s official policy regard-
ing  the  Loran  system?  When  will  the  Loran-C  modernization  process  be  accom-
plished? 

Answer.  Consistent  with  the  2001  Federal  Radionavigation  Plan  and  an  April 
2003  Memorandum  of  Agreement  between  the  Coast  Guard,  the  Federal  Aviation 
Administration and Department of Transportation, the Coast Guard will plan to dis-
establish the Loran system by the end of Fiscal Year 2008, with appropriate public 
notice, if a national policy is not established that requires Loran-C as a multi-modal 
backup to the Global Positioning System (GPS). 

As  part  of  the  Loran-C  modernization,  the  FAA  transfers  funds  (which  were  not 
requested  by  the  Coast  Guard)  from  its  budget  to  the  Coast  Guard.  At  the  current 
rate  of  transfer,  the  modernization  of  the  20  continental  U.S.  Loran  facilities  will 
be completed by August 2005. If funds continue to be transferred from the FAA, the 
Alaskan  Loran  facility  modernization  would  extend  beyond  2008.  Those  facilities 
would  be  modernized  at  the  rate  of  one  a  year,  starting  with  LORSTA  Kodiak  this 
year and finishing with LORSTA Port Clarence in 2010. 

Question.  The  Coast  Guard  is  one  of  several  federal  agencies  that  have  jurisdic-
tion  over  port  security.  Port  Authorities,  shippers,  ocean  carriers,  and  other  mari-
time  interests  are  looking  to  the  government  for  a  contingency  plan  in  the  event  of 
a  terrorist  incident  at  a  U.S.  port.  What  is  the  status  of  the  contingency  planning? 
Answer.  The  Coast  Guard  has  developed  the  National  Response  Options  Matrix 
(NROM) for use by Coast Guard senior leadership following a Transportation Secu-
rity Incident (TSI) or when credible intelligence information indicates that a TSI is 
imminent.  The  emphasis  of  the  NROM  is  to  provide  pre-planned  and  pre-agreed 
upon  options  to  focus  the  maritime  industry’s  Maritime  Security  level  posture  and 
the  Coast  Guard’s  Ports,  Waterways  and  Coastal  Security  activities  in  the  nation’s 
non-affected  ports  to  help  prevent  further  attacks  and  to  protect  the  remaining  U. 
S.  Marine  Transportation  System,  maritime  critical  infrastructures  and  key  assets, 
and  population  centers.  Recognizing  the  utility  of  making  NROM  an  inter-agency 
tool;  Customs  and  Boarder  Patrol  has  joined  the  Coast  Guard  in  development  of  a 
DHS  inter-agency  NROM  to  include  initial  short-term  response  and  recovery  op-
tions,  protocols  and  priorities  for  re-opening  ports,  while  facilitating  the  continued 
flow of legitimate maritime commerce and use of the marine environment. 

In  addition,  the  President  has  signed  a  maritime  security  policy  directive  out-
lining his vision for a fully coordinated U.S. Government effort to protect U.S. inter-
ests in the maritime domain. This document, the Maritime Security Policy National 
Security/Homeland  Security  Presidential  Directive  (NSPD/HSPD),  reiterates  the 
President’s  commitment  to  maritime  security  and  aims  to  integrate  and  align  all 
U.S.  Government  maritime  security  programs  and  initiatives  into  a  comprehensive 
and  cohesive  national  effort  involving  appropriate  Federal,  State,  local  and  private 
sector entities. One of several specific actions, the NSPD/HSPD directs the develop-
ment,  in  consultation  with  key  industry  stakeholders,  of  recommended  minimum 
Federal  standards  for  maritime  recovery  operations,  and  a  comprehensive  national 
maritime  infrastructure  recovery  standards  and  a  plan,  complementary  to  the  na-
tional preparedness goals and standards required by HSPD–8. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00091 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

Criteria Used to Re-Open Ports After an Attack 

88

Question.  What  criteria  will  be  used  to  re-open  a  port  after  a  terrorist  incident? 
Answer.  Due  to  the  wide  range  of  threats,  conveyances,  cargo  and  infrastructure 
in the Maritime Transportation System, a list of specific criteria universally applica-
ble  to  any  incident  can  not  be  established.  Instead,  the  Coast  Guard,  in  close  co-
operation with other government agencies and the private sector, has developed de-
cision  making  processes  that  guide  decision  makers  through  the  factors  applicable 
to each incident. 

The  Coast  Guard  has  developed  the  National  Response  Options  Matrix  (NROM) 
for  use  by  Coast  Guard  senior  leadership  following  a  Transportation  Security  Inci-
dent  (TSI)  or  when  credible  intelligence  information  indicates  that  a  TSI  is  immi-
nent.  The  emphasis  of  the  NROM  is  to  provide  pre-planned  and  pre-agreed  upon 
options  to  focus  the  maritime  industry’s  Maritime  Security  level  posture  and  the 
Coast Guard’s Ports, Waterways and Coastal Security activities in the nation’s non-
affected ports to help prevent further attacks and to protect the remaining U.S. Ma-
rine  Transportation  System,  maritime  critical  infrastructures  and  key  assets,  and 
population  centers.  Recognizing  the  utility  of  making  NROM  an  inter-agency  tool, 
Customs  and  Border  Protection  has  joined  the  Coast  Guard  in  development  of  a 
DHS  inter-agency  NROM  to  include  initial  short-term  response  and  recovery  op-
tions,  protocols  and  priorities  for  re-opening  ports,  while  facilitating  the  continued 
flow of legitimate maritime commerce and use of the marine environment. 

The National Maritime Security Plan (NMSP) will function as the capstone of the 
three-tiered system of domestic maritime security plans required by MTSA: The Na-
tional  Maritime  Security  Plan;  Area  Maritime  Security  Plans  prepared  by  Federal 
Maritime Security Coordinators; and Vessel and Facility Security Plans prepared by 
owners  and  operators.  The  NMSP  will  establish  processes  for:  setting  incident  spe-
cific  national  priorities,  restoration  of  cargo  flow  and  recovery  of  maritime  infra-
structure. 

Area Maritime Security Plans outline priorities and procedures for re-opening the 
port at the local port level. Generally the Captain of the Port/Federal Maritime Se-
curity  Coordinator  (FMSC)  will  work  with  Area  Maritime  Security  Committee 
(AMSC) members and other appropriate stakeholders to develop an incident specific 
strategy  for  re-opening  the  port.  The  AMSC  advises  the  FMSC  on  potential  prior-
ities or conflicts with respect to re-opening strategies. The FMSC retains final deci-
sion making authority with respect to re-opening all or a section of the port. 
Who’s in Charge After an Attack? 

tack? 

Question.  Who  will  be  in  charge  at  our  major  ports  in  the  event  of  a  terrorist  at-

Answer.  The  National  Response  Plan  (NRP)  and  its  directed  implementation  of 
the National Incident Management System (NIMS) serves as standing guidance for 
the  coordination  and  execution  of  interagency  responses  at  the  federal,  state,  and 
local  level.  The  Coast  Guard  is  the  lead  federal  agency  for  maritime  security.  The 
Coast  Guard  will  work  closely  with  the  Transportation  Security  Administration 
(TSA),  as  other  modes  of  transport  are  also  involved  in  the  routine  operations  of 
ports,  including  pipelines,  trucking,  and  rail.  The  Coast  Guard  Captain  of  the  Port 
(COTP),  who  is  also  designated  as  the  Federal  Maritime  Security  Coordinator 
(FMSC) for their zone of responsibility, is in charge of ensuring the safety and secu-
rity  of  port  operations,  and  for  coordinating  protective,  mitigation,  and  recovery  ac-
tivities  within  the  port  following  a  terrorist  incident.  To  successfully  carry  out  this 
mission,  the  COTP/FMSC  works  in  a  unified  command  setting  with  other  federal, 
state,  and  local  agencies  with  authority,  responsibility  and  jurisdiction  to  respond 
to  the  event.  These  officials,  under  the  leadership  of  the  COTP/FMSC,  execute  pre-
planned  strategies  developed  in  the  Area  Maritime  Security  Plans  or  develop  and 
execute incident specific strategies and action plans in response to the incident. The 
COTP/FMSC also oversees the maritime industry response actions outlined in vessel 
and facility security plans to protect individual vessels and facilities within the port. 
Since  the  Federal  Bureau  of  Investigation  (FBI)  is  the  lead  agency  with  respect  to 
investigating and responding to the actual terrorist event, port level protection and 
mitigation actions are also coordinated with the FBI’s response and investigation ac-
tivities.  These  protocols  and  actions  are  also  coordinated  with  the  Special  Agent  in 
Charge  of  the  local  ICE  Office  of  Investigations,  as  ICE  is  the  largest  investigative 
body  of  the  Department  of  Homeland  Security,  and  our  partner  in  the  war  on  ter-
rorism. 
Expectations on Industry and Foreign Governments 

Question. What, in general, will be expected from the commercial maritime indus-
try and from foreign governments in the event of a terrorist attack at a major port? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00092 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

89

Answer. The United States commercial maritime industry facility and vessel own-
ers and operators will be expected to implement the transportation security incident 
response  measures  as  indicated  in  their  Coast  Guard  approved  security  plans  as 
mandated  by  the  Maritime  Transportation  Security  Act  (MTSA)  of  2002.  Maritime 
industry security plan holders are also expected to respond to changes in the Mari-
time  Security  (MARSEC)  level  by  implementing  measures  outlined  in  their  plans. 
Additionally,  members  of  industry  would  be  called  upon  to  assist  senior  Coast 
Guard decision makers at the national level with strategies and priorities to restore 
cargo flow. Foreign governments that are party to the International Maritime Orga-
nization would be expected to implement measures outlined in their maritime secu-
rity  plans  under  the  International  Ship  and  Port  Facility  Security  (ISPS)  Code  to 
help  secure  global  commerce  systems.  Foreign  governments  might  also  be  called 
upon to assist in restoring cargo flow, such as implementing screening or inspection 
procedures  deemed  necessary  to  mitigate  the  identified  threat  vectors  for  cargo 
bound  for  the  United  States.  Foreign  flagged  and  owned  entities  in  U.S.  territorial 
waters must also abide by the declared MARSEC conditions. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO

ADMIRAL THOMAS H. COLLINS 

The OSLTF Balance is Declining 

Question. The Oil Spill Liability Trust Fund is running out of money. Under cur-
rent  projections,  when  will  it  be  bankrupt?  Will  the  Administration  ask  Congress 
for  general  appropriations  to  pay  for  oil  spill  cleanup  costs  if  the  trust  fund  is  de-
pleted? 

Answer.  The  balance  of  the  Oil  Spill  Liability  Trust  Fund  (OSLTF)  at  the  end  of 
Fiscal  Year  (FY)  2004  was  approximately  $842  million.  Due  to  projected  expenses 
exceeding revenues by approximately $250 million per year over the next two years, 
the  Coast  Guard  expects  the  OSLTF  to  be  exhausted  by  the  start  of  FY  2008.  This 
projection  takes  into  account  that  the  OSLTF  assumed  full  financial  responsibility 
for  the  T/V  Athos  I  spill  response  in  Philadelphia,  PA.  Additional  major  oil  spills 
like the ATHOS I will only accelerate the rate of decline of the OSLTF. 

The  Coast  Guard  and  Maritime  Transportation  Act  of  2004  requires  the  Coast 
Guard  to  prepare  a  report  on  the  health  of  the  OSLTF.  That  report  was  submitted 
to the Congress on May 12, 2005. 

Based  on  the  findings  contained  in  the  OSLTF  report  to  Congress  discussed 
above, the Coast Guard is working with the Department of Homeland Security and 
the Administration to develop a plan to address the projected decline in OSLTF bal-
ances. 
Inspector General Findings: Port Security Grant Program 

Question.  The  Inspector  General  found  major  problems  with  the  port  security 
grant program, mainly that funds are not being distributed on the basis of security 
risk.  Please  describe  the  Coast  Guard’s  role  in  deciding  which  projects  should  get 
funded at which ports? 

Answer.  Within  the  risk  management  framework  of  the  National  Infrastructure 
Protection  Plan  (NIPP),  the  Coast  Guard  is  an  active  partner  in  the  Port  Security 
Grant program conducting field level reviews of applications to make risk-based rec-
ommendations  to  the  multi-agency  national  review  board.  The  Coast  Guard  also 
sends  two  representatives  to  the  National  Review  Board  which  makes  final  rec-
ommendations  to  the  Executive  Review  Board.  The  Office  of  State  and  Local  Gov-
ernment  Coordination  and  Preparedness  (SLGCP),  as  the  Port  Security  Grant  pro-
gram  administrator,  is  working  with  the  Coast  Guard,  Transportation  Security  Ad-
ministration,  Customs  and  Border  Protection,  Information  Analysis  and  Infrastruc-
ture  Protection,  and  the  Maritime  Administration  to  reevaluate  aspects  of  the  pro-
gram to ensure that funds are allocated to the highest port security priorities based 
on risk factors, ensuring the majority of grants are directed to the Nation’s highest 
risk  ports.  Other  objectives  include:  identifying  specific  risk-based  factors  to  guide 
funding  distribution  and  identifying  a  limited  set  of  high-risk  ports  based  on  the 
Coast  Guard’s  listing  of  militarily  and  economically  strategic  ports  and  other  port 
criticality and threat data. 

In  support  of  the  proposed  Targeted  Infrastructure  Protection  Program  (TIPP), 
the  process  will  be  further  refined  in  Fiscal  Year  2006  to  create  a  port-wide  risk 
management  plan  by  combining  elements  of  existing  security  models  used  by 
SLGCP  and  the  Coast  Guard.  Future  plans  involve  requiring  recipients  of  funding 
to participate in a port-wide security planning process through each Area Maritime 
Security  Committee  (AMSC’s  are  chaired  by  Coast  Guard  Captains  of  the  Port).  As 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00093 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

90

part  of  this  approach,  emphasis  will  be  placed  on  port-wide  security  enhancements 
based  on  risk  reduction.  To  achieve  this  strategy,  each  AMSC  will  be  required  to 
develop  a  port-wide  risk  management  plan  based  on  previously  completed  Coast 
Guard and AMSC risk assessments and security plans as well as risk methodologies 
used by SLGCP. The AMSC will inform the office of Information Analysis and Infra-
structure Protection on the results of this port-wide risk management plan. 
Balance Between Homeland Security and Non-Homeland Security Missions 
Question. It’s been well-documented that since 9/11, the Coast Guard’s security ef-
fort  has  increased  massively,  at  the  expense  of  resource  hours  for  traditional  mis-
sions.  Do  you  have  specific  plans  to  restore  some  balance  to  the  homeland  security 
and non-homeland security missions of the Coast Guard? 

Answer. The Coast Guard continues to achieve consistently strong performance in 
all  mission  areas.  The  Coast  Guard  met  its  2004  performance  targets  for  several 
non-homeland security missions (e.g. Search and Rescue, Migrant Interdiction, Aids-
to-Navigation,  and  Marine  Environmental  Protection)  while  continuing  to  achieve 
high performance in several homeland security missions. Specifically, in Fiscal Year 
2004 the Coast Guard:

• Rescued  86.8  percent  of  all  mariners  in  imminent  danger,  exceeding  the  per-

formance goal of 85 percent.

• Prevented  illegal  entry  into  the  U.S.  of  10,899  illegal  migrants—the  highest 
level  in  10  years—meeting  the  performance  target  to  interdict  or  deter  at  least 
87 percent of illegal migrants entering the U.S. through maritime means.

• Continued  to  safely  and  efficiently  manage  America’s  waterways,  meeting  Aids 
to Navigation mission performance targets, reducing the number of distinct col-
lisions (down to 218 from 280), allisions (down to 616 from 738), and grounding 
events  (down  709  from  802)  by  15  percent  from  1,820  in  Fiscal  Year  2003  to 
1,543 in Fiscal Year 2004.

• Protected  the  marine  environment  by  reducing  the  five-year  average  of  oil  and 
chemical  spills  greater  than  100  gallons  per  100  million  tons  shipped  to  22.1 
from 29.4 in Fiscal Year 2003 and well below the Marine Environmental Protec-
tion mission performance target of 41.

• Continued to focus on improving maritime safety, reducing the number of mari-
time worker and passenger injuries and deaths from 597 in 2003 to 582 in 2004, 
well below the program sub-target of 771. (Full calculation of program perform-
ance  includes  recreational  boating  fatalities  which  depend  on  state  data  which 
will not be available until later this spring).

• Broke  previous  counter  drug  seizure  records,  seizing  241,713  pounds  (previous 
record was 138,393 pounds) of cocaine and removing over 350,000 pounds of co-
caine from the marketplace. (Full calculation of the Coast Guard’s counter drug 
performance  (Removal  Rate)  depends  on  flow  rate  data  which  will  be  provided 
by the Interagency Assessment of Cocaine Movement later this Spring).

The President’s Fiscal Year 2006 budget requests an increase of $570 million over 
Fiscal Year 2005 funding levels, demonstrating extremely strong commitment by the 
Administration  to  ensure  the  Coast  Guard  is  adequately  funded  and  prepared  to 
meet its mission demands and improve operational performance. 

In addition to sustaining current levels of operational funding, the Coast Guard’s 
Fiscal  Year  2006  budget  funds  several  recapitalizing  initiatives  (e.g.  Deepwater, 
Rescue  21,  Response  Boat-Medium,  High  Frequency  Communications  Recapitaliza-
tion),  critical  to  restoring  readiness  to  Coast  Guard  operational  assets  and  sub-
systems—the very foundation of Coast Guard operational capability and capacity. 

The Fiscal Year 2006 budget continues aggressive implementation of Maritime Se-
curity  Strategy  to  increase  Maritime  Domain  Awareness,  operational  presence,  and 
response posture with the ultimate goal of reducing maritime risk. Fiscal year 2006 
initiatives  include  implementing  the  Common  Operational  Picture,  continuing  the 
nationwide deployment of the Automatic Identification System, increasing maritime 
patrol  aircraft  flight  hours,  enhancing  radiological  and  nuclear  detection  capabili-
ties,  equipping  organic  helicopters  with  Airborne  Use  of  Force  capability,  replacing 
obsolete cutter small boats with more capable Cutter Boats—Over the Horizon, and 
providing additional Response Boat-Small allowances. 

The  Coast  Guard’s  Fiscal  Year  2006  budget  also  provides  operation  and  mainte-
nance  funding  for  the  new  Great  Lakes  Icebreaker,  scheduled  to  be  commissioned 
in 2006. This cutter will replace the less capable Coast Guard Cutters ACACIA and 
MACKINAW  resulting  in  improved  Aids-to-Navigation  and  Ice  Operations  perform-
ance on the Great Lakes. 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00094 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

91

Additional Funding Needed to Conduct MTSA Assessments 

Question.  How  much  of  the  additional  funding  for  the  homeland  security  mission 
in  the  President’s  request  will  be  needed  to  conduct  the  vulnerability  assessments 
required by the Maritime Transportation Security Act? When will these assessments 
be completed? 

Answer. There is no additional Coast Guard funding requested in the 2006 Budg-
et  for  vulnerability  or  port  security  assessments.  The  Coast  Guard  has  completed 
port security assessments at the 55 U.S. ports previously identified as militarily and 
economically  strategic.  While  efforts  are  underway  to  augment  these  assessments 
with specialized needs such as assessments of specific infrastructure as well as anal-
yses of specific vulnerabilities, no additional funding beyond that currently available 
is being requested at this time. 
Intelligence Operations 

Question.  It  is  frequently  overlooked  that  the  Coast  Guard  and  Customs  Service 
have  intelligence  operations.  They  have  had  some  operational  experience  working 
together  on  the  war  on  drugs.  Are  there  plans  to  integrate  these  two  intelligence 
operations?  Was  their  cooperation  in  counter-drug  operations  generally  successful? 
Answer.  The  Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS)  is  currently  examining  all 
of its intelligence activities to ensure alignment and also assess whether certain in-
telligence  support  and  other  functions  should  be  integrated.  However,  there  are  no 
current  plans  to  integrate  the  operations  of  the  Coast  Guard  Intelligence  Program 
(CGIP),  which  is  a  designated  member  of  the  Intelligence  Community,  with  the  in-
telligence  activity  that  is  part  of  U.S.  Customs  and  Border  Protection  (CBP).  The 
CGIP  does  however,  work  closely  with  CBP  intelligence  and  U.S.  Immigration  and 
Customs Enforcement (ICE) intelligence program. 

Wherever  law  enforcement  intelligence  requirements  are  similar  and  where  ICE 
and  other-agency  analysts  are  located,  the  CGIP  works  collaboratively  with  the 
other federal agencies involved. The CGIP has military requirements that go beyond 
law enforcement because the Coast Guard is not only a law enforcement agency, but 
one  of  the  five  branches  of  the  Armed  Forces.  Additionally,  The  Coast  Guard  oper-
ates  in  many  places—in  domestic  ports  and  coastal  waters,  offshore  regions,  and 
even  in  foreign  ports—where  other  U.S.  Government  agencies,  including  CBP  and 
ICE, typically are not present. This access affords Coast Guard personnel the oppor-
tunity to collect intelligence that supports not only Coast Guard missions, but other 
important  national  security  objectives  as  well.  Coast  Guard  collectors  and  analysts 
also  have  significant  expertise  in  the  maritime  regions  and  functions  that  is  ac-
quired through performing Coast Guard missions. Finally, Coast Guard intelligence 
specialists  are  best  able  to  understand,  prioritize  and  support  the  myriad  of  Coast 
Guard operational commanders’ intelligence requirements. 

While  full  integration  of  the  Coast  Guard  and  CBP  intelligence  operations  is  not 
desirable,  the  Coast  Guard  routinely  coordinates  intelligence  efforts  with  DHS  and 
DHS  components,  including  CBP  and  ICE,  as  well  as  with  the  other  Intelligence 
Community  members.  These  coordination  efforts  are  designed  to  develop  new 
sources,  improve  analytical  processes,  and  provide  actionable  (timely  and  accurate) 
intelligence to operational and tactical units. 

Coast Guard staff can provide Congress with specific examples of counterdrug in-

telligence efforts in an appropriate setting, since that information is classified. 
CG Analysis of Maintenance Costs by Accelerating DW Program 

Question.  Has  the  Coast  Guard  performed  an  analysis  on  how  much  in  mainte-

nance costs could be saved by accelerating the Deepwater program? 

Answer. The Coast Guard has conducted some informal assessments as to the po-
tential cost savings and cost avoidance if the Deepwater assets were provided soon-
er. To date, our assessments have identified the following potential savings:

• Contract  Performance  Management:  If  Deepwater  were  to  be  completed  sooner, 
total  project  cost  of  system  integrator  and  government  contract  management 
personnel could be reduced. Additionally, a shorter contract term will lessen the 
number  of  performance  award  fee  determinations  paid  out  contributing  to  fur-
ther  future  years  savings.  These  award  fees  typically  average  approximately 
$5M.

• Legacy Cutter Maintenance Costs: Legacy cutters could be retired much sooner. 
Due to increasing age and continued high op tempo, legacy cutter maintenance 
costs  have  been  increasing  at  an  increasing  rate,  much  faster  than  estimated 
in  our  Deepwater  pre-9/11  baseline  planning.  The  early  retirement  of  these  as-
sets  will  stop  these  increasing  costs  sooner.  It  will  also  reverse  the  disturbing 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00095 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

92

trend  of  increasing  lost  days  due  to  unscheduled  maintenance  to  repair  casual-
ties.

However,  as  GAO  has  recently  testified,  acceleration  of  a  program  as  complex  as 
Deepwater  carries  with  it  significant  inherent  risks  of  concurrent  cost  acceleration 
and schedule disruptions. In total, the Administration believes the best approach for 
the  Deepwater  program  is  to  implement  the  Revised  Deepwater  Plan,  as  proposed 
in the FY 2006 budget. 
Increasing Funding for Port Security 

Question.  There  is  a  great  need  for  increasing  funding  for  port  security.  In  the 
ports  of  New  Jersey  and  New  York,  three  million  containers  are  moved  annually, 
and the Coast Guard estimates we need more than seven billion dollars to improve 
port  security.  Given  the  President’s  budget  cuts  and  fiscal  restraints,  how  are  we 
going to effectively protect our ports? 

Answer. Protecting our ports requires a continued emphasis on executing a broad 
range of strategies to implement a system of layered defenses. Port security cannot 
start  and  end  within  the  confines  of  any  particular  port.  A  goal  line  defense  is  no 
defense  at  all  and  thus  public  and  private  investments  must  be  balanced  across  all 
appropriate layers and prioritized on the basis of risk. Port security plans and strat-
egies also acknowledge that protecting the foundations of American’s free society re-
quires  the  recognition  that  risk  cannot  be  totally  eliminated.  A  transportation  sys-
tem  as  vital  and  thriving  as  the  marine  transportation  system  cannot  become  her-
metically sealed. As a result the Coast Guard, as the lead DHS agency for maritime 
security,  will  continue  refining  its  understanding  of  maritime  and  port  risks  and 
champion  the  flow  of  private  resources  (e.g.,  grants)  and  public  capabilities  (Coast 
Guard  Cutters,  aircraft,  boarding  teams,  etc)  toward  the  highest  risks;  recognizing 
also that resources will always be finite. 

The  Department  of  Homeland  Security  (DHS)  has  awarded  over  $560  million  in 
grants  for  port  security,  funding  more  than  1,100  security  enhancement  projects  in 
some  of  the  Nation’s  most  critical  port  facilities.  These  funds  have  been  used  for 
projects  like  lighting,  fencing  and  surveillance  systems  to  name  a  few.  In  Fiscal 
Year 2005 an additional $150 million will be targeted by DHS to enhance the secu-
rity of the nation’s ports. For Fiscal Year 2006, port security will continue to be ad-
dressed  as  part  of  the  $600  million  requested  by  the  President  as  part  of  the  Tar-
geted  Infrastructure  Protection  program.  As  the  program  owner,  the  Department’s 
Office  of  State  and  Local  Government  Coordination  and  Preparedness  (SLGCP),  in 
coordination with the Coast Guard and the Information Analysis and Infrastructure 
Protection Directorate (IAIP) will continue to ensure that port security priorities are 
set,  needs  identified  and  resources  brought  to  bear  to  effectively  secure  our  ports. 
The 2006 budget also continues to improve the Coast Guard’s maritime homeland 
security  capabilities  and  reduce  maritime  risk.  Specifically,  it  provides  for  critical 
Maritime  Domain  Awareness  (MDA)  initiatives  and  increased  or  enhanced  Coast 
Guard operational presence, both critical components of the Coast Guard’s maritime 
security strategy and posture. 

The 2006 budget furthers efforts to improve MDA by:
• Continuing  deployment  of  a  nationwide  Nationwide  Automatic  Identification 
System (AIS) infrastructure throughout regional Coast Guard command centers;
• Providing  additional  Maritime  Patrol  Aircraft  (MPA)  resources  to  fill  docu-
mented  flight  hour  gaps  in  support  of  detection,  surveillance,  and  tracking  ac-
tivities;
• Deploying  a  Common  Operational  Picture  (COP)  through  Coast  Guard  com-
mand centers nationwide. The COP will help fuse surveillance and tracking in-
formation  from  systems  such  as  AIS,  Rescue  21,  and  the  Ports  and  Waterways 
Safety System (PAWSS);
• Increasing the capability of Coast Guard cutters and Maritime Safety and Secu-
rity  Teams  (MSSTs)  to  detect  Rad/Nuc  materials,  intercept  suspect  ships,  and 
respond to incidents involving the release of Rad/Nuc substances.

In  addition,  the  2006  budget  further  increases  and  enhances  the  Coast  Guard’s 

operational presence by:

• Accelerating  deployment  of  organic  Airborne  Use  of  Force  (AUF)  capability  to 
five Coast Guard Air Stations, increasing the ability to respond to maritime se-
curity threats;
• Replacing  existing  obsolete  and  unstable  cutter  boats  on  the  High  Endurance 
Cutter (WHEC) and Medium Endurance Cutter (WMEC) fleet with the more ca-
pable  Cutter  Boat—Over  the  Horizon  (CB–OTH).  This  platform  nearly  doubles 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00096 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

93

the  speed  of  the  existing  cutter  boat,  increases  secure  communication  capabili-
ties,  and  when  used  in  conjunction  with  AUF  capability  has  a  98  percent  suc-
cess rate in stopping suspicious vessels;
• Providing  14  additional  Response  Boat-Smalls  (RB-S)  and  associated  crews  to 
provide vessel escorts, and enforce security zones near critical infrastructure in-
cluding enhancing liquefied natural gas and waterside security;
• Reallocating existing Coast Guard resources to immediately fill an existing gap 
in  national  maritime  Law  Enforcement  and  Counter-Terrorism  (LE/CT)  capa-
bility. The permanent establishment of the Coast Guard’s Enhanced MSST (E–
MSST) will provide an offensive DHS force able to operate across the full spec-
trum of LE and CT response in support of homeland security and homeland de-
fense  objectives,  including  CT  response  capability  for  scheduled  security  events 
out to 50 nautical miles from shore and augmenting interagency assets in high 
visibility venues such as National Special Security Events (NSSEs). 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. OLYMPIA J. SNOWE TO

MARGARET T. WRIGHTSON 

Question  1.  What  troubles  me  about  the  current  time  frame  for  the  Deepwater 
program is by the time we have finished the program twenty something years down 
the  road  we  will  most  likely  have  to  immediately  embark  on  another  wholesale  re-
placement  of  Coast  Guard  assets.  What  has  the  Coast  Guard  done  to  project  how 
long the Deepwater assets will continue to be useful before another acquisition pro-
gram is required? 

Answer.  We  have  not  reviewed  the  Coast  Guard’s  strategy  for  determining  how 
long the replacement Deepwater assets will last before they themselves would need 
to be replaced. However, information about the expected useful life of any asset that 
the government may wish to purchase is a critical piece of information for effective 
and efficient acquisition management, so this is a reasonable question for the Coast 
Guard to answer. 

Question 2. In your opinion, would the Coast Guard be able to manage Deepwater 
if it was accelerated? If not, what does the Coast Guard have to do in order to suc-
cessfully manage it? 

Answer. My answer here is not a simple one. Although the Coast Guard is making 
progress  on  our  recommendations,  the  recommendations  have  yet  to  be  fully  ad-
dressed. Moreover, over the past year we have seen schedule slippages, growing un-
obligated  balances,  and  at  least  one  instance  of  performance  problems.  The  Coast 
Guard has just started using the Integrated Master Schedule that we recommended 
last  year  so  it  remains  to  be  seen  whether  this  will  translate  into  better  Coast 
Guard  visibility  into  the  program.  Finally,  the  revised  mission  needs  statement 
(MNS) and new implementation plan add to these uncertainties. However, I will say 
this.  If  the  Coast  Guard  successfully  implements  our  recommendations,  we  would 
be  a  lot  more  comfortable  than  we  are  today  with  a  more  aggressive  schedule.  I 
would  also  add  that  we  would  look  more  favorably  on  acceleration  for  assets  after 
they are proven, that is after they have been built, fielded and tested so that identi-
fied  improvements  can  be  made  in  follow-on  assets.  Accelerating  the  production  of 
proven  replacement  assets  is  a  lot  less  risky  than  accelerating  unproven  assets.  In 
saying  this,  I  would  also  add  the  caveat  that  in  making  a  determination  about  the 
advisability of accelerating a particular asset, one would also need to consider poten-
tial industrial base, manpower, and training implications as part of the decision. 

Question 3. Have you looked at the feasibility of accelerating Deepwater to either 
a  15  year  or  10  year  implementation  plan?  Are  you  aware  of  any  costs  involved  in 
accelerating  Deepwater?  How  much  would  it  cost  each  year  to  accelerate  it  to  15 
years? 10 years? 

Answer. We have not looked at the feasibility of accelerating Deepwater. This past 
year  we  worked  with  the  Coast  Guard  in  an  effort  to  ascertain  the  relative  costs 
of replacement versus sustainment, but the Coast Guard was unable to provide the 
data we required for an accurate analysis. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG TO

MARGARET T. WRIGHTSON 

Question.  Will  GAO  be  studying  the  problems  with  the  port  security  grant  pro-
gram identified by the Inspector General and the Administration’s efforts to address 
them? 

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00097 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

94

Answer. GAO is studying the port security grant program. Our examination of the 
grant  program  involves  determining  the  extent  to  which  risk  management  ap-
proaches are used to compare and prioritize grant applications across port locations. 
It  is  part  of  a  broader  effort  that  is  looking  at  risk  management  practices  at  the 
Coast  Guard  as  well  as  the  role  that  the  Information  Analysis  and  Infrastructure 
Protection (IAIP) Directorate of the Department of Homeland Security is playing in 
setting  uniform  policies  and  guidelines  on  risk  management  so  that  it  can  compare 
and  prioritize  critical  infrastructure  across  various  sectors,  such  as  transportation 
and  energy.  We  are  doing  this  work  in  response  to  a  request  from  Representative 
Henry  A.  Waxman,  Ranking  Minority  Member,  Government  Reform  Committee, 
House  of  Representatives;  and  Representatives  C.A.  Dutch  Ruppersberger  and 
George Miller. We plan to issue our report this summer.

Æ

VerDate 0ct 09 2002  10:15 Nov 21, 2005 Jkt 021672 PO 00000 Frm 00098 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\WPSHR\GPO\DOCS\21672.TXT JACK PsN: JACKF

